Authors
Jeremiah Kipp
Number of Reviews
58

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)
In this age of digital filmmaking, Shadow of the Vampire is a love
letter to the beautiful mechanism of a motion picture camera.  There's
something both tactile and mysterious about images created on a thin
sliver of film guided through a series of loops and pins.  The final
product is run through another instrument with wheels and sprockets, the
projector.  As the movie flickers across a silver screen, it's not too
much of a stretch imagining the director whispering, "I gave you life."
That's the implied joke throughout Shadow of the Vampire, the strange
and fanciful projection of what might have occurred during production of
that classic 1922 German horror film, Nosferatu - A Symphony of Terror.
This silent film was plagued with financial troubles, crew member
disappearances and deaths, and the constant threat of being sued by Bram
Stoker's widow for ripping off Dracula after failing to secure the
rights.  Given the scant amount of reliable historical information,
screenwriter Steven Katz takes some enormous liberties, playfully
delving into the surreal and supernatural.
At a brisk 93 minutes, Shadow of the Vampire is light on its feet.  Have
patience through the incredibly long and pretentious opening credits,
complete with music that can best be described as "eerie and
foreboding."
Obsessed with realism, director F.W. Murnau (John Malkovich) drags his
small production unit to the outskirts of rural Germany to shoot
Nosferatu in an authentic location.  His real coup is casting the
elusive Max Schreck, a method actor who will appear on set only at
night, and only in full costume and makeup.
Having had no real experience before Murnau started shooting Nosferatu,
Shadow of a Vampire plays with the notion that Schreck's creature-actor
suddenly popped into existence: Art creates life, or a monster.  In a
role this Wooster Group-trained actor has been preparing for all his
life, Willem Dafoe plays the vampire with a mixture of childlike tics
and grand gestures.  Academy voters take note, his Schreck is both diva
and curious child.  Almost every scene he's in would make a fine Oscar
clip.
The cast and crew raise a collective eyebrow at Schreck's bizarre
technique but are undeniably impressed when he makes his first memorable
appearance from the shadows.  In the nights that follow, members of the
crew begin to fall into a deep sickness.  While Murnau frets over his
financial troubles, Schreck begins to take bites out of his fellow
actors.  Murnau, caring only for the completion of his picture, offers
petty threats to Schreck such as, "You shall have no close-ups!  None!" 
In response, Schreck only waves his talons and sneers through his two
fanged front teeth.  Feh.
Shadow's director, E. Elias Merhige, uses Murnau's visual approach as
inspiration.  The train montage, set against a blood red sunset, is a
particularly brilliant juxtaposition of canted low angles and mystical
landscapes.  There is frequent use of stock footage (from the Murnau
film), but more often Merhige recreates the black-and-white silent film
instead.  As Murnau's actors carry on with their sweeping gestures, the
director rambles on with elaborate and colorful directions.  ("You have
had a very nice sleep, Gustav!  How about a nice stretch?  That's good
-- now read your letter.  Laugh at the silly superstitions of the
locals!")
Not surprisingly, the monster Schreck is more sympathetic than its
creator Murnau.  The director is so callous he mutters, "We have
achieved pathos," after filming a functionary scene involving the
heroine petting her cat.  John Malkovich, who recently discovered the
joy of acting again after several years of bored stock mannerisms, is
appropriately glib and nasty throughout.
How about a round of applause for casting director Carl Proctor, who has
filled out the supporting cast with terrific character actors?  Strong
impressions are made by Udo Kier as the harried producer, Cary Elwes as
the square jawed cameraman, and scene stealing Eddie Izzard as
Nosferatu's foppish romantic lead.  The art direction by Chris Bradley
also deserves special mention for capturing the German expressionist
"look" of Murnau's films without going over-the-top into caricature.
The final scene may divide audiences, but the movie really doesn't have
much of a point without it, a sudden and unexpected delve into the
fantastic, followed by an abrupt cut to black which nails the coffin
shut.  Playful and anachronistic, it's an appropriate fate for the
characters of Murnau and Schreck.  Without blowing the surprise, it's
safe to say that Shadow of the Vampire references the old mantra: "It's
only a movie."
Director: E. Elias Merhige
Producers: Nicolas Cage, Jeff Levine
Writer: Steven Katz
Starring: John Malkovich, Willem Dafoe, Udo Kier, Cary Elwes, Eddie
Izzard, Catherine McCormack, Ronan Vibert
http://www.shadowofthevampire.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Idioterne (1998)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/10c70e129c2e15c7882568cd00198aa8?OpenDocument
Why would a group of upstanding citizens of the middle class decide to
meet in a large country house and get in touch with their inner idiot?
 These young people are in a continual training process to get in touch
with what they describe as their `inner idiot', allowing themselves to
lapse into behavior outside of the constrictions imposed by a society
obsessed with a mask of etiquette.
 Their revolutionary behavior is demonstrated when they journey out into
the `real world' to behave as though they are mentally retarded. They
wander into restaurants and dribble food over themselves, speaking in
gibberish, or they arrange for field trips to industrial factories where
they make a mockery of the foreman. Everything they do is an attempt to
break through the politically correct and achieve a cathartic response
in everyone they touch, be it frustration or disgust, anger or
humiliation.
 They're all pretty content to revel in their idiocy because it brings
them back to something primal, but are they dilettantes wasting their
time pis*ing people off, or are they indeed tapping into something that
is boldly social and political?
 Writer-director Lars von Trier, who supposedly wrote the screenplay in
four days and seems to rely heavily on improvisation, poses plenty of
difficult questions in The Idiots and refuses to hand his audience a
map. In fact, there's a rather large question mark as to whether his
film is merely an elaborate prank on the viewer or a genuine attempt to
question the modes of society when it comes to behavior and the attempts
to homogenize creativity and spontaneity.
 The character who introduces us to the world of The Idiots is Karen
(Bodil Jorgensen), an ordinary woman in a yellow sweater. We first see
her wandering around, uncertain where she wants to go. She goes into a
restaurant and orders her meal, and witnesses three of the `idiots'
wandering around playing with the patrons, who grow increasingly annoyed
with their childish behavior, and the helpless waiter who attempts to
maintain an atmosphere of calm within the restaurant. The tension of the
scene is the inability of those in the restaurant to insult people who
are `obviously' mentally handicapped and know not what they do.
 Karen goes with these three, who reveal themselves to in fact be
hypereducated members of the bourgeois. The leader of the group is the
intense Stoffer (Jens Albinus), whose uncle owns the house in which they
run their workshop. Karen passively observes their behavior around the
neighborhood - running around naked in the woods, or selling cheap
potted plants from house to house for an outrageous sum all the while
keeping up the front of being lumbering `idiots.'
 She and Stoffer engage in hearty debates of exactly what their
philosophy is, and why they would go to great lengths to prove a point
which seems to be different for each member in the group. Their arrogant
leader stresses the importance of what they are doing by savagely
insulting the routines of the humdrum real world they are escaping from
 the doctors, teachers, and privileged kids among them. `They are the
ones who are making fun,' sneers Stoffer, deflecting the argument that
all they do is stir up trouble and insult those around them.
The stakes grow increasingly higher as Stoffer pushes them to break out
of their shells, resulting in some of the scenes which made it so
difficult to release The Idiots in this country, particularly the
infamous "gang-bang' scene which results in a playful group orgy. It's
not so playful when von Trier cuts to a hardcore image of a penis
thrusting itself into a woman's vagina (and for the United States
release, a black bar will be inserted over the insulting mail member.
Funny how Basic Instinct didn't face the same problem with Sharon
Stone's winking crotch.
It becomes increasingly clear to some of the members of the group,
however, that Stoffer may not be able to handle the pressure he places
on the shoulders of his peers. There's a crucial scene midway through
the film when one of the `idiots' brings a group of people who have
Down's syndrome to the house for lunch, and the pretenders are forced to
look at the very people who they behave like, only without the guise of
`acting' or some political ideal of being an `idiot'.
The question of why anyone would want to explore their inner `idiot' or
`child' varies among the members of the group, but is brought home by
the crucial final scenes with Karen, where she allows herself to explore
her own unspoken motivations for becoming a part of their group. It's
powerfully affecting.
The Idiots is the second film to come out of the Dogme 95 Manifesto, a
series of guidelines created by von Trier and Thomas (The Celebration)
Vinterburg. The rules include that the film must be shot entirely
hand-held, in natural light. The sound must be recorded on location
(i.e., no dubbing or sound effects will be added in post-production.)
Also, no `genre' films are allowed, such as horror or science fiction.
Any Dogme 95 films which break their rules must make a confession (for
example, von Trier admits to using a `stunt penis' in the gang-bang
scene, using a porn star instead of the actual actor for the one shot.)
There's a certain amount of in-joke humor and sarcasm within the
manifesto, but it does serve to `shake up' cinematic conventions which
have become routine and predictable in modern film.
Of course, some may find the technical elements to be below par. It
looks as though it were fairly cheap to make, and is clearly video
technology  lacking the grain of film. The camera occasionally picks up
the boom pole or the shadow of the cameraman as it follows the action,
allowing itself to be cinema verite. It feels a little pompous, but
there's no denying that it captures a certain immediacy and spontaneity
in the performances which couldn't have been done any other way.
Lars von Trier has slowly been moving away from the classical filmmaking
approach he used in such films as the stylized, black and white
Zentropa, which, as experimental as his storytelling was, felt more or
less traditional in its carefully lit cinematography.
He moved deeper with Breaking the Waves, his amazing film about a young
woman's act of sacrifice for God, allowing the cameraman to shoot
entirely hand-held in a documentary style, never shooting a scene the
same way twice. In the editing room, he broke the rules of narrative
filmmaking and conventional cutting by allowing the emotional content of
the scene to dictate its flow, allowing for large jump cuts and radical
transitions.
With The Idiots, he's gone further than ever before. It's a
non-narrative story, with small fragments of scenes playing out entirely
at their own pace. The camera moves among it's large group of characters
focusing on whatever it finds most interesting, and only very slowly do
some of the characters begin to emerge as personalities. It's an
interactive film which allows you to take an interest in whatever
characters you like, since there is always a large flurry of activity
happening at any given time.
It's certainly an interesting approach to take, and substantially
different than most of the films you'll see this year. It's frustrating,
even annoyingly smug in its pompous display of a `new wave of
filmmaking.' It's annoying to feel as though von Trier has pulled one
over on you by not bothering to tell a story, or show you how to feel,
or even know whether or not he's insulting your lifestyle or the
characters onscreen.
Rating a film which is basically an elaborate experiment or Rosarch test
for the viewer is hardly an easy task. This is the type of film which
drifts between being a masterpiece and an utter failure, depending on
how you the viewer choose to respond to it. Ultimately, it calls for
repeated viewing if you have the patience or  more important  the
desire. It's decidedly not for everyone, and may alienate passive
audience members (or even active ones who decide it's degrading nonsense
from a smug, self satisfied little punk named Lars von Trier.) For my
money, it's one of the most interesting films which will be released
this year, and though I both love it and hate it, I'll give it the
highest possible recommendation.
Director: Lars von Trier
Producer: Vibeke Windelov
Writer: Lars von Trier
Starring: Bodil Jorgensen, Jens Albinus, Anne Louise Hassing, Troels
Lyby, Nikolai Lie Kaas, Henrik Prip, Louise Mieritz, Knud Romer
Jorgensen, Trine Michelsen, Anders Hove, Paprika Steen
http://www.dogme95.dk/the_idiots/content/index.htm
---
Jeremiah Kipp - kipp@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Genghis Blues (1999)
        Here's the premise: Filmmakers accompany a blind blues musician to the
small country of Tuva, just north of Mongolia, to participate in the
1995 throat-singing symposium in Kyzyl.  My roommate passionately
rhapsodized over it for days, yet nothing about this premise connected
with me.  "Lemme tell you something, pal -- I'd rather watch mute nuns
performing The Sound of Music than watch these guys do their... their...
their crazy throat-singing ritual!"
        Just goes to show, you can't judge a book by its cover.  Boy, did I
feel silly when I actually sat down to watch Genghis Blues, one of the
more exhilarating and passionate documentaries about music and culture
to appear in recent years.  Who would have thought I'd actually love
this music and want to learn more about it?
        There are too many layers of Genghis Blues to discuss within the
context of a review.  And unfortunately, the act of describing the
adventures of our filmmaking team and their companion, Paul Pena (blind,
mouthy, and sharp as a whip) might strike readers as, well, boring.
        Who would think that you could get excited about these characters
packing for their long trip east, riding in planes, buses, and cars for
thousands of miles through the desert?  Or that the history of this
small country would prove exciting?
        You wouldn't expect the musical performers who gather at this event to
cause the average viewer (me) to sit bolt upright on the couch, mouth
agape in amazement, as they sang notes which seemed like the distant
rumblings of an underground cave or an impossibly beautiful wood
instrument.  The experience was beautiful and strange.
        This is no stodgy, academic National Geographic special.  The people of
Tuva are lively and buoyant, pleased, and excited that the American,
Pena, would take such an interest in their art of throat singing, which
allows them to voice more than one note at the same time.  Pena is also
familiar with their vivid, colorful garb and language, long banned by
the Communists.
        And he's blind.  He learned it all by translating from Tuvan to Russian
to English, in Braille!  Rocky Balboa, you're a stinking chump.  You
ain't nothing!
        The story is inherently dramatic.  This is Pena's first time in this
country, whose customs he has studied so passionately.  As a participant
in their competition, he's under enormous pressure created by his own
fear.  Right before he goes on, he's in the midst of paralyzing stage
fright (which multiplies itself by a thousand when he's told that he
cannot perform the song he had prepared, as some of the audience would
be offended).
        Paul and the filmmakers also journey through the land, meeting shamans
and wrestlers.  They take part in a goat slaughtering ceremony and bless
themselves in the water of sacred rivers.  While the filmmaking is
rough, sometimes choppily cut together, you can't beat the beautiful
landscapes or the appreciation that shines through Pena's face.  This
American has found his spiritual home.
        Genghis Blues doesn't make Paul into a saint.  As a blind man, he's
often confused and disoriented, battling bouts of self-doubt and
depression.  It's heartbreaking to learn that in America the farthest he
can walk alone is the corner store, that he often feels alienated or
misunderstood as though he were some freak.  And when some of his
medication runs out, they may need to cut short their trip to Tuva, so
Genghis Blues, for all its fascination with exploring new sights and
sounds, is not without tears.
        Saddest of all, an artist like Paul Pena can only find acceptance in a
foreign land that doesn't look at his craft with confusion and
misunderstanding.  If Genghis Blues accomplishes anything, it makes
Pena's world accessible to folks like me who might not give a damn, were
they not led to the stream and asked to drink.
Director: Roko Belic
Producer: Adrien Belic, Roko Belic
Starring: Paul Pena, Kongar-ol Ondar, Lemon DeGeorge, Mario Casetta
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Requiem for a Dream (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/c0d27d402232edf3882569740004ddd7?OpenDocument
        Imagine Trainspotting without any trace of humor and you're on the
right track.  Picture Pasolini's Salo: 120 Days of Sodom shot by some
MTV music video kid interested in the novelty of his new camera.  Darren
Aronofsky (Pi) stacks one degrading sight atop another without
implicating the viewer, nor providing any framework or reference for his
visual rape of his audience  - all smoke and mirrors disguising a great,
vapid emptiness.
        For starters, I've never seen Coney Island junkies who look as pretty
as Harry (Jared Leto) and Tyrone (Marlon Wayans), who bear a passing
resemblance to the kids from Calvin Klein ads.  They're drug dealers who
have high aspirations, saving their earnings for a better tomorrow. 
Placing all their cash in a locker, they sit under the boardwalk smoking
up and dreaming their grandiose dreams.  Too bad they get high too often
off their own supply.  The good times can't last forever.
        The drug use scenes are done in vivid smash cuts showing dilating
pupils, squeezing needles, the sizzle of white powder cooked in a
spoon.  We never see these kids shoot up -- rather, we see abstract
images.  Every time this technique appears, it's too flashy and aware of
its own experimental filmmaking approach, a purely stylistic flourish.
        Kronos Quartet wrote the driving, thumping, angry, brutal violin score
which drums like a hammer and chain beating you into submission.  Harry,
Tyrone, and their ambitious if drug addled friend Marion (a very good
Jennifer Connelly), who could be a great designer were it not for her
plunge into addiction, eventually become slaves to their own destructive
destinies.  They run out of money, and in the second half of the movie
they move through a bleak winter, suffering the eternal torments of the
damned.
        Each situation is set up so neatly, we're certain where the path will
lead.  Harry sports a nasty welt on his arm which doesn't look so good. 
Tyrone discovers that maybe that trip to Florida to track down some
fresh supply was a bad idea -- since them southern boys don't like
colored folk.  Marion eventually telephones a sadistic pimp (Keith
David) and sells her body for drugs.
        The movie's first scene involves Harry stealing his mom's television
set.  She can always go right down the block in half an hour and buy it
back.  That's their adorable dog and pony show, and poor Sara Goldfarb
(Ellen Burstyn) is too nice, too soft around the edges, so apathetic she
won't do anything about it.  Her husband is dead, Harry is all she's got
left.
        Ellen Burstyn is so good, so unglamorous and believable as a Brighton
Beach Jewish mama, that she shines through Aronofsky's bag of tricks and
delivers a strong, sad, comic performance.  At first, Sara seems to
share the addiction of the film's other characters, endlessly watching
her television, but when she gets a surprise phone call asking her to
appear on a TV show she realizes she's too overweight to fit into the
red dress her husband once admired her in.  She goes on a diet.
        Unfortunately for the audience, midway through we realize that Sara's
in trouble.  She's gone to a quack doctor for some diet pills, which
turn out to be speed.  She's gnashing her teeth in no time, and the
worst is yet to come.
        Sara's refrigerator starts roaring like a lion as the images become
fuzzy and, well, straight out of Terry Gilliam's superior Fear and
Loathing in Las Vegas.  In short order, Sara wears the same junkie shoes
as her younger co-stars.  While it's painful to watch a harmless old
woman descend into the circle of hell, she could easily have escaped it
by going to another doctor for a second opinion.
        Some critics are sure to fawn over Requiem.  It goes further than most
films into uncomfortable territory, and the spinning visuals are
technically accomplished.  I'm sure Darren Aronofsky's courage will be
extolled -- yes, it's so bold to show human misery without sympathy or
understanding.
        I'm not against violence or torture onscreen.  The best film to compare
Requiem to is Pasolini's Salo.  Wisely, Pasolini used restraint with his
camera and simply filmed people being sexually abused and beaten without
showy fanfare.  Salo creates a hollow, disturbing feeling of
helplessness.
        Ultimately, Aronofsky lacks that crucial insight when showing the
nature of horror.  His gaze feels inexperienced.  Perhaps young
filmmakers should not attempt to tackle the bleak world before they have
had a chance to go through it themselves.  (Salo was Pasolini's final
film; Mike Leigh's bleak Naked was made when he was middle aged.)
Once we get past the notion that addiction is a horrible thing (which I
don't believe is news to anyone who will watch Requiem for a Dream), the
question remains: What purpose does this film serve?  Let me know if you
figure it out.
Director: Darren Aronofsky
Producer: Eric Watson, Palmer West
Writer: Darren Arronofsky, Hubert Selby Jr.
Starring: Ellen Burstyn, Jared Leto, Jennifer Connelly, Marlon Wayans,
Christopher McDonald, Louise Lasser, Keith David, Sean Gullette
http://www.requiemforadream.com/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for "I, Claudius" (1976) (mini)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/07948eb768139e868825697000098810?OpenDocument
        This popular thirteen-episode BBC mini-series makes for compulsive
viewing whether or not you have any interest in the early history of the
Roman Empire.  Based on two novels by historian Robert Graves, I,
Claudius delves into conspiracies, ruthless murders and cover-ups,
betrayal, seduction and madness.  It's Dallas relocated to the years
before Christ was born, when scheming men wore togas and struggled for
power while the women got married and stayed in the background --
sometimes in the best position of all when it came to moving their chess
pieces around.
        Our hero is Claudius, gloriously played by D-d-d-d-derek Jacobi, who
twitches his head and stammers over every other word.  As a young man,
he watches his friends and relations die off, one by one, poisoned by
the ruthless and destructive Livia (the queen of pure evil, Sian
Phillips) as she grooms her son Tiberius (George Baker) to become the
second emperor of Rome.
        First, however, Livia must deal with the mercurial first emperor,
Augustus (Brian Blessed), loved by one and all.  This vital, vibrant
figure is desperate to find an heir whom he can be proud of.  He isn't
particularly fond of Tiberius, who makes Al Gore seem positively
animated.  It becomes almost comic as Augustus chooses new favorites,
and one by one Livia poisons their figs or frames them for crimes they
did not commit.
        Young Claudius quickly learns to play the fool, observing the violent
world which surrounds him.  He obviously did well for himself, since the
series cuts back and forth between the development of our hero as a
youth and his last days as an old, wizened, wise emperor in 54 A.D.,
poring over his biography and fretting over the fate of his maniacal
son, Nero (Christopher Biggins).
        The series can easily be divided into four substantial parts: the
golden era of Augustus, followed by the fretful reign of unpopular
Tiberius, then a dose of madness with Caligula (a gleeful John Hurt) who
elects his horse a Senator, romances the ancient Livia, and torments all
those around him with threats of torture and death.  The climax and crux
of the series is when Claudius, as a joke, is elected ruler of the
empire and is provided the chance to show what he has learned over the
years.  The first step: kill all your enemies.
        The production is surprisingly well done for a television show
(especially a 1976 TV show), with vivid and colorful costumes and sets. 
One wishes it had been shot on film rather than flat and boring
videotape, but at least the performances are uniformly excellent. 
Jacobi rules the show with a buoyant and layered performance,
alternately funny as the butt of jokes and revealing of his powerful
intellect.
        Sian Phillips and John Hurt are appropriately monstrous as Livia and
Caligula, and Phillips earns a certain pathos as she desires to become a
one with the Gods.  Brian Blessed, though a bit of a ham, is always a
pleasure to watch and livens up each scene as Augustus, a man whose
presence is felt when he enters the room.  Patrick Stewart shows up in a
key role for a few episodes as a self-serving soldier hungry for power.
        Though unquestionably a soap opera dead set on keeping its viewers
entertained with all manner of sneakiness and double-dealings, I,
Claudius is compulsive entertainment which moves at a breakneck pace. 
Taken as a thirteen volume (and 740-minute long) set, it's the type of
show which would keep you up for all night and half the day eagerly
waiting to see what Livia is cooking, and when Claudius will come out of
his shell to strike.
Director: Herbert Wise
Producers: Martin Lisemore
Writers: Jack Pulman
Starring: Derek Jacobi, Sian Phillips, Brian Blessed, John Hurt, George
Baker, Patrick Stewart, Margaret Tyzack
http://www.historyinfilm.com/claudius/
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Gouttes d'eau sur pierres brűlantes (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://a.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/3ef189f9044cb8c08825693f00082905?OpenDocument
        Four people are in a room dancing, Charlie's Angels style, fingers
pointed like shooting guns and booties shaking. Heads bob up and down in
time with the pop and fizz funk of the German record playing in the
background.
        Styled like a music video, we cut back and forth between all four of
them swinging in sync with the rhythm and performing their individual
motions with campy grandeur. After three or four minutes of this highly
amusing, sexually charged romp and stomp in the living room, the middle
aged businessman (obviously the leader of the group) abruptly turns off
the record. "All right, that's enough. Everybody to the bedroom!" The
women rush offscreen, giggling and squealing.
        That's what was used as a trailer for Francois Ozon's latest sexual
comedy-thriller. The young Frenchman who directed the superb short film
See the Sea and the puerile "shock-o-rama" feature Sitcom is back with
another foray of men and women who push each other's buttons. Ozon lends
his slightly warped comic perspective to a screenplay adapted from a
theater piece by young, bitter Rainer Werner Fassbinder. 
        Thank goodness Fassbinder never made this movie, since it is filled
with pretentious dialogue which, if taken too seriously, would have been
just painful. Fassbinder's earliest films are all bleak musings on how
terrible the world is. "My soul is filled with such emptiness the likes
of which you have never seen before, and I cannot ever be happy because
my soul is empty, et cetera, et cetera." Humorless misanthropic slogans
and self-loathing for ninety minutes do not make for an enjoying viewing
experience. (He got better with age.)
        However, once Fassbinder's script was pared down by Ozon, some of the
insightful bickering by a couple trapped in a living situation which has
made them articulate and bitter comes to the forefront. This was the
German auteur's greatest skill, the ability to paint characters who
wallow in misery and inflict pain on those they hold closest to their
hearts. Suddenly, every line of dialogue is a mini-apocalypse, such as,
"Why do you wear shoes around the apartment? You're so nosy! I told you
to wear slippers!"
        Older Fassbinder clone Leo (sleek Bernard Giraudeau, very fine) is the
middle aged man who picks up straight, younger Fassbinder clone Franz
(apple cheeked Malik Zidi) one night and gloriously seduces him. First,
they drink. Leo turns on the charm, using flattery and subtle
manipulations to get Franz to confess to having an interest in
homosexual forays. Before long, they're indulging in Franz's fantasy of
a stranger coming to the bed wearing an overcoat. It's sexy, diabolical
and funny, all at once.
        While the dialogue and set-up feel stagy (all interior locations and
talky battles of will) Ozon manages to deftly use bright and gaudy '70s
colors in each room and retro costumes to add visual splendor to each
scene. The seduction scene and forthcoming verbal sparring tends to go
on and on for long stretches into the realm of tedium, the performances
are so compelling and the dialogue so spry and game that you somehow
manage to stick with Water Drops on Burning Rocks.
        After the seduction, we see them six months later in the midst of a
live-in relationship gone to hell. Franz is now Leo's "housewife",
cooking and cleaning and hanging up his coat for him, lighting his
cigarette and scrubbing the floorboards. Leo remains dissatisfied with
everything Franz does, and when it reaches the inevitable point where
Franz wants to pack his bags and go, Leo does a bad job of pretending
that it's their very arguments which keep him happy.
        Ozon's casting in his films remains masterful, arousing genuine pathos
in characters who are either dumb or unsympathetic. While his plots fare
better in the short form (a little goes a long way in See the Sea) and
he recycles visual and story ideas to pad out his ninety minute movie,
he does manage to throw in enough stuff (and two new characters midway
through) to keep it moving. Besides, you always have that nifty dance
number to look forward to.
        Sex, cruelty, fetishism - it may amount to a mere sick confection of a
movie, one which is ultimately insignificant and lightweight, but it's
compulsively watchable if you're game.
Director: Francois Ozon
Producer: Olivier Debosc, Christine Gozlan,Kenzo Horikoshi, Marc
Missonnier, Alain Sarde 
Writer: Rainer Werner Fassbinder, Francois Ozon
Starring: Bernard Giraudeau, Malik Zidi, Ludivine Sagnier, Anna Thomson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Price of Glory (2000)
Father knows best.  Ex-boxer Arturo Ortega (Jimmy Smits, Bless the
Child) has placed his three sons on the assembly line for success,
manufacturing them into perfect fighting champions.  With his high
intensity training, they'll be given the opportunities he never had. 
When his kids grow up and each decides to pursue opportunities in and
out of the ring, the family unit starts to crumble.  Can they weather
the Price of Glory?
The standard repertoire of confrontation, hope, and tragedy all fall
into place.  Arturo thinks one of his boys doesn't have the makings of a
champion, but maybe he isn't looking hard enough.  Another son (Jon
Seda, Selena) wants to get married, but settling down could ruin his
shot at the big title.  Familiar archetypes emerge and follow their
routes to a traditional grand finale.
Price of Glory speaks from the voice of Latino experience, all too often
ignored in mainstream cinema, and an appealing cast elevates this
made-for-television material.  Jimmy Smits stands out in particular,
bringing an easy charisma and measured patience to the role of coach and
father.  The entire production is slick and well lit, if indistinct from
the glossy Hollywood look of other dramas.  The boxing seems a little
too sanitary for such a violent sport, but the actors throw themselves
into it with appropriate gusto.
While the intentions are good, Price of Glory is never confident enough
to push the boundaries of the sports drama mold.  Small, character
driven moments get swept up in the single-minded mechanism of plot. 
It's those seemingly minor details that separate truly great stories
from those which are merely adequate.  Price of Glory, not unlike Arturo
Ortega, barely misses its shot at the title.
Director: Carlos Ávila
Producers: Moctesuma Esparza, Arthur Friedman, Robert Katz
Writer: Phil Berger
Starring: Jimmy Smits, Jon Seda, Clifton Collins Jr., Ernesto Hernández,
Maria del Mar, Ron Perlman
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for New York Beat Movie (1981)
Read this and see if you can tell me what it means:
Yes, that's right!  There's an empty space in the middle where the word
"SPACE" should be.  Don't break your arm patting yourself on the back,
because it's pretentious and means absolutely nothing.  The same can be
said for some of the artists, filmmakers, performers, and musicians from
NYC's downtown scene in the early 80's, where anyone with this kind of
lingo could be a great artist if Andy Warhol or [Insert Pretentious
Mover, Shaker, Coffee Drinker's Name Here] said so.  Do you really think
we'd be talking about Jean Michel Basquiat if Warhol hadn't shined a
spotlight on him?  More to the point, do you really think we'd be
talking about Basquiat if Julian Schnabel's (admittedly pretty enjoyable
[Not! -Ed.]) movie hadn't made him into a romantic myth?
Along comes Edo Bertoglio's Downtown 81, originally called New York Beat
Movie.  This supremely awful and compulsively watchable 72-minute
featurette is making its world theatrical premiere after missing parts
of the film (lost in Europe, my dears) were rediscovered in 1998.  Watch
the 19-year old Basquiat, playing himself, wander the Lower East Side
for 24 hours in search of -- what?  Some miracle to pay the rent with
$500 he doesn't have.  With a painting tucked under his arm, this young
artiste pounds the Lower East Side pavement encountering various
trendsetters from the early 80's, ducks into various clubs, paints some
graffiti throughout urbania, and says faux-witty things in voice-over
like, "Sometimes you feel like life is killing you."
Much of the time, Downtown 81 is supremely boring and steeped in a low
budget variation of mystical 80's excess.  Basquiat himself is handsome
but vapid, a sounding board for philosophical drivel that gives
tortured, penniless artists a bad name.  If it weren't for the beautiful
representation of a disenfranchised neighborhood, back in a time when
downtown meant burnt out factory buildings around every corner and a sea
of grungy street life meandering around every corner, it'd be simply
insufferable.  Yet there's something to be said for movies as time
capsules, representing the textures, colors, filth and flimsiness of New
York during a time where artists were pushing boundaries and breaking
new ground with punk rock, experimental film, disturbing art -- a
decaying, angry mirror to the Reagan years.  (Amos Poe, who has a small
role in Downtown 81, was among the filmmakers at this time making far
sharper filmic representations of the climate, though I don't see any
commercial doors opening up for The Foreigner, his collaboration with
Eric Mitchell.  Instead, we get Edo Bertogio's love letter to Basquiat.)
In addition to the vivid portrait of city streets and shitty taxi cabs,
crowded art clubs and braying landlords, there is a vibrant and eclectic
blend of diverse music found in Downtown 81.  Onscreen (in club scenes
and rehearsal rooms seen through the glazed eyes of Basquiat) is the
tacky excess of Kid Creole and the Coconuts, complete with dancing girls
on the sidelines doing the herky-jerky "bad dancing" we remember from
the early, early days of MTV.  Then there's the power trio, DNA, who
walk back and forth playing their guitars and drums with nary a care in
the world.  (Screw you if you don't like it, they imply.)  The Plastics,
a gonzo Japanese band, epitomize the best and worst of new wave in their
"shiny shopping bag of mania" performance.  How else would you describe
them?  Huh?  Huh?  Thought so!
Not seen live but livening up the soundtrack are Melle Mel (yes!), John
Lurie of Lounge Lizards fame, Lydia Lunch, Suicide, and Vincent Gallo. 
If Edo Bertoglio had decided instead to stuff this truly radical mix of
performers in the same room and turn the cameras on, he might have had
something truly special.  Downtown 81 is a better mix tape than a movie
-- expect the soundtrack to clutter the shelves of Virgin Megastore
right next to the Sex Pistols, the Ramones, and the Clash -- all lined
up in a neat little row!  I'm never gonna stop throwing up.  These bands
were radicals at one time, but I would hate to meet the crowd that's
gonna buy this shit at Virgin.  Doesn't that defeat the whole
intention?  Has everything become co-opted?  I digress, but someone's
gotta say it!
The posters for Basquiat -- I mean, Downtown 81, are gonna tell you it's
"New York the way it was...when it was...."  Fair enough, but all I have
to say is: where the fuck is perpetual blowhard Rockets Redglare?  And
if you don't know who that is, this ain't the movie for you.
http://www.downtown81.com/film/index.htm
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Manhunter (1986)
He's a completely different monster than the Wagnerian cannibal glimpsed
in The Silence of the Lambs.  Released five years earlier, Manhunter
(based on the book Red Dragon) views Dr. Hannibal Lecter (spelled
Lektor, here) with clinical restraint, as glimpsed in a clean,
antiseptic white cell.  Respected British actor Brian Cox (Rushmore)
would not be so gauche as to flare his nostrils while smelling you --
he'd catch you off guard, throwing away the line about your cheap after
shave with "a ship on the bottle" with a bemused note of thinly veiled
contempt.
One could discuss Cox's superb performance for the length of an entire
review yet he's only in three crucial scenes opposite his captor,
semi-retired Will Graham (William L. Petersen, To Live and Die in
L.A.).  As in Silence, Graham users Lektor as a vessel to recover the
mindset of tracking serial killers for the FBI.  Lektor's chilly,
sensual brilliance pervades the entire film, taking a psychic toll on
Graham.  Their scenes together alternate between mindfucking stabs
("Dream much, Will?") to vague, unsettling attraction.
The central conflict with Will Graham is his cursed ability to read the
mind of a psychopath, but decoding the mind of a killer is no easy
matter.  Despite the false promises from his friend and supervisor Jack
Crawford (Dennis Farina, Snatch) that he'll only be an advisor, Graham
finds himself once again slipping into old habits.  Before long, he's
empathizing with the killer, which may lead to some major breakthroughs
in the case while tearing Graham's family apart.
The presence of evil haunts Manhunter, intangibly.  The graphic
forensics reports Graham prepares, outlining the macabre crime scenes in
vivid detail, allow the imagination to fill in what happened within the
silent houses and rooms he explores.  Graham flatly describes blood on
the wall from arterial spray as the victim tried to fight, knowing that
the killer was headed for the children's room.
As serial killer Francis Dollarhyde, Tom Noonan (What Happened Was...)
is given the role of a lifetime.  Introduced at the midpoint of Graham's
search, this fiend is both demigod and terrified child trapped within a
shy, soft-spoken introvert.  Noonan brings an odd, unpredictable
stillness to the role, whether softly threatening to staple a victim's
eyelids to their forehead or making tender, awkward advances on a blind,
fiercely independent co-worker (Joan Allen, The Ice Storm).  Dollarhyde
is viewed with cool restraint, biding his time until unveiling his
twisted fantasy to transform into a God without remorse.
Michael Mann, well regarded for his minute attention to technical as
well as psychological detail, is very specific with the FBI procedures. 
There is a fascinating sequence concerning dusting a victim's eyes for
fingerprints and another in which the experts scan a handwritten note
from the killer, using infrared lasers to pick up details invisible to
the human eye.
While certain elements of Manhunter are slightly dated, such as
overdressed cops and the ever-present synthesizer score, Dante
Spinotti's crisp visuals still resonate.  His vaguely unsettling angles
often cramp actors into the corners of a shot.  The color scheme is
filled with rich, saturated hues that envelop images in a glossy,
pungent web.  Mann and Spinotti make extensive use of mirrors and
shadows, often framing Graham's reflection in glass during crucial
moments of duress.
Graham's investigation leads to a harrowing confrontation with
Dollarhyde, the troubled beast he had long envisioned on paper.  This
crucial meeting is symbolized by Graham smashing through a glass
doorway, breaking the thin mirror that kept them separate (at least in
Graham's mind).  Unsubtle, perhaps, but after two hours of slow burning
intensity the explosive moment feels earned (accompanied by Iron
Butterfly's surprisingly effective In-A-Gadda-Da-Vida).
The most perceptive scene is not the appropriately grisly finale or even
the company of Dr. Lektor.  It's a brief discussion between Graham and
his stepson (David Seaman) walking through the long aisles of a
supermarket.  The boy asks a few wary questions about Lektor's crimes
and their effect on Graham, who recovered through a long period in a
mental institution.  Graham must provide honest answers while protecting
the child from the horrific details.  Petersen finds the right balance,
investing the scene with careful tenderness.
The release of Manhunter on a limited edition DVD is meant to coincide
with Ridley Scott's Hannibal, the long anticipated sequel to Jonathan
Demme's eerie Silence of the Lambs.  Despite the appearance of Dr.
Lecter/Lektor, there's no guarantee of a crossover fan base.  Manhunter
lacks catchy one-liners about eating someone's liver with fava beans and
a nice chianti (fh-fh-fh-fh), nor does it present cold blooded
psychopaths as pop culture icons befitting a t-shirt.
Instead, Michael Mann unnerves his viewers with this psychologically
slippery, contemplative and disturbing thriller about a detective
searching under his own skin for the criminal impulse.  As Lektor
reminds Graham, "The reason you caught me is we're just alike.  You want
the scent?  Smell yourself."  As Graham ultimately discovers, once you
enter the mind of the killer, you may never return.
Director: Michael Mann
Producers: Richard A. Roth
Writer: Michael Mann
Starring: William L. Petersen, Kim Greist, Joan Allen, Brian Cox, Dennis
Farina, Stephen Lang, Tom Noonan
No web site.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
        Come frolic with the Marquis de Sade deep in the bowels of the
Charenton Asylum, where he'll tickle your fancy with lavish descriptions
of bestiality, flatulence and the dimples of a fat mademoiselle's
bottom.
        As portrayed in Quills, based on the Obie Award-winning play by Doug
Wright, the Marquis is an earthy, dirty, jolly old soul with the
unquenchable desire to write his perverse dreams on paper.  He's the
unflinching id in the face of mediocrity and tolerance, the middle
finger held like a candle to the powerful hypocrites, and the loud fart
in the house of God, an affront to restrictive dogma.
        It's not enough that the madman hole up in his room with quill and
reams of parchment to indulge his fantasies, no.  He has to publish it
to the secret, unspoken delight of the masses.  Chapters are being
smuggled out of the asylum by a curious chambermaid, Madeleine (Kate
Winslet from Heavenly Creatures, Titanic).  The streets are buzzing with
outrage and titillation.
        Napoleon (Ron Cook) would love nothing more than to see the head of the
Marquis twitching under the guillotine, but martyrdom would only
increase the sales and spread the word.  Therefore, a man is sent to the
asylum with the intent to cure the Marquis of all the devils inside his
head, whether it be through torture or, worse, the restriction of his
writing privileges.
        That upstanding citizen sent to Charenton is Dr. Royer-Collard (Michael
Caine, reclaiming his title as Hardest Working Actor in the Business), a
man so moral to the core that he marries a young lass whom he could have
fathered twice over.  This pinnacle of morality even has to force
himself upon her on their wedding night.
        Our friend the doctor is just the sort of closet dirty bird the Marquis
delights in mocking.  A play is swiftly written, performed by the
inmates of the asylum (which is indeed based on fact, since de Sade's
plays were quite popular in his day) about a dirty old man humping his
young bride in a variety of sexual positions.  Dr. Royer-Collard sits in
the audience, silently biding his time.  In this battle of wills between
doctor and madman, this is only the beginning.
        Doug Wright's story takes tremendous liberties with the Marquis' life,
but the approach taken by director Philip Kaufman (Henry & June) feels
appropriately mannered, clever and seedy.  From the start, we accept
that every character will be a bit off.
        Geoffrey Rush is wonderfully carnal and hungry as the Marquis,
sashaying and swaying his body as he spouts out his scathing indictments
of the so-called upstanding members of society.  He makes full use of
his robust voice, moving from ticklish prods to hot ecstasy.  Rush
manages to play the role over-the-top without going into camp, since he
reveals small, subtle moments of genuine feeling (such as the moment we
knew was coming, when the men in power take away his precious quills).
        Kate Winslet continues to impress as his loyal supporter, choosing
challenging roles in independent films rather than cashing in on the
success of Titanic.  She could have become a major Hollywood star, but
instead opted for building a quality body of work in such films as Holy
Smoke and Hideous Kinky.  She and Rush attack their scenes with playful
relish together.
        There's also fine support from Joaquin Phoenix's (Gladiator)
humanitarian priest whose noble principles are rocked by the decadent
charms of the Marquis.  Michael Caine takes what could have been a
predictable arch-fiend and turns him into a complex, firm presence -- a
steady rock who makes for quite a match against Geoffrey Rush's Marquis,
though they share very few scenes.
        Philip Kaufman brings bravura camera placement into the film, whether
it be low angles of leering faces or tracking shots following horse
drawn carriages intercut with passengers rocking back and forth as
vampiric music rejoices on the soundtrack.  The production design is a
Merchant Ivory film gone to seed, with mossy green walls and costumes
which are soiled, wrinkled, and dirty.  Even the wigs have flecks of
sweat and grime.  The actors, feeding off of these props, give
performances like grinning masks, scary and hilarious.
        The plot is fairly traditional melodrama, complete with secret affairs
and betrayals, bodice ripping and murder.  It all culminates in an
inevitable, explosive riot within the madhouse where the insane run
wild, rattling their chains and ripping off their clothes.  The sex and
violence crowd will find their fair share of it here.  While the
mechanics are not unfamiliar, there's so much gusto thrown into the
performances and attention to period detail that Quills plays out as
enjoyably lavish, but not laughable.
        This film never goes as far as Pier Paolo Pasolini's interpretation of
de Sade's Salo: 120 Days of Sodom, happy to be entertaining if not
challenging.  Altogether, it makes for a fitting beginner's introduction
to the Sadean school of thought (and a much better one than De Sade, an
earlier film on the man's life).
        Oddly, even though Geoffrey Rush spends the final half hour of the
picture wandering around completely naked, this version of Marquis de
Sade's life could almost play in Peoria.  Almost, I say.  While the
Marquis spends much of the film talking about the bizarre sexual acts he
committed during his life, Quills does find time to give us a little
necrophilia.  Gotta love that Marquis.
Director: Philip Kaufman
Producer: Julia Chasman, Peter Kaufman, Nick Wechsler
Writer: Doug Wright
Starring: Geoffrey Rush, Kate Winslet, Joaquin Phoenix, Michael Caine,
Billie Whitelaw
http://www.quillsmovie.com/quills/options.htm
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Tremors 3: Back to Perfection (2001) (V)

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
Naomi Watts Chases Hollywood Dreams Along Mulholland Drive  
A feature story by Jeremiah Kipp - Copyright Š 2001 filmcritic.com
Australian actress Naomi Watts (Tank Girl) portrays a wholesome young
starlet eager to fulfill her Hollywood dreams in David Lynch's latest
noir fantasia, Mulholland Drive.  Betty Elms, fresh off the plane from
Canada, finds herself temporarily diverted from her earnest, sparkling
hopes for movie stardom by the unexpected appearance of Rita (Laura
Elena Harring), the amnesia-stricken survivor of a traumatic car
accident.  Out of the plum goodness of her heart, surely made of solid
gold, Betty guides Rita on her quest for self-discovery.  This path
gradually leads them to dark revelations that shake the foundations of
their unexpectedly fragile reality.
Those who have not seen Mulholland Drive should be advised that our
interview with Ms. Watts (daughter of a Pink Floyd sound engineer)
divulges certain details of the plot that first-time viewers may not
wish to uncover.  Though Lynch's tapestry suggests multiple
interpretations and demands repeated viewings, this interview considers
one possibility suggested by Ms. Watts and implied by several critics in
their reviews.  Our discussion is by no means the only reading, but
provides a unique response to the material from an actor translating
Lynch's abstractions into grounded, character-driven motivation.  Read
no further if you don't want to know the key narrative shift of
Mulholland Drive.
The world of "Betty" (largely pulled, one assumes, from the two-hour
television pilot that ABC dropped from its fall season lineup) is
revealed midway through Mulholland Drive as perhaps being an elaborate
romantic fantasy created by Diane (also played by the chameleonic
Watts).  She's an embittered actress living in a dingy hole-in-the-wall
whose movie career never took flight.  What's more, her entire world has
been corrupted by a self-destructive, obsessive love for Rita, now seen
as a cavalier Hollywood diva named Carmela (Harring) that drifts from
one relationship to the next, breaking hearts along the way.  Finding
solace from an unforgiving reality, Diane can only find meaning within
her fabricated romance with Carmela/Rita in the "Betty" dreamscape (and
their passionate love scene is already notorious in some circles).  Even
in the dream, dark impulses start to emerge that may ultimately destroy
Diane/Betty.
After touching on her experience working with David Lynch, one of the
most innovative American filmmakers working today, Ms. Watts shared her
thoughts on Mulholland Drive.
filmcritic.com: Did you have any preconceived ideas about working with
David Lynch?
Naomi Watts: I thought he would be inaccessible; a really dark, intense,
brooding kind of guy.  And I couldn't have been more wrong.  He's just
an incredibly charming, highly spirited human being who is great to be
around, and everybody shared that opinion.  He's got one of the funniest
senses of humor I've ever experienced in a man.  A real dry wit, but
incredibly mischievous at the same time.  We teased each other the whole
time.
On top of that, working with David was an extremely different
experience, because the way he works with his actors is quite different
from the normal director-actor relationship.  He really doesn't tell you
much about what he's thinking.  I know he's not divulging anything to
the press [about the film], but he's the same with actors.  He wants you
to interpret it yourself, so he doesn't give directions.  As actors, for
the most part we're trained to know where we've come from, where we're
going, what the truth and meaning is behind every scene, but he
basically asks us to undo all that.  He's saying that all those
questions don't matter, that you simply treat each scene with the right
mood and ideas that it needs.  David guides you along, but he doesn't
tell you exactly what it is or what it means, so it's up to you to make
[those things] up.
Obviously this is a non-linear story and there are a few ways to
interpret it.  At first I asked a lot of questions, but he would just
smile quite smugly and pretend that he was trying to torture me, so I
pretty much learned early on to stop asking.  Now, he is very expressive
and communicative, but again, with not too much instruction.  While he
does have these ideas about how things should play, he's not attached to
them or fixated on them because that would leave him no opportunity for
new things to occur.  Mostly, I remember him using a lot of physical or
facial expressions, gesturing with his hands.  David's not someone who
needs to talk about stuff for a long time at all.
Could Mulholland Drive be read as an allegory for the revolving door or
glass ceiling of young actresses in Hollywood?
Maybe but I feel that it's more about how complex we are as human
beings; that there is a full spectrum of black and white, pure and evil,
or darkness and light.  There's innocence and sexuality in all of us. 
It's not just about the gray somewhere in between, but we can experience
those two extreme emotions in one person.
Do you think Betty is Diane's alter ego?
For me, Diane is the reality-based character.  That is the truth of the
situation.  Things are so awful in her life, in this rock bottom place,
this horrid state of dementia, that she creates Betty as how she would
have liked it to have been.  Betty was optimistic and hopeful and pretty
and peppy and sweet and everyone loves her and she's in control of
Rita.  Rita doesn't know who she is and Betty loves this power and this
control she has over Rita.  So that's the wish, the dream, the fantasy,
the projection, whatever you want to call it.  It's the reverse when
we're talking about Diane and Carmela.
What spurs Diane to create this elaborate fantasy about Rita?
Because it's an unrequited love story.  Carmela is a movie star, she's
beautiful, a femme fatale, the directors are in love with her,
everyone's in love with her.  She's a powerful, strong woman.  Carmela
pulls her friend Diane into her life for a minute but then cuts her off
and stops reciprocating any friendship.  [That plunges] Diane into this
massive psychosis that she can't get out of, and then the worst happens.
It seemed as if Lynch was setting up a relationship in the "Betty" world
between you and Adam (the intense Hollywood movie director played by
Justin Theroux), but then that shifts into a relationship between you
and Rita.  Conversely, in the "Diane" world, Adam and Carmela wind up
together.  How do you think Adam figures into your relationships in
Mulholland Drive?
Adam is basically someone who pulls Carmela away from me.  Diane is a
narcissist, so she sees Adam in the "Betty" world [as being] in love
with her.  They have a moment.  And I think again because she's so in
awe of Carmela's life, she just represents everything that Diane wants
and doesn't have.  So she basically tries to change it all around. 
That's when she creates Justin's character, Adam, as being someone that
wants her, instead of Carmela.  I think it's just an obstacle in the way
of her love affair with Carmela.
During the "Betty" reality, can you describe what goes through Betty
when she's having her sexually charged (and quite disturbing) audition
scene with a much older actor?
This whole other character emerges.  It comes out of left field, but
we've had hints that Betty is not all that good and pretty and perky and
sweet and innocent.  There is going to be some kind of transformation,
and that's where we learn more about her.  We see her come alive and
undergo a change.  The way Betty is set up [in the beginning] seems
almost like a cardboard cutout.  I thought when I first read the script,
"Oh my God, it's so one-dimensional -- she should be on the side of a
cereal box in 1952!"  But there were moments of release, like when she
pulls the [substantial amount of] money out of Rita's purse you think,
"Is this person gonna call the police right now?  No."  You see the fear
register on her face but then there's an excitement, too.  Then we see
her in the audition scene, and it's the same thing.  We get a hint that
there's a whole other layer about to reveal itself.  Again, that's
Diane's projection of her complexities, and who she is and who she
wishes to be.  But then there's this whole other truth coming through.
Did your interpretation of the project change significantly when it was
decided that Mulholland Drive would not be a TV pilot or series but a
theatrical release?  The new scenes are quite unique and different.
I read the TV pilot after I saw the movie.
I know!  There are a few of you out there who managed to get hold of
it.  It's very crafty of you!  (laughs)  Well, David doesn't like to
delineate what was for TV and what was [new footage for] the film.  He
feels it takes away from the mystery.
Though obviously you know the answer to that, so I can't lie to you! 
Betty was set up in a different way for the TV series. but we knew that
she would change extraordinarily because she's a David Lynch character. 
We know he creates people that are incredibly complex and go through
some weird changes and an extreme spectrum of emotions.  Also, it would
have been a long road because a TV-series can last one, two, three,
four, possibly five years or longer.  I knew that it had to go in
different places, but when we got the new additional scenes there was
definitely new ways to interpret the whole thing as a finished feature
length.
Have you been going to any of the film festivals with the movie?
Are you curious about the audience's response?
Yeah, I am.  I'm really curious and there seems to be, knock-on-wood, a
lot of interest in this film and not just from the die-hard Lynch fans. 
It's probably because this was supposed to be a TV series and the
network said no to it.  There was a lot of press about it a long time
ago that sort of perpetuated itself.  Then there's that TV versus film
thing that [a few critics] are really capitalizing on.  Also, it's David
Lynch's next movie, and he did The Straight Story last, so there are
some who are really keen to know that he's back to his old stuff. 
Although I think The Straight Story is a great film and still very much
has the Lynchian stamp on it, some of his older fans preferred that
non-linear structure that he's used to doing.  So I'm really buzzed
about the things I've been hearing.  I just hope the public sees it.
I'd say the party line on this movie is to try and see it twice, if not
more because it's really an internal film, and intimate.  I know that
after having read it, shot it, and now to be speaking about it and
having seen it three times that the second or third time is best because
there are so many things going on.  Everyone I've spoken to, and a lot
of the journalists included, have said that the second viewing is where
it really comes together for them.  It's a movie where you need to use
your mind.  But having said that it shouldn't be too cerebral.  People
can have an incredibly visceral reaction where they don't quite know
what made them connect with the film, but it just happens.
I found Mulholland Drive tremendously emotional.  It hits on a more
primal level than a cerebral one, although you can certainly deconstruct
it afterwards.  I'm looking forward to seeing it a second time at the
New York Film Festival.  If you're curious to read the review, it's on
filmcritic.com.  There are two reviews.  My editor wrote the one on top
and I wrote the one on the bottom.  It might be interesting for you,
because we disagree somewhat.
We both liked the movie, but he had a more mixed reaction than I did. 
Close but no cigar.  I'm of the school that really loved The Straight
Story but was enormously happy to see David Lynch return to this
particular vein.  It was an interesting companion piece or extension of
a lot of his ideas over the years.
That's exactly it, actually.  There are a lot of comments that are made
or repeated from his other movies, and I don't think that repetition is
a bad thing.  It runs true for him, and he finds new meaning in the same
thing and I love that about him.
I think that's really true.  There are the same themes, but they keep
broadening every time.  It's a much fuller presentation.  I think it was
Jean Renoir who said the best filmmakers make the same movies over and
over again.
Oh really?  I'm gonna steal that line from you.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Amants criminels, Les (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/7572ca225fc21c928825692700053f91?OpenDocument
        She's a mouthy, demanding, bratty femme fatale who always wants her own
way. Her cuckold is a slightly goofy young fellow who hangs on her every
word and submissively goes along with whatever scheme she cooks up.
These are our unsympathetic heroes in Francois Ozon's latest exercise in
cinematic shock treatment, Criminal Lovers. 
        After a preliminary scene in bed where the girl, Alice (Natacha
Regnier, unrecognizable from The Dreamlife of Angels), mouths off to the
boy, Luc (Jeremie Renier), taking a photograph of his limp penis and
threatening to mail it to his mother, they commit a violent crime.
Without fully knowing their motive, our title characters meander into a
high school shower and stab their jock classmate Said (Salim
Kechiouche).
        Taking it's cue from the Coen Brothers' recently re-released Blood
Simple, they proceed to get rid of the body by wiping up the blood and
dragging the canvas wrapped body out into the middle of the woods to
bury it. Ozon dwells on their first major obstacle, fully observing how
difficult it is to rid themselves of the corpse.
        Thrillers should really grab you in the first fifteen minutes. It's the
crucial time where we meet the characters who you'll be following for
the duration of the film. The biggest problem with Criminal Lovers is
that Ozon has created two characters who are downright annoying to be
with for ninety minutes - she's completely obnoxious and rude to the
boy, berating him with every word. He's a simpering weakling who sulkily
takes it on the chin. They're nasty and dull, a poor combination. 
        Things heat up when they get lost in the woods. Before you can say
"modern retelling of Hansel and Gretel, they're kidnapped by a natty old
forest hick (creepy Miki Manojlovic) who locks them in the basement.
What follows are drawn out scenes of the wood ogre demanding that Luc
bathe him and have sex with him, just for starters. The worst, of
course, is yet to come. Why do you think he's fattening Luc up? What do
fairy tale ogres do to their victims?
Intercut with these relentless scenes of torture are flashbacks of high
school as Alice and Luc plan their murder. Far from illuminating the
crime, they make it trite because each twist involved in their scheme is
telegraphed so far in advance through the obvious dialogue that there's
no satisfaction in those elements of surprise. The viewer is forced to
sit and wait for the inevitable "moment of shock" where we see that
"everything is not what it seemed to be."
A good hour of the movie is devoted to the ogre and his child as they
spend time developing their sado-masochistic relationship while Alice
seethes in the basement demanding food. You quickly become used to the
wood ogre pushing Luc around, and soon realize that this is going to be
the movie. The youngsters aren't going to escape for several reels, so
we're treated to long takes of "wash my hairy back" or "my turn to wash
your back." Since Ozon so clearly wants to titillate and shock his
audience, the effect wears off as his well of continuous thrills runs
dry.
The grand finale is utterly ridiculous on every level, as Ozon winks and
nudges as the action takes place, asking the audience for a pat on the
back to acknowledge how clever he is to make fun of the lovers engaging
in their moment in the spotlight. With his numerous cutaways to animals
peeking in from the forest and the bright, shining music, you can almost
hear Ozon say, "Aren't I being so clever with my use of irony?" 
Pretentious schoolboy drivel. This is the type of movie which gives "art
house cinema" a bad name.
http://www.celluloid-dreams.com/f_c7.htm
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Sisters (1973)
        Throw some shots of a vaguely menacing fetus over the opening credits,
toss in a brash score by Bernard Hermann, and you're off and running. 
Is the baby gonna eat it's way out of the mother?  Is there going to be
some sort of killer baby run amok, a la some Larry Cohen flick, in Brian
De Palma's Sisters (now out on DVD)?  Nope.  False alarm.  This sequence
is pretty cool, but we don't have a mutant killer baby slashing up
victims -- that honor goes to Margot (Superman) Kidder.
        We start off with De Palma's favorite theme: voyeurism.  On a corny
television program called Peeping Toms, the candid camera guest, Philip
(likeable Lisle Wilson) has to choose whether or not to let a blind
woman know he's in her dressing room when she's changing clothes.  He
opts to be a gentleman and leave the room before she takes off her
brassiere.
        The audience rewards him with a free dinner at an African restaurant,
since he's a black guy.  It's a bold, politically incorrect move which
wouldn't be done nowadays.  Brian De Palma had previously satirized race
in Hi, Mom!, but he eschews that here in favor of Hitchcockian
trickery.  Philip goes out on a date with the blind woman, who was
really a French-Canadian model living on Staten Island, Danielle
(Kidder, natch).
        After a nice trip back to her apartment for some pre-AIDS casual sex,
our would-be hero Philip learns that Danielle has a twin and it's their
collective birthday.  He buys them a cake and brings it back to
Danielle's place.  Unfortunately for him, the deranged sister (also
Kidder) is waiting for him and she ain't interested in cutting the cake.
        The film, of course, is Psycho.  We follow a hero through the first
half of the story only to have him hastily dispatched.  Our Norman Bates
comes in the form of Danielle, maybe, since it's never clear whether
she's the psycho killer or it's her twin sister.
        Our focus shifts to a nosy reporter who lives next door (played by
brassy Jennifer Salt) who has witnessed the killing through her window. 
Whether this is an homage to Rear Window or outright theft is
debatable.  Of course, those lousy police won't lift a finger to help
her since she gave them some negative press.
        We have the obligatory and painfully unfunny scenes where she tries to
gets the cops to investigate, complete with "who's on first" dialogue
not five minutes after we've seen a gory on-screen slaying.  De Palma
was never one for maintaining an even tone in his films, shifting wildly
from sadistic violence to slapstick.  I'm sure he'd call it "playing the
audience like a piano," since he's been trying to be Alfred Hitchcock
ever since 1973.
        The character development is minimal, the situation so over-the-top as
to prove laughable.  Margot Kidder embarrasses herself with a va-va-voom
French accent, but not so much as Jennifer "Pay Attention To Me" Salt.
        De Palma's camerawork is fairly mundane, except when he goes for his
split screen parallel action bit as the cops are closing in and the body
is being disposed.  It feels like an episode from some bad sitcom.  I
gotta clean up this mess before dad gets home!  Uh-oh!  Here comes dad! 
I'll just hide around this corner!
        As for the surreal dream sequence which closes the film, involving
black and white cinematography and an explanation of how that bizarre
doctor (William Finley) who's been scampering around throughout the film
is involved with the sisters, well, this turns the movie into a carnival
freakshow, complete with the seedy feeling of being ripped off
afterwards.  The half-jokey tone of the eleventh hour revelation
probably didn't even play well back in 1973.  It sure doesn't work
today.
Director: Brian De Palma
Producer: Edward R. Pressman
Writer: Brian De Palma, Louisa Rose
Starring: Margot Kidder, Jennifer Salt, Charles Durning, William Finley,
Lisle Wilson
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
The dream resembles a TV-movie, and reality itself is fragmented and
torn.  David Lynch's Mulholland Drive is more than just a curiosity
piece expanded from a scrapped TV-pilot, though it uses the forms and
conventions of television to explore the increasingly addled fantasies
of a would-be starlet.  Those who found Lost Highway an audacious stunt,
transforming its protagonist into someone else at the midway point, will
be flummoxed by Lynch's askew storytelling methods here.  Not only do
the characters morph into deeper representations of their secret selves,
the entire schematic approach to the mini-series dissipates into an
altered state.  
To the tune of composer Angelo Badalamenti's wine-dark funereal
melodies, Lynch forages his way into the nocturnal avenues and
expressways of Los Angeles.  On Mulholland Drive, a beautiful,
raven-haired amnesiac (Laura Harring) staggers from the twisted wreckage
of a black limosine and makes her way through the night-shadowed
Hollywood Hills toward the beckoning city lights.  The sound of her high
heels is preternaturally loud as she evades impending pursuers, hiding
away in the tangled bushes surrounding a residential apartment complex.
The clear light of day brings no comfort.  Two men (Patrick Fischler and
Michael Cooke) in a coffee shop recount a nightmare about some strange,
shadowy figure that peers through walls and lurks behind the diner, a
controlling force that brings death.  To prove there's no such thing as
phantoms, the men investigate the neighboring alleyway and make a
startling discovery.
Arriving in L.A. for the first time is a bright-eyed innocent named
Betty (Naomi Watts), filled with naďve dreams of becoming a movie star. 
Temporarily staying at her aunt's opulent home at 1612 Havenhurst (a
Lynch preoccupation: showing us Where We Are), her first brush with
Hollywood may shatter those illusions.  Before this fledgling has a
chance to spread her wings, she finds a newfound friend and roommate in
the helpless amnesiac.  Drawn into the mystery of "Rita's" identity, the
two women attempt to uncover the truth.  Along the way, a savage
attraction blooms between them that could be the start of something
exquisite and hazardous.
To delve further into this labyrinth would be a disservice to any
audience open to forming their own subjective connections and analysis. 
Suffice to say, these subplots merge together, involving gangsters and
studio moguls, magicians and chanteuses, detectives and assassins, red
curtains and pinheaded villains, spare hotel rooms with hissing
radiators.  There are spontaneous bursts of violence (like when a film
director, played by intense, bespectacled Jason Theroux, smashes the
windows and headlights of a posh limo with his trusty golf club) and
sexual forays that might be described as subterranean.  Lynch's
preoccupations with noir's form and graphic design prove an ideal match
for the impassive, sparse cityscapes of the west coast.  "Welcome To Los
Angeles" is one of the first signs glimpsed in transit; it has rarely
felt so foreboding.  
Presuming that Mulholland Drive takes us deeper into fantasy is more
than shortsighted; it's a misnomer.  Inner feelings of sentiment and
dread directly affect the external images, remaining truthful to Lynch's
heartfelt observation of the world.  Setting aside logic, it's better to
consider the Lynchian mold as an emotional, musical tapestry, one that
filters into collective anxieties.  There's nothing obscure about the
question of self, an obstacle Betty and Rita both must confront. 
Romance and betrayal morph them into new roles.  Lingering underneath
the starlet might be a calculating rube, under the seemingly timid
amnesiac stirs an ever-ripening sensuality.
Sketched in muted colors and pervasive darkness by superb
cinematographer Peter Deming (who also lensed Lost Highway), the
standards of television rely on conventional medium-shots and close-ups
to fit the small screen.  Lynch makes advantageous use of those
unwritten rules, though he contorts them through his unusual camera
placements and penchant for lingering on obscure beats (who else would
linger on a cup of espresso during a confrontation scene, thereby making
the cup of espresso into a menacing artifact?)  As the characters merge
into something Other (or, alternately, become fully realized versions of
themselves), Deming's photography becomes more ragged and hyperreal,
accompanied by Mary Sweeney's serrated knife-edge editing technique of
shock cuts.  
Holding this bundle of nerve ends together are remarkable ensemble
performances from startling newcomers and established veterans:
legendary Amy Miller as a freakishly maternal hotel caretaker; Dan
Hedaya as a volcanic movie financier; Lafayette Montgomery as a
soft-spoken cowboy with murder in his eyes ("You'll see me one more time
if you're good.  You'll see me two more times if you're bad.").  The
real finds are Naomi Watts and Laura Harring, whose balancing act
recalls Shelley Duvall and Sissy Spacek in Robert Altman's Two Women. 
They're the lifeblood of Mulholland Drive, offering richly calibrated
incarnations of womanhood.  Watts and Haring are poised for triumphant
careers, two more reasons why Lynch and his collaborators have created a
masterpiece.  As they say in show business, this is where the magic
happens.
Director: David Lynch
Producer: Neal Edelstein, Joyce Eliason, Tony Krantz, Michael Polaire,
Alain Sarde, Mary Sweeney
Writer: David Lynch
Starring: Justin Theroux, Naomi Watts, Laura Harring, Ann Miller, Dan
Hedaya, Mark Pellegrino, Brian Beacock, Robert Forster
http://www.bacfilms.com/mulholland/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for States of Control (1998)
Michelangelo Antonioni's L'Avventura might have a hell of a time being
released in theaters today.  His trilogy of films starring the beautiful
actress Monica Vitti (expanded into a quartet if you include Red Desert)
contemplate the experience of a bored, frustrated woman in a heavily
industrialized society ruled by false ideals of consumerism and power. 
The end of the world was not an apocalyptic fire, but a deadening
malaise waking up in the dawn of the dead.  There's no exit, whittling
away the days with the distraction of fast food and shopping malls.
In 1960, L'Avventura was a box office smash despite its harsh critical
reception at Cannes, where frustrated critics misunderstood its
open-ended message for pure emptiness.  What they lacked the ability to
see was that very emptiness becoming the core message.  This can also be
said for Zack Winestine's challenging new film, States of Control, which
picks up right where Antonioni left off.  The times have changed, and
this heroine, Lisa (brilliantly played by Jennifer van Dyck, Series 7)
is not content to live a life of passive alienatation.  She's gonna blow
her superficial life apart and create something authentic and new, no
matter what the cost.
Lisa has fallen into routines, measuring out her days in teaspoons.  A
self-proclaimed failed novelist, she's stuck in a sheltered Manhattan
life coordinating mundane secretarial chores at an Off-Off-Broadway
Theater.  Her husband Abel (Stephen Bogardus, Love! Valour! Compassion!)
is an impotent bore who fails to challenge her sexually or
intellectually.  This is most notably felt in a funny-sad scene when he
attempts to tell an amusing anecdote about the "Great Chinese
Trombonists."  The gag falls flat, not achieving the desired response. 
The more they try to hold on to each other, the closer they come to
drowning.
Things quickly liven up.  Inspired by the anarchic musings of a jaded
theatre director (John Cunningham), Lisa performs a series of
experiments, some comical and others disturbing, to break through the
web of artificiality.  Her training consists of sleep deprivation,
sexual deviance, sampling pornography, smashing open a locked door with
her bare fist, and determining how long she can hold her finger in an
open light socket.  By pushing her body to the limit, she hopes to
achieve the ultimate transformation, whatever that is.
The coda of States of Control places Lisa on her own as the extraneous
parts of her life fade away, including her principles, her friends, even
her language.  Played entirely without dialogue, the climax is a
razor-edged adventure as Lisa embarks upon the final, explosive stage of
her growth.  Comparisons to the Unabomber abound, but Lisa's philosophy
comes closer to David Cronenberg's unsettling Videodrome mantra, "Long
live the New Flesh."
There's something borderline fascistic about Lisa's regime, made latent
in the fiercely dramatic sturm und drang of Richard Termini's classical
score, or the beautiful and startling images of clouds parting in the
sky.  Those mystical images of nature bring to mind Triumph of the Will
director Leni Reifenstahl, visually referenced throughout States of
Control.  Susan Starr's austere cinematography (in collaboration with
Winestine, an experienced director of photography himself) produces an
appropriately clinical God's Eye View, in the hollow valleys of New York
City skyscrapers or the cramped apartment space Lisa shares with Abel. 
Discomfort is the order of the day.
Anchored by a strong central performance by van Dyck, States of Control
is a hard, mercurial polemic that gets under the skin.  Winestine's
politically charged agenda sometimes gets the best of him in scenes that
seem more conceptual than dramatic.  Despite the occasionally academic
tone, there's no denying that Lisa's extremities cast an eerie spell.
Zack Winestine's formidable States of Control will not be for everyone,
but those who rise to the challenge can prepare themselves for a movie
rich with ideas in today's increasingly conservative marketplace. 
There's also a bleak humor in the lengths to which Lisa goes to achieve
her vision -- I mean, who wouldn't laugh at the notion of blowing shit
up and spending the rest of your life living in a cave?  Yeah, it's all
funny games until the rationality kicks in: something just broke.
Director: Zack Winestine 
Producers: Priscilla Guastavino, Joanne Pawlowski, Matt Janes
Writer: Zack Winestine 
Starring: Jennifer van Dyck, John Cunningham, Stephen Bogardus, Ellen
Greene
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Turn It Up (2000)
How would you like to be elected king for a day?  The enormously
talented Ice Cube paved the way for chart-topping rap stars to become
media moguls, running his own music and film production company.  His
explosive talent and shrewd business sense made his success look easy. 
Wow!  Anyone can do this!  The market soon became flooded with rap
artists vying for movie stardom, not to mention creative control.  Most
of the stories revolve around familiar "urban gangsta" elements such as
tough-talking badasses with flashy threads, fast cars, nickel-plated
revolvers and beautiful hoochie-mamas.  In sum, well-photographed vanity
projects that make the stars feel cool.
Case in point: international sensation Pras co-produced and stars in
Turn It Up.  It's about, what else, a young man's struggle to escape his
life of crime.  Redemption is the order of the day.  Diamond (Pras) is a
talented hip-hop performer who harbors big dreams of cutting his own
record, but can't afford the inflated costs of studio time.  His
mercurial loose cannon of a best friend, Gage (Billboard chart-topper Ja
Rule), wants to lend a helping hand, stealing $10,000 from an ill-fated
drug runner.  Unfortunately, the money financing Diamond's career
belongs to a vicious British gangster (Jason Stratham, Snatch, good even
when he's coasting) who suddenly takes an interest in stealing the
rights to Diamond's record.  Things sure are heating up around here.
Just in case we get bored with itemized record deal negotiations, there
are a few back alley drug deals that go sour.  Ha!  Are there any other
kind?  Messrs. Pras and Rule are given ample opportunity to pop off
several rounds of ammo in dramatic slow motion.  John Woo's
"two-guns-at-once" are combined with Quentin Tarantino's
"point-the-gun-diagonally," since those techniques seemed to work well
in other, better films.  There's plenty of shattering glass -- can't
have a shootout without some shattering glass!  The rhythm and pacing
resemble a lazy and inconsiderate lover, unimaginatively going through
the motions.
Lest all this gunplay reinforce a negative image of the black community,
there's an after-school special subplot involving Diamond's girlfriend
(Tamala Jones).  She's pregnant.  Will Diamond accept the responsibility
of being a father, or choose to pursue his music career?  On cue, his
long-lost pop (Vondie Curtis-Hall, Eve's Bayou) shows up with sage
advice: Do the right thing, son.
During the dramatic "brother's keeper" scenes between Pras and Ja Rule,
Manhattan's skyline looms in the distance.  It's all about having a
spectacular background, no?  The two leads carry on with self-conscious
intensity, performing as expected.  They can't act, but they have
charisma to burn with obligatory thousand yard stares and solemn
affirmations of loyalty and respect.  These rap sensations only come
alive during their one live performance midway through Turn It Up,
finally living up to the title as they bust their moves in a club (or is
it an abandoned aircraft hangar -- all the better for a tie-in music
video).
Turn It Up isn't a bad film, content to be merely sluggish and generic. 
Projects like this don't feel scripted -- they're packaged, complete
with a hot soundtrack.  I'll bet it made for a swell looking deal memo. 
If anything is to be learned from Ice Cube's success, it is not that rap
stars make bankable pictures.  Cube brought his own distinct, original
voice to Friday and The Player's Club, stories only indirectly related
to the hood.  He has an ear for vivid dialogue and seems carefully
selective of his cast and crew.  To date, he's been the only filmmaker
smart enough to place the explosive comic Bernie Mac (The Original Kings
of Comedy) in a lead role.
Audiences have responded to Ice Cube's material over his contemporaries
because he takes calculated risks.  The result is something fresh and
new, and the masses thrive on fresh and new when the studios quake in
fear at the thought of pushing the envelope.  (Even when those films
make tons of money -- I cite The Matrix and The Silence of the Lambs as
world heavyweight champions of this theory.)  Turn It Up never aspires
to be more than an excuse for Pras and Ja Rule to flash their
ultra-sleek MTV fashions for 90 minutes.  With trends seemingly changing
every week, the public is fickle.  It's a safe bet there's another urban
hip-hop drama being hustled through production even as you read this
review.  Watch out, Pras - your 15 minutes are almost up.
http://www.turnitupmovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sous le sable (2000)
François Ozon has been busy the last couple of years dickering around
with the crude sensationalism of Sitcom and Criminal Lovers, films that
resemble biting the heads off chickens.  This talented young auteur
offers a welcome change of pace from this recent spate of puerile
shock-value thrillers with the restrained, quietly haunting character
study, Under the Sand.  Ozon's latest feature returns to the quietly
haunting rigor of his first international success, See the Sea:
disturbing, minimalist, perceptive.
Much of the tension in Ozon's best work remains unspoken, or
deliberately unexplained.  In that spirit, he concocts a delicious
mystery in the extended opening sequence as middle aged professor Marie
Drillon (Charlotte Rampling, superb as ever) enjoys an annual summer
vacation to the south of France with her husband of 25 years, Jean
(giant teddy bear Bruno Cremer).  They seem a happy couple, comfortable
in their silences as they go about the routines of putting their chateau
in order, cooking meals, sunbathing on the beach.  Jean goes for a swim
one day, but to Marie's shock, he never comes back.
What became of her husband?  Did he accidentally get caught in an
undertow and drown, or was it suicide?  Or perhaps he never told her how
much he hated her, and just ran away to begin a new life?  Rather than
deal with these questions, Marie returns to her ordinary habits.  Her
friends become increasingly concerned when, six months later, she still
carries on as if Jean remains a part of her life.  With no proof that
he's gone forever, she's happy to delude herself.  Her relations and
colleagues attempt to ignore this unusual behavior, even attempting to
set her up with a new beau (sheepish character actor Jacques Nolot, from
Nenette and Boni).  How long can she go on pretending, and what will she
do if Jean is ever found?
Interesting roles for middle-aged women are hard to come by.  Charlotte
Rampling has been blessed this year to appear as virile, sexually
attractive older women in this formidable performance as well as in
Jonathan Nossiter's intriguing Signs and Wonders.  Marie is not a
particularly wonderful person -- she takes her husband for granted and
treats her would-be lover like dog shit.  But she's smart, graceful,
fiercely independent -- and though she's gone a bit too far consoling
herself in ghostly dreams, Rampling invests her choices with dignity.
The opening scenes bear a passing resemblance to the striking Dutch
psycho-drama The Vanishing, but Ozon quickly slows things down for a
meditative, observational character study that fills the 95 minute
running time.  This is slow, heady stuff that a mainstream audience
might find tedious, but Ozon wisely eschews the obtuse art house
pretensions of Krzyzstof Kieslowski's Blue (another study in mourning). 
Ozon may not always reveal every piece of information, but he keeps his
narrative clear and precise.  At least we know what's being cropped out
of the picture.
Ozon depends heavily on Rampling's performance, which carries him
through sections of Under the Sand that feel overly repetitive.  For all
his talents, he remains more comfortable with the short film format,
struggling to fill the running time of a feature length story.  Still,
if Under the Sand is any indication, Ozon is gaining confidence with his
low-key parables of cinematic dread.  We're looking forward to seeing
where this enfant terrible goes next.  Those crazy French...
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Intimacy (2000)
The uncompromising nudity bared throughout Petrice Chereau's Intimacy
has already garnered much notoriety, but it's in the naked faces of
fearless actors Mark Rylance (Angels & Insects) and Kerry Fox (Welcome
To Sarajevo) that the tender ache of emotional resonance is discovered. 
With sharp, intelligent eyes that reflect experience and maturity,
Rylance and Fox are refreshingly detached from the false glamour of
Hollywood idols.  Their sex scenes together are bracing in their raw
honesty, in the acceptance of flesh and messiness.  Less apparent, but
no less remarkable, are the astute observations of behavior revealed
through those carnal beats of haste and hesitance, often without a
single line of dialogue.
Not aiming for the spiritual poetry of In the Realm of the Senses or the
philosophical transgressions of Crash, Chereau keeps his sexual odyssey
firmly grounded in terms of straightforward character development.  That
may be the very reason why Intimacy seems unerringly impressive but
never particularly significant on more than a tactile, sensory level. 
The themes of human isolation are barren and obvious, a science project
devoid of any especially groundbreaking hypothesis.  Intimacy does
manage to stand out from lesser portraits of "human interconnectedness"
and Pinter-esque rummages through psychological dirty drawers (okay,
kill me).   Shallow though it might sound, it's amazing how much is
filled in through an inspired cast, perceptive camerawork, and
imaginative ways of treating the love scene.  Those ingredients are too
assured and confident to merely dismiss as icing on the cake, especially
since they are the substance of the cake itself.
Adapted from a pair of short stories by British novelist Hanif Kureishi,
Intimacy weaves desperate lovemaking between two strangers in London. 
Every Wednesday, Jay (Rylance) and Claire (Fox) meet in his cluttered,
dank apartment for an hour or two of sexual release from their
uninspired lives.  He's been head bartender at a posh restaurant for
over six years.  She's a mystery to him but her glum workaday appearance
reveals a similar dissatisfaction.  They're both married, but his
relationship has curdled into an embittered separation.  As the weeks
draw on, Jay obsessively takes it upon himself to uncover Claire's
personal routines.  In his attempt to gain a fuller semblance of who she
is, he opens wounds that hadn't existed before by single-handedly
corrupting the fantasy.  If it weren't for a few unnecessary subplots
involving Jay's brother and his bevy of disgruntled co-workers, this
minimalist premise might be described as a modern fable on the perils of
wish fulfillment.
Chareau's restless camera (once again wielded by superb and
ever-attentive cinematographer Eric Gautier) is less appropriate here
than in his family transit-oriented Those Who Love Me Can Take the
Train.  The scenes that linger are the still ones where Rylance and Fox
separately, pensively attempt to carry on with their makeshift household
routines.  These are often captured in lingering, unblinking wide shots
that view them stranded amidst their drab workplaces and homes. 
Separation proves haunting in a melancholy series of intercut shots as
Rylance and Fox undress on opposite sides of the room, crawling across
the floor to meet in the center.  Despite being as restless as a fly
during the hyperactive restaurant scenes (all the better to blend in
with a hustling crowd of gabby trendsetters), you'd be hard pressed to
find a single uninteresting image.  Intimacy takes an interest in its
sordid world of the lower-middle class, with lonely pubs and busy
shopping streets -- it also understands the people who inhabit those
spaces, viewing them with sympathy scraped raw.
An evaluation would be incomplete without highlighting the great Timothy
Spall (the robust scene-stealer of many a Mike Leigh collaboration).  As
Claire's cuckolded husband, this jocular heavyweight plays out his
handful of bitter pill scenes with the unforced menace and self-effacing
embarrassment of his imposing bulk.  Bangs in his eyes, his mouth
forming into quizzical pouts and dry smirks, he may seem the fool in his
barroom encounters opposite a sarcastic, gleaming Mark Rylance (whose
Jay has arrived on the scene looking to stir up some trouble), but Spall
is no one to trifle with.  His overreaching Best Pal demeanor suggests a
mind abuzz with secret passageways of guile, his pointed questions only
naďve if you choose not to read into their crafty insinuations.  In his
unassuming way, Spall's carefully etched interpretation of hostility
buried under a mountain of surface propriety may become one of the most
criminally underappreciated performances of the year, but maybe also one
of the best.  He's that good.
Director: Patrice Chereau
Producer: Jacques Hinstin, Patrick Cassavetti
Writer: Patrice Chereau, Anne-Louise Trividic
Starring: Mark Rylance, Kerry Fox, Timothy Spall, Marianne Faithful
http://www.bacfilms.com/intimite/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Temps retrouvé, Le (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/d7cc03e1b789d91b882568ff000f6c7d?OpenDocument
 A literal adaptation of the final book of Marcel Proust's Remembrances
of Things Past would be inconceivable and boring, since the tastes and
smells which reveal layers of memory cannot be captured onscreen. Raoul
Ruiz's Time Regained does the next best thing. Ruiz weaves a fragmented,
experimental narrative in the form of a tapestry. There's an uncanny
beauty achieved by telling his story in this manner, which reveals
thoughts and inactions by using the very limitations of the film medium.
He presents us with a series of photographs, or images shot into mirrors
or through doorways which open up to the past and present (and cross-cut
between the two with relative ease.)
 Taking place within the huge estates and manor houses of the cultural
elite, with string quartets playing in their studies and tiny cakes
neatly arranged on trays in their kitchens, our main character, Marcel
(Marcelo Mazzarello) wanders through this world drinking it in. The plot
is inconsequential, it is more about observing the crowded rooms and
bitten back emotions, the sips of wine and soft handshakes. Every now
and then, Marcel is forced to confront his decadent relatives
(sneeringly funny John Malkovich and sour Pascal Greggory.)
 Ruiz cleverly stages a prologue with the elder Proust (Andre Engel,
voiced by filmmaker Patrice Chereau) wasting away in his bedroom, the
best years of his life behind him, reciting passages from his book to
his servant girl and allowing the objects in the room to trigger
thoughts about his family, his would-be lovers (particularly Odette, the
woman who haunts him his entire life, played by the elegant Catherine
Deneuve) and loved ones, his enemies and his false friends.
 Ruiz is a master at keeping his themes and meaning palatable and
comprehensible even when shifting from the main character's childhood to
middle age, or having the child and adult version of the protagonist
onscreen at the same time. It doesn't feel pretentious, since Ruiz
clearly has a sincere fondness for this main character. The stand-in for
Marcel Proust, Mazzarello, doesn't emote very much as he wanders
aimlessly through the elegant locations, but he has deep and friendly
eyes and a sad smile half hidden under his moustache.
 Marcel finds himself jumping back and forth in these memories, and one
starts to wonder how much he has romanticized that past? He may be
remarkably similar to the stuffed shirts who surround him, sitting in
their circles, smoking cigars and wondering who's who in terms of
reputation and their place in the ladder of class structure. Ultimately,
those things don't matter, and fade away. In the film's best scene, we
see his half mad colleague and former nemesis, Charlus (Malkovich) lead
him through the park as they discuss their old friends. `How is this
one? Mort. How is that one? Mort.' In the dialogue within this
exchange,. Proust's philosophy is revealed. Things fade away, and all we
have is this small, precious present moment in time  everything else
passes into dust.
 It's a difficult film to catch hold of, and demands enormous patience
and a willingness to allow yourself the ability to drink in this film,
as though it were some very rich cake to be savored. It demands to be
eaten slowly, and to slowly fill you up. It's not for every occasion,
though, or for every audience. Those unwilling to submit to a slow
paced, metaphysical project may quickly grow frustrated with this item,
but if you allow it to be an interactive experience, you may well
consider memories of your own through the process of watching  and
that's worth more than any film could offer.
Director: Raul Ruiz
Producer: Paulo Branco
Writer: Raul Ruiz, Gilles Taurand
Starring: Catherine Deneuve, Emmanuelle Beart, John Malkovich, Vincent
Perez, Pascal Greggory, Marcelo Mazzarello, Alain Robbe-Grillet, Patrice
Chereau
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Diamond Men (2000)
Last year, Ned Beatty was given tribute by writer-director Tom Gilroy in
Spring Forward, inhabiting a beautifully written role as a weathered
park ranger.  Another true actor's actor, Robert Forster, is given his
full measure as aging diamond salesman Eddie Miller in Diamond Men. 
Forster, best known to younger audiences as laconic bail bondsman Max
Cherry in Quentin Tarantino's Jackie Brown, has quite a history behind
him.  His underappreciated body of work includes a hardcore television
journalist in Haskell Wexler's masterpiece, Medium Cool (1969), and his
debut as a quiet soldier who becomes the object of Marlon Brando's
desire in John Huston's complex Reflections in a Golden Eye (1967).
With Diamond Men, Forster effortlessly becomes one with his
surroundings.  Carrying a "live line" of diamonds (in a black briefcase)
on the road as he travels from one small-town business to another in
rural Pennsylvania, he's familiar with dingy coffee shops and cheap,
out-of-the-way motels, comfortable with the interior of his Lincoln Town
Car and his predetermined routine.  He's an older man with a heart
condition, 30 years peddling his wares, but Forster doesn't choose to
arouse pathos in this tightly wound curmudgeon.  Eddie's personality is
best described as an undisclosed poker hand: quiet, inconspicuous,
intense.  With his tough, wrinkled face and world-weary disposition,
Forster creates one of his most memorable characterizations and
writer-director Daniel M. Cohen wisely uses him to carry the movie. 
He's in almost every scene, and Diamond Men is graced by that weighty
presence.  (The other main character is Eddie's world of highways and
hotel rooms, photographed with unobtrusive sensitivity by John Huneck.)
Cohen finds an understated, assured tone of realism right from the
opening scene, where Forster collapses in a parking lot.  Eddie's a
professional who handles his work with the ease drawn from years of
experience, but after his recent heart problems he's no longer
considered "insurable" to carry a million-dollar line of jewels unless
he brings along his hotheaded young replacement, Bobby Walker (former
New Kid on the Block Donnie Wahlberg, a fine actor).  How is Eddie
supposed to train this kid?  Bobby can barely sit still for a minute,
rattles off at the mouth with a stream of obnoxious anecdotes recounting
sexual conquests, and is evidently more interested in getting laid than
studying the art of Eddie's trade.
Things don't look so good for this particular odd couple.  It's one of
those convenient pairings of opposites that defines so many movies. 
Diamond Men depends on strong performances and assured writing to pull
it off.  As a writer, Cohen brings firsthand experience of the diamond
business, emerging from three generations of roadside salesmen.  He
makes astute use of locations, particularly the seedy backwoods massage
parlor known as the Altoona Riding Club, where frumpy masseuses are
known to dole out special favors for the right price.  Bobby is able to
drag his new pal Eddie to this borderline house of ill-repute after some
tentative bonding, where the older salesman's self-imposed walls are
gradually broken down, opening him up to new experiences he'd never
dreamed of.  The scenes at this makeshift brothel feel emotionally
honest, both in Eddie's embarrassed resignation to undressing and the
women's unfocused, workaday attitude to strange men from The Road.
There's a threat of danger from some young hoods that catch wise to
Eddie's live load of diamonds.  It's a plot point that has destroyed
other independent films: L.I.E. suffers from a climax of violence after
developing an unforced, discreet relationship between the child molester
and his young prey; Ulee's Gold loses interest in developing Peter
Fonda's rich beekeeper characterization by tossing in a clumsy robbery. 
Diamond Men almost falls into the same trap, touching on this pedestrian
subplot and almost running off the rails with the threat of violence. 
Cohen thankfully doesn't stray too far from his character-driven story,
using the robbery device to unfurl his true climax, one that tests the
values Eddie Miller has stood behind for years.  Less Quentin Tarantino
than Arthur Miller, Eddie is asked to face up to his own life, something
that might never have happened if fast-talking Bobby hadn't drawn him
out of his shell.  The potential robbery doesn't figure in as the
climax; Diamond Men has larger, more personalized issues at stake.  The
finale proves as elusive as it is satisfactory.
Like Spring Forward, Daniel M. Cohen has created what might be
considered a "small" movie about everyday characters taking cautious
steps toward (or away from) wisdom.  It's lightweight, if the discovery
of friendship can be considered "lightweight," but there's a place for
movies that exist in much the same manner as the quaint corner store in
an emerging (or dying) town.  You'd rather go there than the shopping
mall, if only for the character and personality.  Diamond Men is small,
but certainly assured.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Bamboozled (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/9b02e0ffef6351c6882569700006b436?OpenDocument
        Welcome to a piece of American history.  In the old music hall, white
comedians and song 'n' dance men would splash their faces in charcoal,
maybe throw on a pair of white gloves, then go through the
step-n-fetchin' routine, the exotica and the buffoonery of perceived
black culture.  Jim Crow, Amos 'n' Andy, Mammy, L'il Black Sambo, Uncle
Tom, and the Ten Pickaninnies were typical characters thrown on stage
and screen for the amusement and mockery of white audiences.
        What began as white actors in blackface evolved with the 1950s Amos and
Andy Show on television, featuring black actors in blackface.  The
content remained the same, with Amos and Andy portrayed as lazy,
ignorant, chicken eatin', banjo playin', shifty clowns.  Once the show
lost favor with an outraged public, the television studios put a halt on
developing new shows about the black experience -- degrading or
otherwise -- for several decades.
        Spike Lee's Bamboozled works as angry satire, asking that we not forget
the offensive and disturbing corners of our history.
        Pierre Delacroix (Damon Wayans) is the one black writer working for the
CNS television studio. The ratings are plummeting, so an Ebonics-talking
hotshot producer named Dunwitty (Michael Rapaport) turns to his
Ivy-League educated black stooge and demands a new urban themed show
with a fresh new hook.  "You can do it, my nigga!" Dunwitty beams, "and
I can call you my nigga because my wife is black and I got two
interracial babies at home."
        Delacroix has cooked up dozens of ideas for sitcoms and dramas
involving black characters, all of which have been rejected as old hat. 
Thinking he can beat the television industry at its own game, he comes
up with the most offensive, disgusting, horrible idea he could possibly
imagine: a revival of the minstrel show featuring black actors in
blackface.  His mission is to get fired immediately, the only way to
break his contract.
        Well, surprise, surprise!  Dunwitty claims to have a boner for the
idea, so they immediately go into production.  Delacroix and his
assistant, Sloan (Jada Pinkett Smith) are suddenly in over their heads,
faced with a choice to either go with the flow and ride on the magic
carpet of their success or realize the consequences of their actions and
do something to combat the blatant racism of this program.
        The premise of Spike Lee's film is undoubtedly strong, with a promising
first act that keeps the stakes very high.  Immediately, however, some
of the warning signs start to show, such as his one-dimensional
depiction of Delacroix, the whitest black man on the planet, and the
conflicted Sloan, whose character changes in such radical leaps and
bounds that we again realize, no matter how well-performed the role is
by Pinkett Smith, Spike Lee could not write a fully developed woman
character to save his life.
        If the opening of the movie is good enough to carry us through some of
its unsubtleties, Spike Lee really hits his stride with the televised
mistrel show.  Inspired by the vaudeville routines, performers "Mantan"
(Savion Glover) and "Sleep 'n' Eat" (the superb Tommy Davidson) dress in
gaudy costumes, don the white gloves and charcoal make-up, fire engine
red lips, and googly eyes, and they follow the gawky movements of
stereotypical blackface characters.
        No punches are pulled.  We see scenes where the two goofballs sneak
into the chicken coop for some good eatin' while massah prowls outside
with his shotgun.  The scene has been set in Massah's watermelon patch,
where the darkies dance their troubles away.
        Purely offensive and disturbing, Spike Lee's accurate recreations of
these programs are heightened by montage footage of the actual minstrel
shows of America's past.  This black and white footage haunts the
present day situations of actors Manray (Glover) and Womack (Davidson),
including those painful scenes where they sit in front of a mirror,
melting cork into black paste, swabbing their skin in cocoa butter to
prevent burning and smearing red lipstick on their mouths.
        For quite a while, Bamboozled works as brilliant satire.  Even if the
offstage antics of Manray, basking in his newfound fame, and Womack,
bitter at his own exploitation, feel fairly obvious as dramatic
archetypes, Lee's situation is strong enough to carry it through.
        However, in the middle of the second act, Spike Lee hurls his entire
movie over the cliff with some obvious dramatic tactics.  We're treated
to scenes which we knew were coming, such as the inevitable lecturing of
Delacroix by his mother, who is ashamed of him.  Of course, Sloan
figures into a predictable would-be love triangle between Delacroix and
Manray. (After all, what are women characters good for?)
        As with almost every film he's made, Spike Lee clutters up his movie
with distracting subplots such as obvious, pontificating potshots at the
Wu-Tang Clan, Tommy Hilfiger's clothing line, O.J. Simpson's trial, and
violence in the media.
        His unforgivable last fifteen minutes feature a kidnapping, violence
and bloodshed which are as ridiculous and contrived as they are
out-of-character and so concerned with making a "point" that it betrays
no less than three of the major characters in his scenario (especially
the main female character, who sinks to a great low without any
foreshadowing.)
        It nearly destroys the movie, and certainly tarnishes the conclusion.
Spike Lee again comes up with seemingly five different endings while
wrapping the movie up, and is content to include each and every one of
them.
        That said, no other filmmaker is tackling this subject matter today. 
Spike Lee may be pompous and arrogant, create one-sided arguments, and
go for unsubtle choices, but he's also a master of visual allegory, he
creates vivid and colorful dialogue, and he arouses passion in his
audience.  Bamboozled, for all its numerous and frustrating flaws, is
important viewing.  It's a film which says, in no uncertain terms, that
there are some things we must not forget.
Director: Spike Lee
Producer: Jon Kilik, Spike Lee
Writer: Spike Lee
Starring: Damon Wayans, Savion Glover, Jada Pinkett Smith, Tommy
Davidson, Michael Rapaport, Paul Mooney
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Ceux qui m'aiment prendront le train (1998)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/f276090834325062882568f000095244?OpenDocument
The family, friends and lovers all rush to make it to the train. We're
thrown into a whirlwind of over a dozen characters all clamoring to get
on board, and we soon learn that they are en route to the funeral of the
mercurial painter, Jean-Baptiste. This man was a fixture in their lives
 a hostile cad with a miserable sense of humor who kept them attached
through sex, his vitality for life and encouragement to keep moving
forward, whether he meant it or not.
In a boldly theatrical touch, Jean-Baptiste demanded that those
gathering to pay their last respects must make a journey by train to his
final resting place in Limoges, knowing full well that the damage he has
done within their lives will come to a passionate, tumultuous head. As
if to mock them, his body is being transported in a small white car
driven on the road alongside the tracks.
Directed by Patrice Chereau, who seems to bring passion and vitality to
any film he touches (his previous film was Queen Margot), you have to
settle into his new film as though diving into the middle of a stormy
sea. The main characters gradually emerge, and as they begin to talk
about their loves, hopes, wants and needs, we quickly see that Those Who
Love Me Can Take the Train will be a microcosmos of restrained but grand
emotion.
The desire to be loved and the fear of death and humiliation are the
elements of classical drama, handled as familial revelations in this
movie. If it bears a passing similarity to The Celebration, it's only
those notions handled with a fresh and engaging eye. Chereau makes the
lonely waiting areas of railway stations and the expanses of graveyards
into the emotional battlegrounds of a John Ford western. There are no
guns here, though  these characters don't need them. Words will
suffice.
Jean-Baptiste is given a misanthropic run for his money in the form of
Francois, whose prevailing attitude toward relationships is summed up as
follows: "Loving people means putting up with their shit."
Unfortunately, the dead artist has the last laugh by placing Francois'
current dejected lover (Bruno Todeschini) on the same train as his
previous one, Bruno (young Sylvain Jacques). Bruno still hates Francois,
who deserted him upon learning that he (Bruno) was HIV positive.
Other potentially melodramatic subplots follow suit, including the
tormented relationship between recovering drug addicts Claire (Valéria
Bruni-Tedeschi) and Jean-Marie (Charles Berling), who Jean-Baptiste
played off of each other during the ten years of their marriage. Claire
and Jean-Marie can barely speak to each other without erupting into
horrible torrents of rage and fists.
Chereau plays out his scenes naturally, avoiding any trace of narrative
exposition in his screenplay. He allows scenes to play out without
turning into an overglorified soap opera. He also handles the gay and
straight characters without the fanfare of American films, simply
allowing them to be who they are.
Underscored by surprising doses of pop music (including Bjork and the
Doors), it feels surprisingly free of the self imposed confines of `art
house cinema'.  It has more in common with the feeling of watching
Breathless for the first time, a tingling excitement of seeing something
fresh and new.
Pascal Greggory lends intensity and a bitten back humanity to the role
of Francois. The legendary Jean-Louis Trintignant, best known to modern
audiences as the judge from Red, plays Jean-Baptiste's kind hearted
brother who has a surprisingly tender moment showing large women's shoes
to his transsexual friend, Viviane (Vincent Perez, a long way from The
Crow: City of Angels).
The film thankfully never allows itself to wallow in dramatic moments,
making each of them fleeting. The camera is quick to move among the
characters and spread its interest in everything happening around it. By
the time we have arrived at the beautiful final shots sweeping across
highways, fields, cemeteries and houses, we feel a sense of
interconnected lives which have touched each other, and are now drifting
far apart, perhaps a little wiser.
Director: Patrice Chereau
Producer: Charles Gassot
Writer: Patrice Chereau, Daniele Thompson, Pierre Trividic
Starring: Pascal Greggory, Valeria Bruni Tedeschi, Charles Berling,
Jean-Louis Trintignant, Vincent Prez, Bruno Todeschini
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for This Is Not an Exit: The Fictional World of Bret Easton Ellis (2000)
"My problem was being a young man with money in Manhattan," says Bret
Easton Ellis, citing his inspiration for American Psycho.  When it comes
to vivid fantasies of alienated urban narcissism, his prose strikes a
chilling, edgy chord.  Like skimming the surface of an icy lake, we are
left imagining the dark depths below.
Hey, that really sounds poetic!  I'm gonna have another Valium before
writing the rest of this review -- maybe someday I'll be as glib as
Ellis!
Just kidding.  I've actually enjoyed reading Ellis' novels of passive
emptiness.  Less Than Zero is the perfect book for road trips,
especially when you look out the window having thoughts that resemble
the shallow characters.  "Ah, yes, adolescence truly is a volatile
mystery!"
Having said that, Ellis prose typically comes off as, well, boring,
glib, pseudo-intellectual, snooty, irritating, and shallow when read
aloud.  Try reading passages to your friends.  Watch them lose interest
in you as a human being.  Don't scoff!  If you were in their shoes, you
would, too!  Heck, you probably will if you attempt to sit through
Gerald Fox's unintentionally grating documentary, This is Not an Exit:
The Fictional World of Bret Easton Ellis.
Fox tries to pull off the imaginative conceit of crossing interview
footage of Ellis with dramatizations from his body of work, including
Less Than Zero and his recent perils-of-celebrity bestseller,
Glamorama.  It's like a kaleidoscope of short films with additional
commentary from the novelist.  Unfortunately for Ellis, he's so smug,
creepy, and annoying that he does his novels a disservice by appearing
onscreen.  Potential readers will take one look at this privileged brat
and understandably vow never to read him.
I haven't even started discussing Ellis' whiny friends, hogging for
screen time as they take a limo cruise through New York City searching
for the perfect restaurant.  It's scary that his unimaginative fictional
characters bear such a scary resemblance to his actual peers.  When one
of them compares him to Orson Welles ("cuz you're a big genius, Bret!"),
I wanted to slap that pompous grin off his mug.
Okay, maybe I'm jealous that I don't have Ellis' problems.  Beautiful
friends, a fat wallet, the inability to see through my own vapidity. 
Maybe I'm being too hard on the guy.  Gotta calm my nerves before I
finish this review.  Pass the cocaine.
A bottom-of-the-barrel budget doesn't help illuminate the scenes lifted
from Ellis' novels.  Rough, jarring cuts and washed out cinematography
are completely inappropriate for the polished world his characters
inhabit.  The bland white walls and inept lighting could have been
easily better-realized by inexperienced first year film students.
The poorly staged Ellis stories serve as a reminder of how right Mary
Harron's instincts were on American Psycho.  By dwelling on impeccable
art design, tailored suits, embossed business cards and designer
glasses, she found the precise visual counterpart to Ellis'
hyper-detailed take on consumer culture.
Bored, introverted characters with zero empathy can be compelling on the
page, but it doesn't always translate to the screen.  Christian Bale's
mannered performance as Psycho's killer Patrick Bateman was
appropriately deadpan.  Would that Declan Thurman (Uma's brother) showed
such restraint filling the same role in Exit.  He blows line readings
with a distracting assortment of eyebrow and lip twitches.  See, I'm
really crazy!  There's nothing hammy about Ellis' sparse writing style,
so why can't Thurman resist maniacal laughter when describing a girl's
head on a stick?
By discussing the "meaning" of his books, Ellis only winds up reducing
them to facile morality lessons.  He also eats up screen time defending
his prose from vicious critics, often protesting far too much for
comfort.  I don't hate women! American Psycho is a feminist tract!  Less
Than Zero was not autobiographical!  It's a sensationalized version of
my post-college years.
This vain little man seems to care an awful lot about what people think
of him.  Oh, go ahead!  Try telling him that and he'll retreat back into
a banal shell of doublespeak.  As one critic points out, it's almost
impossible to discuss Ellis' flaws without him embracing them as part of
his integrity.  Of course it's shallow, of course it's nihilistic! 
That's the world he created.  See how slippery he is?
What was that great Bill Murray quote from Rushmore?  "Money can buy a
lot of things, but it can't buy you backbone.  Take dead aim at the rich
kids!"  I don't think I ever truly appreciated that slice of wisdom
until Ellis got in my face.  Hey Bret: here's a quarter.  Go call
someone who cares.  And pass the amphetamines.  Fast.  You're losing me.
Director: Gerald Fox
Producers: Julian Ozanne
Writer: Bret Easton Ellis
Starring: Bret Easton Ellis, Declan Thurman, Rachel Weisz, Jason
Bushman, Paul Blackthorne, Jay McInerney
http://www.firstrunfeatures.com/vid/exit.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Une liaison pornographique (1999)
My first thought was, "Oh God, another one of those pretentious foreign
art house sex films."  The opening shot features one of those busy
Parisian streets, the locals hustling by in a blur of slow motion.  This
city tells a thousand stories, my friends, and An Affair of Love is one
of them.
As if to add insult to injury, our first actual scenes are of the woman
(Nathalie Baye, Day For Night) and man (Sergi López) after the affair,
being interviewed by some off-screen voice.  It's very When Harry Met
Sally, only with the added layer of being French lovers talking about
their passionate encounters.  Hoo boy, this is gonna be a long road,
isn't it?
We learn that the woman placed an ad in a magazine.  Of all the
potential candidates, this man seemed the most interesting.  He's
handsome in a boyish sort of way, seemingly affable if slightly dorky. 
She's a little older than he is, more world-wise, more open to
experience and experiment.  They don't tell each other their names,
ages, professions, where they live.  It was meant to be nothing
personal.
After the round of interview footage, Affair goes back in time to their
first encounter at a cafe.  She's already booked a room.  Through a
series of nervous false starts, they make it through a halting
conversation.  At the hotel, it seems an eternity for the desk clerk to
ring up the man's credit card, then they take the long walk up the
stairs and down the hallway, through the bright red door.
It suddenly dawned on me that perhaps half an hour had gone by in the
blink of an eye.  I was utterly enthralled by every small nuance of this
encounter, every beat of silence.
Nathalie Baye's face is lined with age.  Perhaps she's in her mid-40s,
but very fit for a woman who might have mothered children.  Her eyes
flicker and dance, but she's not the type to give much away.  Bright,
courteous, sexually open - she's interesting even though we know very
little about her.  All we can tell, as the man freely admits, is that
she's a real woman.  In today's age where attractive girls are all
models and pin-ups, this film finds beauty in the normal lady walking
down the street.
Sergi López makes for a nice foil.  He's a little tubby and hairy, but
he doesn't take himself too seriously.  He has friendly, soft eyes, and
a mouth which is quick to smile.  At the first meeting, he's perhaps a
little more nervous than she.  He does order a cognac to brace himself.
Their first sexual encounter, which is built up to so vividly, remains
behind closed doors.  Maybe that's as it should be.  For a film about
sex, there isn't very much of it shown during the film.  In a way, this
makes it all the sweeter as we watch them during their second meeting at
the cafe.  Once more we don't see their amour.  After the hotel, that
second time, the man works up the courage to ask her to dinner later
that night.
On they go, never learning where the other lives.  They keep much as a
mystery from each other, but reveal enough to keep us interested.  Maybe
that's the nature of affairs, especially sexual ones.  The secrets.
The film runs a little over ninety minutes.  It's never dull.  I could
have done without the frequent voice-overs, which run over scenes where
I might have preferred to hear the naturalistic dialogue between the
lovers.  I'm also no big fan of self-conscious "interview" footage,
which only served to make me wonder how the documentarian tracked them
down.  These faults, while glaring, are forgiven because the rest of the
film feels so alluring, so sexy and smart.  They meet, they talk, they
make love and, slowly, grow closer.
There are many scenes where they talk frankly about sex.  As for the
actual onscreen lovemaking, it is kept to a minimum, but there's a
startling scene midway which has them in bed slowly working their way
toward orgasm.  This is not the sex of Hollywood gloss, or even of art
house decadence, or even of pornography.
Sex in American films is either a marathon, a farce, a music video, or a
tragedy.  An Affair of Love is all of the above, only less
self-important.  It's insubstantial, but that's pretty much the point. 
They only had what they had and the rest is in their memories.  So it is
for the viewer, too.  Maybe it's only worth a rental, but that's more
than what you'd expect walking in.
Director: Frédéric Fonteyne
Producers: Patrick Quinet, Rolf Schmid, Claude Waringo
Writer: Philippe Blasband
Starring: Nathalie Baye, Sergi López, Jacques Viala
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Left Behind: The Movie (2000) (V)
Based on the best-selling novel, Left Behind is the latest in an
assembly line of Evangelical thrillers from Cloud Ten Pictures. 
Considering the success of The Omega Code, there's a surprisingly large
audience of zealots who dream of screening films with "spiritual value"
nationwide.  And apparently, all that hard work is paying off.
Let readers be warned in advance, if you're part of the camp which tries
to catch the "so bad it's good" movies filmcritic.com cheerfully slams
on a weekly basis (and I mean you, Battlefield Earth), do yourself a
favor and avoid Left Behind.  Even if your interest is akin to mine,
approaching the entire affair as a postmodern joke, your contribution is
paving the way for more of this generic, bible-thumping crap.  With this
kind of marketing campaign, every dollar counts.
Having said that, I really wanted to enjoy Left Behind.  The premise has
all the makings of a crackerjack apocalyptic epic in the vein of Stephen
King's The Stand crossed with The Omen.  If handled right, this could
have been the mainstream alternative to Michael Tolkin's chilling
end-of-the-world melodrama, The Rapture.
On an international flight, half of the passengers vanish mid-air.  This
is not an isolated incident.  Around the world, Christians have
mysteriously disappeared without a trace.  It seems the Book of
Revelations has cracked wide open, and the newly departed are spared
seven years of tribulation during the Antichrist's rise to global
power.  Those who have been left behind must struggle in the ultimate
battle between good and evil, which will no doubt be further documented
in the inevitable string of sequels.
Don't tell me that doesn't sound exciting, even to heathens such as
myself.
My interest abruptly waned the moment a freshly scrubbed Kirk Cameron
appears on the scene as opportunistic news correspondent Buck Williams. 
We're asked to buy Kirk Cameron as a hardcore journalist covering an
international crisis in the Middle East?  Named Buck Williams?  When
Buck places his camera in the middle "of the shit" as bombs burst in
midair, it's difficult to shake the thought that this pathetic former
star hasn't aged a day since Growing Pains.  His behavior, his goofy
smile, his curly locks of hair are all exactly the same.  I guess some
things never change, even after you're Born Again.
Buck pursues a conspiracy that goes all the way to the United Nations. 
Will he be able to warn idealistic scientist Chaim Rosenzweig (Colin
Fox) that his "Eden formula" which could end world hunger may land in
the wrong hands?  Sure enough, there's a missing disk, a car explosion,
an attempted assassination, and shifty men in black who plot
Armageddon.  These familiar genre requirements are as lifeless as they
are predictable, shot with all the bland mushiness of late night cable
television.
Indeed, Left Behind could easily be confused with less ambitious fare
were it not for the preachy subplot involving the tormented pilot (Brad
Johnson) of that ill-fated international flight mentioned earlier.  When
his wife and son disappear in the Rapture, he falls to his knees begging
forgiveness.  If only he had listened when Jesus was knocking on the
door to his heart.  It's not long before Buck joins him as a soldier in
God's Army.
After the end credits scroll on Left Behind's home video release, Kirk
Cameron provides a public service announcement encouraging viewers to
tell everyone they know to see this movie.  My only request for the
Christians who happen upon this article: Don't settle for less.  Go to
the Left Behind website and demand quality scripts which address your
theological concerns.
Of course, the built-in audience will see these movies whether or not
they receive a critical bitch slap.  After an initial release on video
to spread word of mouth, Left Behind has found its way into the 20 top
grossing theatrical releases during the week it opened nationwide. 
Let's hear it for the Almighty Buck.
Director: Victor Sarin
Producers: Ron Booth, Joe Goodman, C. Robert Neutz, Ralph Winter
Writers: John Bishop, Joe Goodman, Paul Lalonde, Alan B. McElroy 
Starring: Kirk Cameron, Brad Johnson, Janaya Stephens, Clarence Gilyard,
Jr., Colin Fox, Gordon Currie
http://www.leftbehind-themovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for "Dune" (2000) (mini)
It seems that David Lynch's adaptation of Frank Herbert's epic science
fiction novel Dune (1984) wasn't enough to convince people that this
classic works far better on the page.  At least that box office fiasco
packs in some interesting Lynchian perversions.  Besides, how can you go
wrong with a cast that includes Patrick Stewart, Max von Sydow, and
Alicia Witt as a bald, pint-sized, knife-wielding child?  Let me tell
you something, buddy -- you can't top that!  Maybe it ain't Herbert's
vision of Dune, but it's fun at parties.
So someone in the Sci-Fi Channel marketing department thought that
they'd be able to create the definitive version of the novel, making
much ballyhoo over it in the press.  "This is the way Frank Herbert
intended it!"  Yes, yes, I'm sure he was precisely thinking of static,
made-for-television sets lifted from Star Trek: The Next Generation,
bathed in nauseating greens, oranges, and fire engine reds.
Instead of Lynchian puppets and latex gore, we're treated to phony
bluescreens, computer generated B-movie effects, and a series of
unrealistic matte paintings (at least, they looked like matte paintings
-- the press kit says they filmed in Prague and Tunisia!)  And what's up
with those gauche costumes, a cross between Japanese kimonos and Ronald
McDonald.  Something is clearly wrong here.
An attempt to summarize Herbert's richly layered plot would prove
confounding, what with his fastidious attention to detail.  We'll stick
with the Cliff's Notes version: Spice is the key to time travel, so
ruthless barons and emperors across the galaxy negotiate to get their
greedy stinking hands on as much of it as possible.  He who controls the
spice controls the universe.
With his eye on the prize, stalwart Duke Leto Atreities (William Hurt,
given top billing but whacked pretty quick) picks up stakes from his
homeland and moves to the desert planet known as Dune.  Comfortably
settled into his new digs, he proceeds to mine for the spice and teach
his brash young son Paul (Alec Newman) about the birds and the bees. 
Bizarre omens forebode that Duke Leto will be slain, and that young Paul
will be groomed as the prophesied Messiah to lead the Fremen (rogue
desert warriors) to salvation and freedom?
Slobbering Baron Vladimir Harkonnen (Ian McNeice), sleek Emperor Shaddam
IV (Giancarlo Giannini, Hannibal) and other diabolical forces work
intricate plots against the good guys.  A traitor, an assassination
attempt, and an ambush all figure into play before Paul and his pouting
cosmopolitan mother (Saskia Reeves) are cast out into the wild.  Will
Paul be groomed by the Fremen tribes to fight in a ritualized kung-fu
fight with Feyd-Rautha Harkonnen (Matt Keeslar, The Last Days of
Disco)?  He damned well better, lads, because this is a six-hour epic!
All of the shoddy production elements would be forgiven if there was a
halfway decent cast holding this house of cards together.  Hurt wanders
through early scenes mumbling his lines, coasting on what I hope was a
fat paycheck.  He at least exudes regal presence, whereas Newman's Paul
Atreities (played with authority by Kyle MacLachlan in Lynch's version)
is less a boy prince than a refugee from a boy band.
The women are a gaggle of weak-willed geese, with Julie Cox especially
bratty as the emperor's daughter.  Her "flirting" scenes with Paul will
not only disgust fans of Herbert's book (for which their relationship is
purely a matter of social convenience and political tact), but will also
turn off anyone who happened to be taking this malarkey seriously.  When
did the sci-fi space opera turn into Teen Beat?
I hate to keep returning to the Lynch version, but it was really so much
better.  Even if you didn't catch all the new language or rituals
originated by Frank Herbert (for he is the Kwizatz Haderach!), you
accepted it as dream logic.  Better to be entertained and confused than
casually dismissive, which is as much as this new Dune deserves.
Director: John Harrison
Producer: David R. Kappes
Writer: John Harrison
Starring: William Hurt, Alec Newman, Saskia Reeves, P.H. Moriarty, Ian
McNeice, Matt Kesslar, Giancarlo Giannini, Julie Cox
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Gimme Shelter (1970)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://a.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/046d0ba5725ae6628825693d00641cd9?OpenDocument
Prancing about onstage like some giggling, underdeveloped girl, Mick
Jagger can barely control his audience with an ineffectual plea:
"Brothers, sisters - we don't want this. We all want to have a good
time. So let's settle down now ororor we just won't play anymore."
While the Rolling Stones preen onstage and Jagger fiddles with his
endless mane of bangs, the leather biker boys who comprise the Hell's
Angels control the 300,000 hippies in the audience clamoring for
attention and Jagger's skinny bod.
This concert footage is intercut with scenes of the Rolling Stones'
lawyer, bespectacled fussbudget Melvin Belli, as he organizes their free
concert in California. The locals seem wary of bringing the Rolling
Stones to town, along with all those crazy fans: Someone's sure to get
hurt. We also catch glimpses of the obviously whacked out Stones on a
press junket, oblivious to the manic fans who fervently gather around
them.
Welcome to 1969, four months after Woodstock. The Stones are joined by
Jefferson Airplane in a free concert at Altamont Speedway. On the long,
bleak day, the crowd gathers in hot anticipation, some stripping
themselves naked and running through the crowd while others booze and
smoke up.
It's the end of the '60s, man, and what an ending! During the
performance, the lead singer of Jefferson Airplane is knocked out by an
angry biker, the crowd is drubbed with pool sticks and chains, and a
lone gunman who has Jagger in his sights is cut down by the knife of a
Hell's Angel. It's the tragic tale of Altamont, where a member of the
Stones' ad hoc security team stabbed a gun-toting fan to death. History
has been made, once again, with blood.
Gimme Shelter, filmed by the Maysles Brothers, is a time capsule of the
violent climate in 1969, shot over the course of ten days during the
Rolling Stones tour. The handheld camera moves around, capturing poorly
lit, washed out images of dejected youth, bummed out rock stars and a
wild performance. It isn't pretty, all ragged zooms and
catch-as-catch-can shots which move from one definitive late '60s image
to another - tight bellbottoms and long waves of hair, kissing couples
and peace signs, and travelers with all their worldly possessions in
their sacks traveling through the good old USA.
Mick Jagger really isn't much of a live performer, overly concerned with
his appearance, forcing eccentric ad-libs. However, the crowd adores
Mick's fervent energy. Women leap on stage to wrap themselves around
him. Oddly enough, it'd all be just a fun (and forgettable) road movie
leading up to an aggressive and hip "alternative to Woodstock" were it
not for the shots of the Rolling Stones sitting around the editing
console watching the aftermath and inevitability of the Altamont
tragedy.
When the murder occurs, Jagger rewinds the editing machine and watches
it again in grim slow motion, his face reflecting -- what? Relief that
he wasn't gunned down in cold blood? A thudding moment of realization
that the '60s have gone out with a brutal bang? Whatever it is, the
Maysles Brothers are sensible enough to linger on his face while
watching the footage, and the grim visages of his Rolling Stones
companions, particularly the cartoon-faced Charlie Watts as he smokes a
cigarette, eyes filled with emptiness.
The movie lacks focus and feels rough and tumble, hastily thrown
together and forcing its "death of the '60s" theme by rushing through
the murder finale. They really don't have much footage of its aftermath,
except the Stones' dejected faces in the editing room and the hippies
leaving the concert. That's the marvel of creatively editing around
something the filmmakers hadn't anticipated - using the metaphor of
death.
However, there's no denying that as a sign of its times, Gimme Shelter
is an indispensable document with uses the popular rock ballads of the
Rolling Stones as the pulse for the cheerfully drugged young people and
the hostile antics of the bikers, captured en masse on that fatal day by
the filmmakers. Songs like "Under My Thumb," "Satisfaction" and,
especially, "Sympathy for the Devil" become more than pop and fizz,
existing onscreen as cultural milestones and commentary on those
watching (and, indeed, those performing).
The best place to end this review lies in describing the quiet
melancholy of a single unbroken shot. The Rolling Stones listen to the
playback of their slow, dreamy "Wild Horses." They smoke, fiddle with
their boots, and sit staring at the walls of the recording studio as the
song carries on. Though this happens several days before Altamont, it
works as an eerie prediction that something great is coming -- great and
terrible and strange, and the Rolling Stones will have no choice but to
hurry up and wait.
Scenes like this play out as if Gimme Shelter were a thriller, and the
Altamont killing is the ticking time bomb which drives the story
forward. It's a movie which merits the attention of a re-release,
whether viewed as a history lesson in American culture or as an exercise
in slow mounting dread. Mick Jagger never knew what hit him.
Directors: Albert Maysles, David Maysles, Charlotte Zwerin
Producers: Albert Maysles, David Maysles, Charlotte Zwerin
Starring: Mick Jagger, Kith Richards, Mick Taylor, Charlie Watts, Bill
Wyman, Melvin Belli
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Margarita Happy Hour (2001)
"I'm so exhausted all the time...  Can't ask my mom for help...  You
wanna split some nachos?...  So I spent my whole friggin' day at
Medicaid...  Drink up, ladies -- only 15 minutes left of happy hour!"
Five irresponsible late-twentysomething mommies meet at an El Cheapo
Mexican restaurant to splurge on $2 Margaritas.  What better way to hang
on to their last vestige of rebellious slacker spirit?  They drink to
each other's health or bitch about the state of affairs while their
two-year-old babies crawl around under the table having tea parties. 
It's pretty goddamned cute without being precious or sentimental.
Living in the artsy section of Brooklyn with seven roommates,
sharp-witted freelance illustrator Zelda (Eleanor Hutchins), sporting a
nasty scar on her cheek, is somehow just scraping by.  Even if the kid
is adorable, it's no picnic taking care of her Little Z (long-haired
Jonah Leland).  Our surly heroine is continually forced to deal with the
system without the benefit of help from her affable fuck-up of a
boyfriend, Max (Larry Fessenden, Habit).  This couple is rough around
the edges, but both care for the baby and still share feelings for each
other even if the electric spell of first love is gone.  Sure, he loves
me -- he just can't stand to look at my face.
An assured directorial debut by Ilya Chaiken, Margarita Happy Hour won
critical accolades at the 2001 Sundance Film Festival, receiving the
catchy label of "Sex in the City for the downtown crowd."  I guess
that's someone's way of saying Margarita centers on dealing with the
pressures of raising a baby in the starving artist milieu.
Comparing this authentic, lived-in low budget feature to a glossy TV
show is something of a misnomer -- Chaiken's inventive directorial
approach really harks back to 70's filmmakers like Robert Altman or Hal
Ashby.  That cinematic heyday was a time when "slice of life" actually
meant empathetic, unsentimental warts 'n' all sketches of everyday
life.  It's great to see new directors as diverse as Aiyana Elliott (The
Ballad of Ramblin' Jack), Jonathan Nossiter (Signs and Wonders), and
Chaiken reclaiming that cinematic spirit.
The casting couldn't be better.  As Zelda, Hutchins is as sharp as a
whip with charisma to spare.  Whether sparring with her boyfriend or
telling a bedtime story to Little Z, she presents a character who is
wholly authentic and believable.  She's got her good days, she's got her
bad days, she can be a real bitch sometimes (and if you went out with
Max, you would too!)  In the same way Chaiken has found lived-in urban
locations, cramped apartments and rickety stairs, she's also found an
actress who completely fits into the environment of her film.
There are strong supporting turns from Fessenden as the ne'er do well
boyfriend, investing the role with surprising warmth and complexity, and
Holly Ramos as Zelda's long suffering buddy, Natali, just out of rehab,
all sad eyes and gimlet smiles.  Her delicate, careworn performance
defies junkie stereotypes.
Zelda's flashbacks are seamlessly incorporated into the present day,
detailing happier times when she picked up Max in a bar ("I hope you
write better than you play pool,") or walked the streets of Manhattan
with Natali in search of par-tayy central.  Hedonism is fun, kids.  You
can only evade mature decisions for so long, though.  Chaiken gives her
heroine a handful of tough decisions, leading to some dramatic
contrivances that seem a bit heavy handed in this otherwise
naturalistic, perceptive scenario.
These faults are easily forgiven, even forgotten, when Chaiken unveils
her spacious, clearly motivated open ending.  Margarita Happy Hour is
that rarity in movies -- as though the narrative has begun long before
the opening reel and will continue after the closing credits end.  A
full world has been presented onscreen, not some series of carefully
structured plot points building to a pat resolution.  Let's be honest,
how many times do you watch a movie feeling like the characters actually
had lives outside of the screenplay?
It'd be a shame not to mention at least one of the character details
that Chaiken literally throws away during the 98 minute running time. 
The scene has little to do with the plot, but adds to the cohesiveness
of Margarita's world: Larry Fessenden is walking down the street with a
cuppa coffee, not a care in the world.  He stops to light a cigarette,
and one of those obnoxious bike messengers sideswipes him.  "MY FUCKIN'
COFFEE!"  It goes flying.  Not leaving well enough alone, the messenger
rides back and forth, taunting him.  Ha ha.
Fessenden eventually gets sick of it and lives out every urbanite's
fantasy: he knocks the biker's punk ass out.  Let's just chalk it up as
another classic New York moment in a movie jam-packed with them.
Director: Ilya Chaiken
Producers: Michael Ellenbogen, Susan Leber
Writer: Ilya Chaiken
Starring: Eleanor Hutchins, Larry Fessenden, Holly Ramos, Barbara
Sicuranza, Amanda Vogel, Macha Ross, Kristin Dispaltro
http://www.margaritahappyhour.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/90c952b9687313de882568ff000f6736?OpenDocument
It's a typical day in the life of rambling junkie F*ckhead, whom we'll
call FH for the purposes of this review. He just broke up with his
on-again, off-again heroin buddy and girlfriend, Michelle, stole a car,
drove to the local bar and is getting wasted with his buddy, Wayne, a
burned out husk of a human being and card carrying member of the Undead
Drunks Club.
After several shots of rotgut to wash down the uppers, downers and
endless fuel of smack, bleary eyed Wayne asks FH if he wants to make a
couple bucks to pay for the drinks they're gonna have later (we realize
it's only mid-afternoon by this point.) They meander off to a nearby
house and proceed to rip the copper wiring out of the walls. `Yep,'
Wayne chuckles. `This ought to be worth forty bucks  enough to get
drunk tonight. Heh heh.'
This is only ten minutes of Alison Maclean's whimsical junkie movie,
Jesus' Son, which drifts from one anecdote to the next. Our unreliable,
rambling narrator, FH (brilliantly acted by Billy Crudup), regards
everything he sees with a bemused detachment, whether it be munching on
his cornflakes while Michelle (Samantha Morton) shoots up after sex, or
taking a part time job as a hospital orderly in the emergency room among
fellow pill popping losers who raid the cabinets, desperate for a cheap
score.
We're given a series of episodes in FH's life in the mid-70s, and
unlike most films which dwell in this sort of seedy world, it never
judges the lives of its main characters. In fact, FH invites us to laugh
at their pathetic little lives holed up in cheap hotel rooms, passing
the time with sex and drugs, or telling long stories about their failed
love lives and immediate goals of getting wasted.
The characters are lovable without being `quirky', meaning they ring
true. FH encounters several personalities throughout, and each actor is
given the opportunity to shine in honest, lived in performances. Wayne,
the guy who rips the copper wiring out of the walls of what may or may
not be his house, is played by a surprisingly restrained Denis Leary,
for whom most of the fire has gone out. Underneath a sad sack moustache,
Leary gives his most haunted performance.
Just as good is Jack Black, fresh from his acclaim in High Fidelity, as
Georgie, who drives around with FH popping pills as they seek a place to
camp out in the open air one night. He's given the most surprising scene
in the movie after they run over a rabbit on the road, and he whips out
his knife saying that they will feast tonight. This unseemly behavior
transforms into something profound and miraculous in one of the film's
first of many small epiphanies.
While the film doesn't follow the traditional rules of storytelling
(feeling more like a series of faded super-8 films strung together on a
string), the offbeat themes and sketches offer glimpses into a world.
Maclean is attentive to the look of their ragtag, colorful clothes
(including striped yellow underwear or natty brown leather coats two
sizes too big), the gray and empty rooms with filthy beds and noisy
springs  maybe a TV playing in the background if they haven't sold it
yet, and the dreamy cinematography of Adam Kimmel which purposefully
allows certain images to blur or shift in and out of focus like
memories.
The screenplay (and assured editing) move backward and forward in time
as FH tries to sift through his thoughts about Michelle, often going on
long tangents as he stumbles to keep on track. Thankfully, he manages to
take exciting detours with Leary, Black, Holly Hunter and a hospital
encounter with Dennis Hopper, of course, playing a cheerfully grumpy
addict who offers a descriptive and strange tale of a former wife who
shot him in the face years ago.
Billy Crudup takes center stage in the film playing a passive character
with graceful strokes. He's always present in his scenes with the other
actors, listening, eyes roving around nervously and breaking out into
his infectious grin. Maclean found the perfect actor to embody this
lovably clumsy sod who's got one foot on the highway and another in a
puddle. While it ultimately doesn't amount to more than an amusing
shaggy dog story, Jesus' Son is simply two hours in the life of a
F*ckhead, with an eye for details and nuance that reveals the underlying
humor underneath the lives of the sad, the tattered, the broken and the
pathetic.
Director: Alison Maclean
Producers: Elizabeth Cuthrell, Lydia Dean-Pilcher, David Urrutia
Writer: Elizabeth Cuthrell, Oren Moverman, David Urrutia
Starring: Billy Crudup, Samantha Morton, Denis Leary, Jack Black, Will
Patton, Holly Hunter, Dennis Hopper
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Five Senses, The (1999)
Not to be confused with that Bruce Willis ghost story, The Five Senses
is more along the lines of Kieslowski Lite.  The lives of five Canadians
are connected by the sensations of touch, taste, smell, sound, and
sight.  They all reside in the same apartment complex, not unlike the
lost souls wandering through The Decalogue.  Each of the protagonists
are faced with a glib moral crisis which must be resolved during the
seemingly endless hour-and-forty-five-minute running time.
Ruth, a professional massage therapist (Gabrielle Rose, The Sweet
Hereafter), uses the sensation of touch -- get it? -- to heal a wounded
relationship with her daughter's former teacher (Molly Parker, who saw,
smelled, tasted, and touched dead people in Kissed).
Sexy young socialite Rona (Mary-Louise Parker, Fried Green Tomatoes) is
able to communicate with her hot Italian lover (Marco Leonardi), who
can't speak a word of English, through the magic of delicious food and,
of course, some really great sex.  You can cross taste off of your
mental checklist, folks.
On and on we go.  There's the Crimes and Misdemeanors bit with the
sensitive young eye doctor (Philippe Volter, The Double Life of
Veronique) who is going deaf.  Not blind.  Deaf.  Cue the orchestra.  I
can already hear fifty violins crying out to God.  That covers both
sight and sound, doesn't it?
Most ridiculous is the story of a happy-go-lucky bisexual house cleaner
(Daniel MacIvor) who, undergoing a crisis of love, sets up a series of
dates where he proceeds to smell his former romantic partners. 
Ooo-la-la!
Throw in a subplot about a missing child, and you've got some serious
drama.
Writer-director Jeremy Podeswa approaches his story with solemnity which
errs on the side of pretentiousness.  The heavy-handed themes are so
broad and predictable that The Five Senses induces laughs in all the
wrong places.
The clean, austere shots are more revelatory in showing how disconnected
and empty these lives are, but that Canadian sense of detachment is
familiar from Atom Egoyan's stronger portraits of loneliness.  Exotica
comes immediately to mind, but the difference between Podeswa and Egoyan
is that The Five Senses isn't about character or even emotion, but about
ideas.  That's a mistake when you're crafting a movie about human
interaction -- no amount of egghead theory will make you care a fig
about whether or not the housecleaner will find true love.
Mary-Louise Parker brings a clever sensuality to her role, whether
flirting with Leonardi or grousing about her lousy lot to MacIvor.  She
surpasses the Generation-X "Am I after love or just sex?" dialogue by
making her character decidedly feral and bitchy.  You wouldn't want to
date this vixen past a one-night stand, but she makes for a lively
character in an otherwise ponderous piece of art house snobbery.
Director: Jeremy Podeswa
Producers: Carmelia Frieberg, Jeremy Podeswa
Writer: Jeremy Podeswa
Starring: Mary-Louise Parker, Nadia Litz, Daniel MacIvor, Molly Parker,
Gabrielle Rose, Philippe Volter
http://www.fivesensesmovie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for "V" (1983) (mini)
Independence Day ripped off the far superior 1983 TV miniseries, V,
correctly assuming that the public has only a short-term memory.  The
pervasive image of flying saucers hovering over every major metropolitan
city in the world is undeniably creepy, especially when the visitors are
not our friends.  V's mice-munching lizards, disguised in human form as
soap opera-friendly actors in bright red Nazi uniforms, wore false
smiles and were much scarier than any computer generated menace proposed
by ID:4.
What we're quick to forget is that TV movies from the early 80's were
actually pretty frightening, what with Ronald Reagan threatening to bomb
the Russkies and all.  The Day After caused many a sleepless night as
Jason Robards marched through a nuclear nightmare.  While the good guys
ultimately score a point for justice at the end of V, much of the film
is devoted to the insidious alien plot to corral humans into
concentration camps for food.  Yum, yum, yum.  A few supporting
characters get picked off in the first hour or two when they try to
prove that "the truth is out there."  We're gonna snatch you, and then
we're gonna eat you!
Marc Singer and Faye Grant make for credible freedom fighters, playing a
news cameraman and doctor, respectively, but it's the aliens who make
the deeper impression.  Jane Badler's perpetually shrewish Diana was a
Lady Macbeth for the space age, and even better was Richard Herd as
John, the kind-faced and soft-spoken politician who speaks of peace in
his marmalade voice while innocents are being rounded up in Earth's
ghetto and natural resources are being plundered.  Sly bastard.
Memorable subplots include the teenage girl (Blair Tefkin) who becomes
impregnated by a swell looking alien (Peter Nelson), the smug young
opportunist (David Packer) who turns traitor in exchange for a snazzy
red uniform (and ultimately gets his just desserts, heh heh), and the
wise old Holocaust survivor (Leonardo Cimino, in a small but memorable
performance) who lets us know, in case we didn't figure it out already,
that this is a ham-fisted allegory.  Indeed, writer-director Kenneth
Johnson had originally planned V as a World War II series, but when the
networks balked he simply made them alien invaders.  Clever, no?
As cool as V was, there are still a fair share of ridiculous scenes.  I
could never abide Robert Englund's cutesy alien, much preferring him as
Freddy Krueger.  V also didn't have the budget to pull off the elaborate
final showdown between alien spaceships and gun toting freedom fighters,
and there are some truly corny Star Trek moments with Marc Singer
running around the alien spacecraft (read: wobbly set) with friendly
alien Martin (Frank Ashmore).  Nostalgia does strange things to a man,
though -- it makes him more forgiving.  V remains a surprisingly
engrossing affair.  (Avoid the sequel and lame TV-series that followed.)
Director: Kenneth Johnson
Producer: Daniel H. Blatt, Kenneth Johnson, David J. Latt, Robert Singer
Writer: Kenneth Johnson
Starring: Jane Badler, Michael Durrell, Robert Englund, Faye Grant,
Richard Herd, Peter Nelson, David Packer, Neva Patterson, Tommy
Petersen, Marc Singer, Blair Tefkin, Michael Wright
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Wonderland (2000) (TV)
The city of London has a million stories, and Wonderland tells just one
of them -- well, okay, three.  No, five -- five! Six -- eight -- all
right, eleven subplots competing for screen time.
At the center are three sisters lookin' for a little love and
compassion.  Perky Soho waitress Nadia (Gina McKee, Croupier), her hair
punked out in cute rabbit ears, indulges in the lonely hearts club of
personal ads for Mr. Right, or at least a decent fuck.  Abrasive,
no-nonsense hairdresser Debbie (Shirley Henderson, Topsy-Turvy) settles
into a tract of not taking shit from anyone, especially her
irresponsible ex, Dan (Ian Hart, Spring Forward).  He can barely be
counted on for weekend visits to their teenage son (Peter Marfleet). 
Molly (Molly Parker, Waking the Dead) is very pregnant and needs a
little support from her friends, especially when her husband (John Simm)
goes through a mid-life career meltdown.
Wonderland also finds time for their parents, friends, lovers, and a
mystery guest (Enzo Cilenti) who rides into town, inhabiting his own
little movie of playful hotel room sex.  His place in their circle of
life is revealed at the climax, natch.  Each of these characters are
given their own revealing strands trailing off from the central web of
Chekhovian sisters.  Bleak lives and bitter struggles are the order of
the day.
Talented director Michael Winterbottom (Jude, Welcome to Sarajevo) pulls
out all the stops in his cinematic bag of tricks.  He nobly attempts to
elevate this contrived soap opera material to gritty, hard-edged
realism.  Wonderland's "look" is pure cinema verite, right down to the
restless hand-held camera breezing through gritty locations,
documentary-style.  Winterbottom coaxes naturalistic performances from a
who's-who of young British talent and tosses into the mix plenty of
vivid cutaways of working class extras.
While easy on the eyes, Winterbottom's sterling visual interpretation is
significantly undermined by Laurence Coriat's generic script.  Juggling
all those characters, you'd think he'd be able to come up with at least
one that didn't simply go through the motions toward a predictable
outcome.  McKee invests Nadia with chilly grace, but the canny viewer
will see the outcome of her handsome date du jour (Stuart Townsend) long
before it happens.
The scenes with the griping parents (Jack Shepherd and Kika Markham) are
especially weak, their disgruntled non-communication played to such a
pitch it borders on parody.  By the time nasty old mum is plotting
against the barking dog next door, representative of her hatred of the
world at large, we take a sudden detour into The Wizard of Oz.  I'll get
you, my pretty!
Winterbottom makes an interesting soundtrack choice in selecting Peter
Greenaway's favorite minimalist composer, Michael Nyman.  The score's
voluptuous repetitions of graceful epiphanies might seem more
appropriate to a fantasy film, but it brings to mind the cosmic
epiphanies during everyday life glimpsed in James Joyce's Dubliners. 
Nyman's glorious excess doesn't quite jive with the gritty onscreen
squalor, but it's a bold idea to suggest the passions swirling within
mundane lives.
Coriat claims to have been inspired by Robert Altman's Short Cuts, a
film with the benefit of Raymond Carver's perceptive source material. 
One could also easily compare the structure to Happiness, Hannah and Her
Sisters, or Magnolia.  We've been down this road a few too many times
before for Wonderland to feel particularly original.
Viewers who would like something a little different from the "multiple
subplot family crisis" subgenre are encouraged to seek out Patrice
Chéreau's Those Who Love Me Can Take the Train.  This French film
employs a similar verite approach, not to mention an eclectic taste in
music, but it's less concerned with wrapping up each of the stories. 
Like life, it's a story which begins and ends in transit.
Wonderland, on the other hand, betrays the writer's hand with watertight
resolutions that have been the trappings of melodrama throughout the
ages.  For all of Winterbottom's high-tech wizardry, transforming London
into an impressionistic streak of neon light, he can't pull this humdrum
tragicomedy out of the gutter.
Director: Michael Winterbottom
Producers: Michelle Camarda, Gina Carter, Andrew Eaton
Writer: Laurence Coriat
Starring: Shirley Henderson, Gina McKee, Molly Parker, Ian Hart, John
Simm, Stuart Townsend, Kika Markham, John Shepherd
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Anglaise et le duc, L' (2001)
"Through a spyglass, I could see everything."  King Louis XVI was
beheaded on January 21, 1793, but instead of visualizing this act of
regicide, legendary auteur Eric Rohmer's The Lady and the Duke observes
from afar.  Consider it a view to a kill made abstract.  A proper
British (yes, British) gentlewoman, Grace Elliott (Lucy Russell), and
her loyal maidservant gaze from a lofty terrace in Meudon at the
glistening city of Paris, where raucous crowds seem tinier than ants. 
The maid narrates what little she sees of the execution through her
telescope (often muttering, "I don't know,") as the sound of cheering
patriots and revolutionaries echoes through the air.  What we don't see
might not be able to hurt us.  Just close your eyes and think of
England.
During times of revolution, the aristocracy may feel a false sense of
calm in their parlor halls, discussing tumultuous events over glasses of
sherry until the walls cave in on them.  Adapted from Elliott's memoirs,
Journal of My Life During the French Revolution, Rohmer's latest
artistic tour-de-force may seem far removed from his domestic comedies
(Tales of the Four Seasons, etc.), a period film set during the most
violent changes in French history.  Resisting the temptation for
grand-scale theatrics, much of The Lady and the Duke is about quiet,
decisive moments between members of the cultural elite as they determine
how to proceed as the world implodes.
Grace Elliott makes for an unlikely protagonist: a headstrong, snobbish
blueblood, one unprepared for the machinations of history that sweep her
along.  A foreigner who accepts the French King as her own, Grace's life
seems defined by fancy attire and lively political debate with her
former lover, the King's hot-blooded cousin, Prince Philipe, Duke of
Orleans (Jean-Claude Dreyfus).  The times are changing, though, and the
gears inch ever closer toward violence.  During The September Massacres
of 1792, she is encountered by a procession of rioters brandishing the
head of the Duke's sister-in-law on a stake.  Rohmer makes a harsh
transition from tranquil, old fashioned, almost stagy parlor scenes to
the swell of an angry mob.  In doing so, he achieves what Braveheart and
The Patriot could not: the face of death.  When Grace sees her friend's
disembodied head on a pole, Rohmer's attention drifts from the societal
change to one woman's reaction shot, laden with hot tears.
Grace finds herself taking in a fugitive from justice, sheltering him
from the mob.  Through her relationship with the Duke, she seeks a
passport for this one activist's escape.  Grace doesn't even understand
her own actions (and the Duke reacts in stunned disbelief at how she
places herself in such danger).  She endures persecution from
Robespierre and his gang of thuggish equalizers, ceaseless police
monitoring, house searches, even a brief imprisonment for harmless
international correspondence.
Maintaining her stiff upper lip and pampered life (her imperious
attitude to the servants never changes), she becomes a heroine through
circumstance.  The events themselves are intrusions upon her person, her
home, and therefore her values.  Aristocracy proves a glass house, one
that can barely withstand the upheaval of stones.  The Duke is called to
vote on the King's punishment, and despite his hours of deliberation
with friends and advisors, talk means nothing in the face of bloody
action (or futile inaction).
The episodic structure creates a wobbly, jarring detachment from the
events of the French Revolution, which serves as metaphor but also
disconnects potential audience identification.  Lazy viewers (and
critics) may also complain that knowledge of French history is required
for enjoyment of The Lady and the Duke.  That's foolery, but brings up
the valid criticism that Rohmer's characters occasionally become
didactic.  Rohmer's imperfect but assured push toward the future remains
staunch and notable for casting a cautious eye upon the past while
taking bold steps forward into an uncertain future.
What may arouse interest in The Lady and the Duke outside of foreign
film enthusiasts with literary and historical passions is Rohmer's use
of cutting edge digital technology as a means of exploring the theme of
artifice as safety net or coping mechanism.  The actors were filmed
against a bluescreen, then placed against painted backdrops recreating
the vastness of 18th century Paris.  This recreation calls attention to
itself in every shot, a Technicolor dream of fanciful buildings and
wide-open streets.  It looks as phony as Titanic, but unlike James
Cameron's debacle, The Lady and the Duke plays with the notion of false
security in those walls of stone.  Why?  They aren't real.  The very
foundation Rohmer's characters stand upon is false, and in their
groundlessness they must discover themselves, in all their insubstantial
glory.
Screened at the 2001 New York Film Festival (feature coming soon).
Director: Eric Rohmer
Producer: Françoise Etchegaray
Writer: Eric Rohmer
Starring: Lucy Russell, Jean-Claude Dreyfus, François Marthouret,
Léonard Cobiant, Caroline Morin
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Ŕ ma soeur! (2001)
Fit for a ghoul's night out, Fat Girl stands cast iron firm with the
simplistic, fatuous, built-in excuse that its woman director is baring
the harsh sexual realities of adolescent girls.  Being a boy, I might
not understand female behavior and am unequipped to analyze this
particular pseudo-feminist coming-of-age story.  Fair enough.  I'll
pretend to ignore the mannered posturing and Health Class 101 "this is a
no-no" dialogue when Older Teenage Boy coaxes Younger Teenage Girl to
let him fuck her up the ass, speaking variations on "It won't hurt!" for
a scene that seems to last at least ten minutes.  This is done almost
entirely in an unbroken master shot that suggests unimaginative
camerawork more than unblinking voyeurism.  They dare you to look away,
without possessing the courage of allowing the children to actually
sound like children (they're mouthpieces for writer-director Catherine
Breillat's one-note clinical politics).
Rather than show an even-handed evaluation of the rigors of hormonal
change, Breillat (previously responsible for the unwatchable Romance)
wants to indulge in her hour of hate.  Life is pain, highness.  Get used
to it.  She'd find keen bedfellows in Neil LaBute and Todd Solondz,
other sultans of misanthropy who lack the balls to be earnest or
honest.  For children, dealing with trauma and pain is complicated.  To
bury that in sarcasm and academic theory feels cheap.  These would-be
auteurs (more like hauteurs) haven't earned the right to display
suffering because they don't layer it in emotional truth (as Mike Leigh
does throughout Naked and David Lynch in several key scenes of Blue
Velvet).  Of course, there I go again comparing her to all these
(better) male directors.  I don't care.  Gender be damned, she's
borderline inept.
Braced for a knee-jerk reaction from the art house crowd (mortified
shock or compulsory applause will suffice), writer-director Catherine
Breillat may well accomplish her mission to get a rise out of people. 
Don't be fooled.  This grotesque oversimplification of awkward forays
into passion may be quickly forgotten, remembered only as cold, boring,
philosophically arid, and incompetently photographed.  The hyperviolent
climactic sequence proves so extraordinarily misguided that I honestly
wondered whether Breillat had thrown in an impromptu dream sequence.
Twelve years old, a bundle of dough with a sour pout, the superb Anaďs
Reboux plays the titular fat girl with a thousand yard stare and a
frumpy insouciance.  (Her character is also named Anaďs.)  Sitting at
the table morosely slurping down a banana split, her presence is
grounded and heartbreaking.  It's a pity Breillat never finds anything
for her to do other than get defensive against her evil storybook
sister, 15-year old Elena (Roxane Mesquida), for bringing a transitory
boyfriend home to their shared room.  In this summer cottage, Anaďs has
no escape from her position as stoic bedside observer to Elena's
depressing confusion of cheap sex with romance.  The boy in question, a
smug Italian college kid named Fernando (Libero De Rienzo) is a real
piece of work, claiming that the experience is a declaration of love
while begging for a blowjob.
Anaďs doesn't receive any warmth from her largely absent parents, who
join Elena in making fun of her hefty girth.  She finds pleasure in
wandering the beach alone, singing songs to herself, and swimming in the
pool kissing the metal railing and pretending that it's her paramour. 
Reboux commands the screen, but there's only so much a child actress can
do recounting pretentious monologues to herself.  If one is inspired to
rescue this young performer and place her in a better movie, at least
she fares better than the other young talent asked to perform in intense
love scenes that might feel justified if they weren't so dramatically
misguided.
This 83-minute vignette is something of a horror show, but Breillat
saves her nastiest poison for the very end.  On the long ride home
punctuated by an uncomfortable silence between family members, gigantic
trucks swerve by as the hour grows late.  Will mommy fall asleep at the
wheel?  Perhaps.  Or maybe there's something deadlier around the corner,
lying in wait to pounce upon the unsuspecting Fat Girl.  What's more,
she might even like it.  With the intent of being unfair and
unpredictable, placing her heroine in the most diabolical of corners in
order to face up to impending adulthood, Breillat's extreme flourish of
sadistic tawdriness reveals her as a master purveyor of contempt.  Fat
Girl is a bitter pill indeed.
Aka Ŕ ma soeur!  Screened at the 2001 New York Film Festival (feature
coming soon).
Director: Catherine Breillat
Producer: Jean-François Lepetit
Writer: Catherine Breillat
Starring: Anaďs Reboux, Roxane Mesquida, Libero De Rienzo, Arsinée
Khanjian, Romain Goupil
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for L.I.E. (2001)
Best remembered for his understated performance as Dr. Hannibal Lecter
in Michael Mann's forensics thriller, Manhunter, Scottish character
actor Brian Cox brings something special to every movie he works on. 
Usually playing a bit role in some studio schlock (he dies halfway
through The Long Kiss Goodnight), he's only occasionally given something
meaty and substantial to do.  If you want to see some brilliant acting,
check out his work as a dogged police inspector opposite Frances
McDormand in Ken Loach's Hidden Agenda.
Cox plays the role of Big John Harrigan in the disturbing new indie
flick L.I.E., which Lot 47 picked up at Sundance when other distributors
were scared to budge.  Big John feels the love that dares not speak its
name, but he expresses it through seeking out adolescents and bringing
them back to his pad.  What bothered some audience members was the
presentation of Big John in an oddly empathetic light.  He's an
even-tempered, funny, robust old man who actually listens to the kids'
problems (as opposed to their parents and friends, both caught up in the
high-wire act of their own confused lives.)  He'll have sex-for-pay with
them only after an elaborate courtship, charming them with temptations
from the grown-up world.
L.I.E. stands for Long Island Expressway, which slices through the strip
malls and middle-class homes of suburbia.  Filmmaker Michael Cuesta uses
it as a (pretty transparent) metaphor of dangerous escape for his
15-year old protagonist, Howie (Paul Franklin Dano).  In his opening
voice-over, Howie reveals a morbid preoccupation with death on the road,
citing the L.I.E. highway deaths of filmmaker Alan J. Pakula, songwriter
Harry Chapin, and his own mother on Exit 52.  He's both fascinated and
disturbed by the L.I.E., and those feelings are projected onto Big John
(who follows Howie around in his bright red car, but never makes a move
to force the boy to do something he doesn't want to do.  This makes him
much more complex than the usual child molesters seen in movies -- he's
a beast, but ashamed of it.)
L.I.E. would have worked best as a half-hour short film about Howie's
ill-advised foray into Big John's haven.  There is unnecessary padding
with Howie's miserable dad (Bruce Altman) in the hot seat for a
white-collar crime, degenerate youngsters who get their kicks from
robbing middle-class houses, and some homoerotic shenanigans with
wise-ass Gary Terrio (Billy Kay), a handsome Artful Dodger.  Rather than
add to the themes of suburban ennui (not that we needed another movie on
that subject), these awkward subplots pad out the running time to
adequate feature length.
Concurrently, the relationship between Howie and Big John is evenly
paced and exceptionally well acted.  Cox, sporting a baseball cap and a
faded marine tattoo, is all bluff and bluster.  Dano is quiet and at
first glance seems so withdrawn as to be transparent.  We're so used to
child actors whose dramatic choices are broad and obvious (calling Haley
Joel!), it's surprising to see one who actually listens throughout any
given scene.  The restraint is admirable.
But L.I.E.'s screenplay doesn't always give them the best material. 
When Howie reads Big John a Walt Whitman poem, the moment feels a bit
too precious.  Director Michael Cuesta lingers on an ecstatic reaction
shot of Big John, who may as well be hearing Glenn Gould performing
Bach's Goldberg Variations.  It's too much.  There are also some obvious
dramatic contrivances involving Big John's other boy toy (Walter
Masterson), jealous over the newbie.  This plot thread predictably leads
to violence.
Not content to be a haunting, observational portrait of teen alienation
in a royally screwed up world (like Terry Zwigoff's superb Ghost World),
Cuesta lacks the confidence in his own work to end on an ambivalent
note.  It's typical of unimaginative cinema to wrap things up with a
bullet, sparing the writers from actually having to come up with a
complex, philosophical note.  In this regard, L.I.E. (and countless
other indie films) share something in common with blockbuster action
films: problems are solved when the obstacle is removed.  How often does
real life work this way?  To extend the question: If a movie is striving
for realism, do dramatic contrivances destroy the illusion?
Director: Michael Cuesta
Producer: Rene Bastian, Linda Moran, Michael Cuesta
Writer: Stephen M. Ryder, Michael Cuesta, Gerald Cuesta
Starring: Brian Cox, Paul Franklin Dano, Billy Kay, Bruce Altman
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Une liaison pornographique (1999)
My first thought was, "Oh God, another one of those pretentious foreign
art house sex films."  The opening shot features one of those busy
Parisian streets, the locals hustling by in a blur of slow motion.  This
city tells a thousand stories, my friends, and An Affair of Love is one
of them.
As if to add insult to injury, our first actual scenes are of the woman
(Nathalie Baye, Day For Night) and man (Sergi López) after the affair,
being interviewed by some off-screen voice.  It's very When Harry Met
Sally, only with the added layer of being French lovers talking about
their passionate encounters.  Hoo boy, this is gonna be a long road,
isn't it?
We learn that the woman placed an ad in a magazine.  Of all the
potential candidates, this man seemed the most interesting.  He's
handsome in a boyish sort of way, seemingly affable if slightly dorky. 
She's a little older than he is, more world-wise, more open to
experience and experiment.  They don't tell each other their names,
ages, professions, where they live.  It was meant to be nothing
personal.
After the round of interview footage, Affair goes back in time to their
first encounter at a cafe.  She's already booked a room.  Through a
series of nervous false starts, they make it through a halting
conversation.  At the hotel, it seems an eternity for the desk clerk to
ring up the man's credit card, then they take the long walk up the
stairs and down the hallway, through the bright red door.
It suddenly dawned on me that perhaps half an hour had gone by in the
blink of an eye.  I was utterly enthralled by every small nuance of this
encounter, every beat of silence.
Nathalie Baye's face is lined with age.  Perhaps she's in her mid-40s,
but very fit for a woman who might have mothered children.  Her eyes
flicker and dance, but she's not the type to give much away.  Bright,
courteous, sexually open - she's interesting even though we know very
little about her.  All we can tell, as the man freely admits, is that
she's a real woman.  In today's age where attractive girls are all
models and pin-ups, this film finds beauty in the normal lady walking
down the street.
Sergi López makes for a nice foil.  He's a little tubby and hairy, but
he doesn't take himself too seriously.  He has friendly, soft eyes, and
a mouth which is quick to smile.  At the first meeting, he's perhaps a
little more nervous than she.  He does order a cognac to brace himself.
Their first sexual encounter, which is built up to so vividly, remains
behind closed doors.  Maybe that's as it should be.  For a film about
sex, there isn't very much of it shown during the film.  In a way, this
makes it all the sweeter as we watch them during their second meeting at
the cafe.  Once more we don't see their amour.  After the hotel, that
second time, the man works up the courage to ask her to dinner later
that night.
On they go, never learning where the other lives.  They keep much as a
mystery from each other, but reveal enough to keep us interested.  Maybe
that's the nature of affairs, especially sexual ones.  The secrets.
The film runs a little over ninety minutes.  It's never dull.  I could
have done without the frequent voice-overs, which run over scenes where
I might have preferred to hear the naturalistic dialogue between the
lovers.  I'm also no big fan of self-conscious "interview" footage,
which only served to make me wonder how the documentarian tracked them
down.  These faults, while glaring, are forgiven because the rest of the
film feels so alluring, so sexy and smart.  They meet, they talk, they
make love and, slowly, grow closer.
There are many scenes where they talk frankly about sex.  As for the
actual onscreen lovemaking, it is kept to a minimum, but there's a
startling scene midway which has them in bed slowly working their way
toward orgasm.  This is not the sex of Hollywood gloss, or even of art
house decadence, or even of pornography.
Sex in American films is either a marathon, a farce, a music video, or a
tragedy.  An Affair of Love is all of the above, only less
self-important.  It's insubstantial, but that's pretty much the point. 
They only had what they had and the rest is in their memories.  So it is
for the viewer, too.  Maybe it's only worth a rental, but that's more
than what you'd expect walking in.
Director: Frédéric Fonteyne
Producers: Patrick Quinet, Rolf Schmid, Claude Waringo
Writer: Philippe Blasband
Starring: Nathalie Baye, Sergi López, Jacques Viala
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Claire Dolan (1998)
A clinically austere art house film, Claire Dolan is Lodge Kerrigan's
follow-up to the rigorous Clean, Shaven.  He opens with cool, carefully
composed images of impassive skyscrapers, a hollow wind whistling
through, before moving to the reticent, emotionally disconnected title
character.
Claire Dolan (Katrin Cartlidge, Naked) is a high priced prostitute, so
down on her luck she phones her johns from a pay phone.  "I miss you.  I
want to see you.  I really want you inside me.  I can be there in ten
minutes."  All her human interaction is reduced to a minimalist
bargaining of her goods for exchange.
Every line of dialogue is pared down to simple, direct statements spoken
by the walking dead, devoid of passion, pity or conviction.  Kerrigan's
world is a vacuum of lost souls who find no solace in their frequent
sexual intercourse, only distraction from their lives of wary skepticism
and veiled threats.
Claire's sole emotional link to the rest of the world has already died. 
Her ailing mother has recently passed away, and Claire automatically
moves toward the one thing that may restore some coherence and purpose
to her miserable life: the dream of filling her mother's role by bearing
a child.
Moving from the desolate streets and skyscrapers of Manhattan to the
warehouse streets and lonely coffee shops of New Jersey, escaping her
pimp (subtle Colm Meaney, who brings a chilly efficiency to the role). 
Claire has a disinterested sexual affair with an inarticulate cab driver
(Vincent D'Onofrio, The Cell) who, upon learning of her life as a
prostitute, begins to follow her, Taxi Driver style.  In this world,
though, Travis Bickle will get the living shit kicked out of him if he
moves into territory he doesn't understand.
Kerrigan paints a world of zero empathy.  The vapid dialogue exists only
to fill dead air between the frequent sex scenes, which are shot as
functional, cold, even unfriendly, piled on one after another.
There's not much compassion and even less humor in the nearly
unwatchable Claire Dolan, a fine piece of filmmaking that presents
little relief for all its agony.  While Kerrigan offers an assured voice
of cinematic authority, finding the melancholy emotional undercurrent in
each frame, his minimalist dialogue feels too stilted and inorganic.
Claire Dolan is helped enormously by some fine performances by Meaney,
D'Onofrio and the courageous Katrin Cartlidge, who has slowly but
resolutely built up a body of work in challenging and provocative films
such as Naked, Breaking the Waves and Before the Rain.  The camera seems
fascinated by her weathered face and slightly crooked teeth, her moments
of subdued introspection.  Her prostitute seems closer to reality than
most "heart of gold" Hollywood variations (a la Leaving Las Vegas). 
There's something appealing in Cartlidge's performance that arouses
pathos.  She's attractive in a real, unforced way.  Her considerable
intensity is kept in reserve; few actors make silence so compelling.
There's a devastating example of psychological violence under the polite
surface of a chance encounter on the streets of New York, where one
person holds the cards against another, and a third person -- an
innocent -- is left painfully in the dark.  It's unsettling in an almost
comical way and difficult to articulate, which almost redeems the
unwavering tone of bleak chic that permeates Claire Dolan.
Director: Lodge Kerrigan
Producer: Ann Ruark
Writer: Lodge Kerrigan
Starring: Katrin Cartlidge, Vincent D'Onofrio, Colm Meaney, Jim
Frangione, Tom Gilroy
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Blackout, The (1997)
One of these days, I'll make good on my promise never to rent another
Abel Ferrara movie.  King of New York and Body Snatchers notwithstanding
(and Bad Lieutenant is only fit for a single, emotive viewing), his
exploitation flicks have fallen into a rut of hoary art-house
trappings.  It's a perfume-drenched, coke-addled visit to the seedy
pornography shop, where beautiful models (no, hookers -- no, courtesans)
usher you through the silk curtains.
Ferrara's only consistently smart move has been casting Christopher
Walken over and over again, since Walken can make a good movie great and
a loathsome movie durable whenever he's onscreen.  His 8-minute scene in
The Addiction is the saving grace of that otherwise abysmal,
unwatchable, and pretentious failure.  When he starts talking about his
vampiric bowel movements, or questions whether Lili Taylor has ever read
Naked Lunch, there's a much-needed dose of humor in an otherwise
terminally unfunny affair.  You know those Gothic club kids who are too
cool to smile and let you know they're actually having fun?  The
Addiction is that movie.
Walken, sadly, does not appear in The Blackout.  The central role of
Matty, a junkie film star whose lightning paced Hollywood life among the
beautiful people is inevitably leading to his destruction, is played by
Matthew Modine (who takes what he can get after Cutthroat Island).  Much
like the protagonists of Michelangelo Antonioni's terminally bored
cultural elite, Matty is involved in a bitter pill "relationship" with
high fashioned model Annie (at least I think she's a model.)  Matty's
lady is played by French actress Béatrice Dalle, arrested twice for
cocaine possession during filming of The Blackout -- not that you needed
to know that, but it lends credence to the idea that Ferrara's entire
oeuvre has been filmed in a fucking blackout.  No kidding.  Requiem For
a Dream has nothing on the junkie presentations seen in Ferrara's movies
and his controversial urban lifestyle.
Matty and Annie struggle over her decision to have an abortion without
consulting him.  No doubt, he was off chasing the dragon.  In his
despair, Matty indulges in a chemical induced weekend of debauchery,
tooling around the streets of Miami with video filmmaker Mickey Wayne
(Dennis Hopper, in full "dirty ol' man" mold smacking models on the ass
and telling them to spread their legs.  Wider!)  Toward the end of the
night, they pick up a teenage waitress also named Annie (Sarah Lassez),
start shooting a hastily improvised sexual scene, then Matty thankfully
blacks out.  Something happened that night which haunts him throughout
the rest of the movie, and it's exactly what you think it was.  Suffice
to say, there's some confusion over whether he killed Annie One or Annie
Two, or anyone at all.
The Blackout is typical Ferrara: no plot to speak of, plenty of raunch,
and horribly vogue images of Matthew Modine downing a bottle of Jack
Daniels and a beer while wrapping himself in a see-through curtain in
his hotel room by the sea, by the sea, by the beautiful sea. 
Cinematographer Ken Kelsch finds inconsistent glory in alternating
gorgeous painterly sunsets with docu-style sleaze (and we're back to
Dennis Hopper leering at girls in bathing suits.  "Yeah!!! YEAH!!! 
ARRRGHHH!" says Mr. Hopper.  Dirty old sod.)
It's compulsive viewing in a tacky sort of way, leading to a ridiculous
climax where Modine seizes control of his destiny.  How's that for
cryptic?  Never fear -- Ferrara finds time for some female full frontal
nudity to remind us what he's all about.  I can picture it now.  "Take
off yer clothes, kid -- it's essential to depict the inner maelstrom of
my central protagonist, and you're his visual id.  You're the soul, the
heart, the bloodstream of the picture.  Take it off!  TAKE IT ALL
OFF!!!  HA HA HA!"  Friggin' vampire.  Yeah, you, Ferrara.
A final word about Matthew Modine: He's actually a fine actor when
properly cast, but there's something too squeaky-clean in his demeanor. 
He's ideally suited for sarcastic men in tightly controlled situations,
such as his Private Joker in Full Metal Jacket or the time-bomb nebbish
in Short Cuts (who is every bit as superb as Julianne Moore in that
famous scene, though no one seems to notice him).  [He was in that
scene? -Ed.]  Here, he's asked to let it all hang out, sporting a
three-day stubble and oily bangs.  He throws around furniture like
Stanley Kowalski, but it's somehow lacking.  Modine lacks the feral
intensity of Brando, entirely miscast in Ferrara's flesh fair.  Better
luck next time, Matt.  Someday, you'll be forgiven for Cutthroat Island,
which wasn't really your fault in the first place.  Maybe Atom Egoyan
will find a place for you somewhere, and all will once again be well in
your world.
Director: Abel Ferrara
Producer: Edward R. Pressman, Clayton Townsend
Writer: Abel Ferrara, Marla Hanson, Christ Zois
Starring: Matthew Modine, Claudia Schiffer, Béatrice Dalle, Sarah
Lassez, Dennis Hopper
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for All the Rage (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/e63ca07a750cf033882568d0001963bf?OpenDocument
Quite a cast has been assembled for this Altman-esque tale of
interlocked lives, all clamoring around the "serious social problem" of
gun control. While there's no denying that the USA has over fifty
million gun owners and it's a subject worthy of address and debate, this
movie thuddingly hits the same numb point over and over again: guns are
bad, guns can kill. That's about as resonant as It's the Rage will get.
Jeff Daniels and Joan Allen play a miserable suburban couple whose
marriage is disrupted by an accidental shooting in their living room at
midnight. As it turns out, the guy was Daniels' business partner. Allen
moves out in disgust and, through a process of self-discovery, figures
out that her happy little life was nothing more than a middle class
prison. She hides away at her new workplace, in the employ of eccentric
millionaire and computer guru Gary Sinise. Daniels sits at home fuming,
renting pornography and playing with his gun.
Andre Braugher (as Daniels' attorney) and David Schwimmer play a gay
couple who have just purchased their first pistol. Good timing, too, if
you're talking soap operas. Schwimmer has begun to suspect his longtime
companion of having an affair. Braugher's problems escalate when his
white trash lover (Anna Paquin) becomes afraid that her powder keg older
brother (wild Giovanni Ribisi) is gonna grab his gun and blow Braugher
away. 
Of course, this being an Altman-esque intertwined plot, Ribisi is
chasing after entirely the wrong guy. He thinks friendly video store
clerk Josh Brolin is the one who's playing Lolita with his kid sister.
Wouldn't you know that Brolin worked for mad computer guru Sinise at the
start of the movie?
Guns figure into each narrative, and because they're so close at hand
our trigger happy cast are always a hairs breath from blowing each other
away. Unfortunately, they don't. We the audience are stuck with ninety
minutes of angry one-note characters who rub their quirkiness in our
faces. Jeff Daniels flounders as a pompous hubbie who screams and yells
when he doesn't get his way and David Schwimmer is grating as a swishy
gay stereotype prone to fidgety hissy-fits. Robert Forster sleepwalks
through the standard "cop ready for retirement" role who's investigating
every other character, often launching into bone dry, monotonous
speeches about the grim state of the world. Oh, the humanity.
I don't fault the cast, though. Some of them, like the always reliable
Joan Allen, fare better than others. Gary Sinise in particular has fun
with his socially inept geek persona, often reacting to the computer
screens in his room which purportedly reflect his games but seem to
display his own manic thoughts (which sometimes involve violence and
guns, natch.) Only problem is, the charismatic and mannered Sinise often
looks like he belongs in another movie entirely - say, a better Terry
Gilliam movie, than the bland, by-the-numbers movie of the week everyone
else is taking part in.
Once you get past the characters, the very look of the film screams
student filmmaker. The budget shows its seams painfully in poorly lit
flat imagery, often cheating shots to avoid showing the entire house of
a millionaire or upper middle class couple in ways which limit the film
visually. The final montage where everything heats up and blows,
involving several guns going off and many characters buying the farm,
it's so choppy and unclear that I didn't know what happened to a major
character until catching it a second time.
Intended as a bleak comedy about the "gun control problem", the movie
never finds enough social nuances in its display of guns in the homes of
the rich, the middle class and the poor to work as humor or political
satire. The caricatures and situations James Stern has placed under his
microscope are simply too broad to have much of an impact. 
By the time I reached the closing credits, where we are informed what
happened to each of the characters afterwards in a cutesy anecdote about
what they learned (such as "Don't shoot the friendly charging rhino,
climb up a tree instead!"), the temptation was great to hang up my
liberal conscience and join Charlton Heston's merry men at the NRA. I
had to remind myself, "It's only a movie, it's only a movie" 
Director: James D. Stern
Producer: Peter Gilbert, Anne McCarthy, Ash R. Shah, James D. Stern
Writer: Keith Reddin
Starring: Joan Allen, Jeff Daniels, Gary Sinise, Andre Braugher, Robert
Forster, Anna Paquin, Giovanni Ribisi, Josh Brolin, David Schwimmer,
Bokeem Woodbine
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Terrorist, The (1999)
Any interest for this beautifully photographed Indian film will surely
be generated by the screen credit, "John Malkovich Presents."  While he
had little to do with the financing or actual production, he discovered
The Terrorist during an international film festival and was so terribly
moved that he pushed for a distribution deal with the minor league
company Phaedra Cinema.
Malli (played by expressive newcomer Ayesha Dharkar) is a nineteen-year
old rebel girl whose only home has been a guerilla camp nestled deep in
the forests of an unnamed country.  She has been asked to perform a
crucial assassination that requires her to strap on a bomb and, when the
moment arrives, blow up herself and her enemy.  Sounds like a lean, mean
novella in the Ernest Hemingway mold.
Patient viewers who respond to the visual poetry of Robert Bresson or
Terrence Malick will find much to appreciate here.  Of course, as soon
as a review mentions the notion of visual poetry, some folks may start
running for the hills.  Indeed, this is understandable.  The Terrorist
is slow, meditative, and more than slightly pretentious.
There's not much in the way of dialogue or exposition.  Much of the
time, the camera simply follows Manni as she wanders through rivers and
hills, teardrops and rain.  The natural light sources create a strange
pastiche of aqua colored landscapes.  Often, shots will linger on
close-ups of Dharkar, whose eyes burn with charisma.  If that sounds
boring to you, give this movie a wide berth.
Early scenes are taut with violence as Manni casually blows away a
prisoner-of-war, then undergoes a grueling interrogation as her
superiors wade through five teenage girls seeking the right candidate
for the job.  While director/cinematographer Santosh Sivan wields his
camera with austere grace, these early scenes set up what amounts to a
fairly generic story -- Bresson's interpretation of Mad Magazine's Spy
Vs. Spy.
Bottom line: it's difficult not to get utterly bored, no matter how much
of an art house cinephile you aspire to be.  If the thought of Manni
tromping through minefields with a battle-scarred little boy (Vishwas)
sounds exciting, be forewarned that you're faced with endless shots of
them walking, thinking, or staring off into nothingness.  This
particular subplot ends on a hollow, predictable note right after Manni
says goodbye to this friend.  If you've seen any films set in a war-torn
country, it won't shock you.
There's a token love story, just as there is the inevitable guilt over
her mission.  If more attention had been paid to illuminating her inner
thoughts or struggle, perhaps The Terrorist would amount to more than
several reels of affecting pictures.  We are presented with a motion
picture with themes that would have been better articulated in the
medium of a slide show or book.
If you're not into the whole art house thing, you may get some enjoyment
out of putting on your Cultural Anthropologist cap and using The
Terrorist as a point of entry into the portal of John Malkovich.  To
those with the desire to experience this elusive actor's taste in
cinema, I offer this tiny hint: it's only a rental away.
Director: Santosh Sivan
Producers: Jit Joshi, A. Sreekar Prasad 
Writers: Santosh Sivan, Ravi Deshpande, Vijay Deveshwar
Starring: Ayesha Dharker, K. Krishna, Sonu Sisupal, Vishwas
http://www.phaedracinema.com/terrorist.htm
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Waking the Dead (2000/I)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/786e07986556523a88256967000409ea?OpenDocument
        Keith Gordon is one of the best filmmakers we have working today, and
he's been quietly building a strong body of work which merits attention.
His cult classic anti-war film, A Midnight Clear and his tour de force
adaptation of Kurt Vonnegut's Mother Night were two of the 15 or 20 best
American films to come out in the 1990s.  Gordon is particularly good at
visualizing internal landscapes, particularly slow collapses into
paralyzing madness and terrible guilt.
        It's difficult to say whether or not Waking the Dead is his best film,
since it's one of those movies which seeps into you as you view it, then
stays with you in the days that follow.  It's certainly his most
challenging in terms of tone, structure, and theme, deliberately
convoluted and fragmented, moving back and forth between two different,
contrasting eras (the idealistic '70s and the aggressively opportunistic
'80s) and the evolution of its deeply troubled central character,
Fielding Pierce (Billy Crudup).
        Fielding has idealistic hopes in his youth to do some small good in the
world within a liberal political system, but for much of the film he is
caught between his personal ambition for success and those hopeful
dreams of social change.  He comes from a struggling blue-collar family
and has worked enormously hard to get to where he is, but where is that
place, and what is it he really wanted in the first place?
        Gordon's theme is idealism, and that is closely connected with
Fielding's spiritual love and connection with Sarah Williams (Jennifer
Connelly,) a young hippie and political activist who works with
Fielding's deadbeat brother (raspy Paul Hipp).  The opening scenes in
1972 play out as colorful and a little goofy, and Gordon draws out a few
silly moments between Fielding and his brother to the point where an
audience may become a little restless, but stick with the film.
        It's slow, methodical, economical -- it requires some patience because
it's a movie with allows itself to breathe, easing slowly into a
romantic story on par with Casablanca, a fine companion piece which was
also more a story about struggles with idealism than true love.  If you
ask me, that makes the romance in these films all the more powerful and
stirring.
        This romance plays out against the backdrop of political change and
social activism. They care for each other because they both want to make
those changes to better society, but their approaches are wildly
different.  Fielding wants to change from the inside, administratively,
first as a district attorney and, ultimately, as the president.  Sarah
moves in different circles, with protestors and radicals.  The film
could have easily become bogged down in moral postulating, but it keeps
its message clear and direct.
        Gordon is also particularly good at handling the sensual nature of
their relationship, which is playful and sweet.  When they're debating a
hot issue, and Fielding is starting to go off on her, she starts kissing
his stomach.  "Hey, what are you doing?  Stop that.  I'm having a moment
here." he says, laughing.  "I had a point I was trying to make..."
        The opening scene in the film clearly establishes the event which will
haunt Fielding through the entire film, as he witnesses a car accident
on television and learns that Sarah is dead.  Throughout the rest of the
film, whether in the flashbacks of the '70s or Fielding's campaign in
the '80s, Sarah is ever present -- a ghost when not onscreen.  He is
convinced that she is there with him at all times, but what her purpose
is will perhaps always remain unknown.  As his obsessive love for her is
rekindled, he believes she is physically there with him in the
sidelines, but Gordon allows you to decide whether this is a ghost story
or the slow fragmentation of one man's life, when time collides and the
past and present merge.
        It sounds very complicated from the plot description -- a mix of
political struggles and true love.  While it is a rigorous story, moving
in a non-linear mode which can be difficult to follow, the emotions are
simple and clear, and the central relationship between Sarah and
Fielding is the heart of this film, accessible and within the realm of
understanding.  It's one of the most accurate depictions of romantic
love I've seen onscreen.
        Keith Gordon has always had a great gift for working with actors,
having once been an actor himself.  Gary Sinise and Nick Nolte gave the
best work of their careers in A Midnight Clear and Mother Night,
respectively.  Here, Billy Crudup establishes himself as a handsome
leading man who can also act.  He has a powerful scene late in the film
where he's breaking down at a dinner table, repeating the same sentences
over and over again.
        Jennifer Connelly is a revelation -- an actress I've never found
compelling or interesting before, yet wonderfully dynamic and funny
here.  There's just something about her performance, the way she tilts
her head or says something, which rings true.  When she says to Crudup,
"It's infuriating how much I love you," after a fight, it's a moment
we've felt before.  The word I would keep coming back to is honesty in
her work with Crudup.  Gordon brought something out of her, something
radiant and powerful, which hasn't been evident before.
There's also something of Kubrick in the austere visuals.  Fielding
sitting in a chair with a vast wall behind him, or the proximity of his
face to Sarah's as they lay in bed together, or the slow, slow zooms in
to Fielding's face as he begins to crack, amplified by the slow,
brooding electronic score which runs through all of Gordon's films.
        The deliberately disorienting movement of the story from past to
present and dwelling on smaller beats in-between takes us through an
emotional arc we're not used to in our expectation of a story.  I wish
more films adopted this collage approach, allowing each small piece to
build until we have a vivid picture which throws a more accurate
reflection of the life we know than the standard three act formula
plot.  Think about it: How our memories guide and define our actions
today, and how the implications of our days past affect our moral
choices now.
        By the time Gordon has reached his penultimate scene, we've had a
staggering journey through a person's life, and a small moment of
clarity that may not be easy, or even what we want, but it sums up
Sarah's point made earlier in the film.  "Some people fulfill their
dream, and that's a pity. Then there are some people who find what
they're meant to do."
Director: Keith Gordon
Producer: Keith Gordon, Stuart Kleinman, Linda Reisman
Writer: Robert Dillon, Keith Gordon
Starring: Billy Crudup, Jennifer Connelly, Janet McTeer, Molly Parker,
Hal Holbrook
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/2d0168c1c1ad76b588256949000fbb3f?OpenDocument
In a small, poverty-stricken Chinese village in the high plains, a
substitute teacher (thirteen year old Wei Minzhi) is placed in charge of
a class of younger, unruly peasant children for one month. She's in over
her head, since she only knows how to sing half of a song and copy
lessons left by old Teacher Gao, who instructed her on how to conserve
chalk by writing big enough for the children to see, but not too big as
to waste it. Considering the state of the crumbling stone hut which
functions as a schoolhouse and the lack of books and reading materials,
chalk is a precious commodity to be prized and respected.
        More importantly, Gao implores her to keep watch over the children and
not let them run away from school to go work in the nearby city. He
wants every student to still be there when he returns. "Not one less,"
he instructs, quietly, and agrees to pay her a little extra out of his
own pocket if need be. Most deals among adults and children are
negotiated in such a way, and even the classroom children understand and
value the power of currency. Such is the life of rags and poverty.
        Wei is not a particularly good teacher, neither patient nor readily
outspoken. She mostly leaves the kids to their own devices. Free rein is
given to the mischievous, ever grinning class clown (Zhang Huike,) who
would be a holy terror were it not for that adorable, toothy smile and a
barely detectable sense of decency underneath the relentless prankster.
        It's a battle of wills between Teacher Wei and Student Zhang, who
actually drives her into action and forces her to take some small touch
of effort and responsibility in the dynamics of class control. However,
after a particularly striking confrontation over another child's diary,
the little Zhang runs away to make a living sweating in cheap
restaurants and laundromats in the city. Teacher Wei has to make good on
her promise to Teacher Gao, following this boy not much younger than she
into a strange city, trying to bring him home. Of course, first she has
to get enough money for bus fare in a poor village, and proceeds to
extorting the kids. "Who has money? Put it on the desk!" she says. The
kids, wise to her, say they don't have any, even if they do.
        In a recent interview, director Zhang Yimou remarked that in his
research for this project, he kept encountering children who had no
access to education, without schoolbooks or teachers with drive or
experience. While not based on a true story, though it seems it could
be, he cast nonprofessional actors who live in such a village.
All the children and some of the adults (the crooked mayor, the old
schoolteacher, the city townspeople) use their real names. This makes
the film feel like a documentary. Zhang Yimou shot it in such a way
(with the cameras kept hidden and unobtrusive) to allow these untrained
performers room to simply behave naturally. It's a wonderful conceit.
        A poem of the rituals of these lives with a keen understanding of the
social and political forces at work, the film and characters received
instant empathy from international audiences. Teacher Wei and the
charismatic Student Zhang may not be perfect - they are kids after all,
with all the good and bad which that implies - but they are genuinely
likeable, even lovable. They're in a situation that you'd have to have a
heart of stone not to care about.
        Though it never teeters into sentimentality, Not One Less inspires
genuine tears and laughter. It serves as a reminder of how much blind,
stubborn courage and resolve can possibly accomplish. It doesn't play
out as phony as the documentary eye keeps the events truthful and
genuine. It manages to make the audience think and feel very much
without playing out as an easy crowd pleaser. It's a great film, one
which set the year of movies in 2000 off to a powerful start.
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Aberdeen (2000)
Call it a road trip for the walking wounded.  Stellan Skarsgĺrd plays
such a convincingly zombified drunken loser that it's difficult to spend
nearly two hours of screen time in his smelly, boozed-out presence.  Yet
this ever-reliable Swedish actor adds depth and significance to the
otherwise plodding and forgettable Aberdeen, a sentimental and painfully
mundane European drama.
Playwright August Strindberg built his career on families and
relationships paralyzed by secrets, unable to express their longings
until the hour is far too late.  That's an accurate reflection of what
Aberdeen strives for, focusing on the pairing of an alcoholic father,
Tomas (Skarsgĺrd) and his alienated, openly hostile yuppie daughter,
Kaisa (Lena Headey, Gossip).  They haven't spoken in years, and wouldn't
even be making the long trip from Norway to Aberdeen, Scotland by
automobile if it weren't for Kaisa's mother (Charlotte Rampling, Under
the Sand) rotting away in a hospital bed from cancer.
In a soap opera twist, mother has only a few days to live.  (Only in the
movies, right?)  Too blitzed to even step foot on a plane, Tomas hits
the open road with Kaisa.  Loathing each other all the while, they make
periodic stops for Tomas to puke on the dashboard or pass out --
whenever he isn't muttering what a rotten kid she turned out to be. 
Despite his sloshed viewpoint, Tomas recognizes that the apple hasn't
fallen very far from the tree.  Kaisa gets nosebleeds from snorting
coke, sabotages her personal relationships through indifference, and is
unable to restrain her quick and vindictive temper.  Ain't they a pair?
Unable to find true notes of unspoken familial empathy in the one-note
and repetitively bitchy dialogue, screenwriters Kristin Amundsen and
Hans Petter Moland fabricate a series of contrivances to propel events
forward -- lost money, roving street hooligans looking for drunks to
kick around, nosy cops, and flat tires all figure into the schematic and
convenient narrative.  By the time they reach the hospital, it's time to
unveil the Secrets From A Dark Past that are not only simplistic devices
that trivialize the father-daughter conflict, they're also the mainstays
of many a bad Strindberg wannabe.  This revelation exists purely for its
own sake.  Aberdeen doesn't know where else to go.
Weak, unimaginative casting thwarts the pivotal role of Kaisa.  If Lena
Headey were a stronger actress, perhaps Aberdeen could have been able to
coast on the performances and moody, haunting cinematography (rendering
Norway into its own pastoral ghost world -- the reference to a certain
superior American indie flick intentional).  Headey's too busy acting,
using her face and furrowed brow to convey every last twitch of
insouciance.  If she were paying any attention to Skarsgĺrd, maybe she'd
figure out that doing less can reveal so much more.
It's worthwhile to compare Aberdeen to an earlier film released in 2001,
Jonathan Nossiter's captivating Signs & Wonders.  It's not just because
Skarsgĺrd and Rampling played disturbed parental figures in both films
(they're not bound by ceremonial wedlock in Aberdeen).  The differences
in the way their characters were presented is significant.  In Aberdeen,
Rampling is a luminous diva, preening and static in her hospital bed. 
Despite Skarsgĺrd's solid performance as Tomas, his pathetic drunk is
never given much of a chance to emote anything besides catatonic
sorrow.  There's genuine ferocity and sexually charged frisson during
their understated confrontations in Signs & Wonders, allowing them to
suggest a gray zone of complications that accompany torn romance and
years of stifled curiosity.
Nossiter's film thoroughly explores this neurotic territory in addition
to delving into the Americanization of Greece and the use of mysticism
as an illusion to deflect pain.  If Signs & Wonders sometimes feels
overloaded with ideas, at least it's willing to stretch beyond what
we've come to expect from traditional drama.  Aberdeen is never half so
ambitious, content to sleepwalk through the rhythms and timing of other
movies.  When did character driven stories stop paying attention to the
complexities of real life?  The depressing answer can be found in
Lawrence Kasdan's trite but occasionally useful Grand Canyon, where
Steve Martin's Hollywood mogul pronounces, "All of life's riddles are
answered in the movies!"  Even foreign films are taking that advice to
heart.
Director: Hans Petter Moland
Producer: Petter J. Borgli
Writer: Kristin Amundsen, Hans Petter Moland
Starring: Stellan Skarsgĺrd, Lena Headey, Ian Hart, Charlotte Rampling
http://www.norsk-film.no/aberdeen/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Series 7: The Contenders (2001)
Lock and Load: Daniel Minahan Broadcasts Series 7
A feature story by Jeremiah Kipp - Copyright Š 2001 filmcritic.com
Series 7 may be the antidote for anyone disturbed by the onslaught of
reality TV shows, spearheaded by Survivor and The Real World.  As an
assault on cultural indifference, this new feature co-produced by the
fearless Christine Vachon and her company, Killer Films (Safe, Kids,
Boys Don't Cry), pits six contenders against each other on a nightmarish
syndicated game show.  The object: Kill or be killed until only one
survivor remains.
Writer/Director Daniel Minahan (co-writer of Mary Harron's I Shot Andy
Warhol) took great pains not to play it as science fiction, making the
film feel "like the world we live in, but taken to the point of
absurdity.  The more vague I kept it, the creepier it would be."  We
caught up with Minahan on the afternoon before Series 7 opens wide to
theaters everywhere (March 16, 2001) after a successful limited release
in metropolitan art-houses.  Will audiences respond to the laser sharp
accuracy of this pitch-black comedy, or will Series 7 strike too close
to home?
You could have gone in many different directions with the title.  How
did you choose Series 7?
I wanted something that sounded sexy and mysterious, that would suggest
that this show had been around for a while, and that had a number in
it.  So my editor, Malcolm Jamieson, came up with Series 7, and I
thought it was great.
I thought your cast found the right stylized note.  Could you describe
the rehearsal process?
We experimented a lot.  First, we watched shows and tried imitating TV
stuff.  We tried improvisation, but that kinda seemed like just, well,
actors improvising.  Finally, the breakthrough came when - it sounds
really obvious, but when Brooke (Smith) called me after watching tapes I
had given her of The Real World or some show.  And she said, "These
people are just acting."  The idea was that people on these shows play
the part they think they're supposed to play.  Oh, she's the Bitch. 
He's the Uptight Born-Again Christian.  As it turns out, all I needed to
do was remind people that there was a camera in the room, and that it
would be a character in Series 7.  That naturally gave the performances
the self-consciousness that I wanted.
I also concentrated on paring down the dialogue.  I took out a lot of
exposition that felt more like a film than a documentary or TV show.  We
would play out a scene and I'd say, "Well, this is something I could
handle in voice-over, this is something the show would explain."  I
tried to make it as colloquial as possible.
Was there any struggle with your actors feeling exploited by this
material?
Yeah, it became especially interesting during the interviews [used
throughout the film].  The best way was interviewing the actors in
character.  The scenes were scripted, but I found they seemed contrived
when we shot them that way.  So I said, "Tell me in your own words."  I
would press them to get the response and cover the material that I
wanted.  It was like I was the producer of this horrible TV show that
was torturing these poor people.  Connie (the killer nurse, played by
Marylouise Burke) seems to be the villain of the piece, but it's really
the producers of the show.
Did this make you feel self-conscious?
Well, it was weird.  Brooke would become very defiant and I'd be, like,
"Are you mad at me?" (laughs)
It made me really happy to see Brooke Smith in the lead role.  She's got
to be one of the best-kept secrets in the industry...
How early was she brought into the project?
Very early.  I wrote the script in 1995 and sent it to Brooke in '96. 
We workshopped Series 7 together in the Sundance Directors Lab.  Most of
my experience had been on documentaries, so it became important to
really work on the more emotional scenes, like the reunion of Dawn
(Smith) and Jeff (Glenn Fitzgerald).  My experience with Brooke was a
high learning curve for me - and I love the whole collaborative process
of working with actors.  It's amazing to me what they can do.
Is it true that the name Dawn Legarto (Brooke's character) was based on
a childhood friend of yours?
Yeah, it was the girl who lived two doors down from me in Danbury, CT.
She hasn't seen Series 7 yet, no, but she's been following it.  I
contacted her and asked her if we could use the name, letting her know
the character was not based on her in any way.  And she thought it was
hilarious!  Like, "Yeah!"  Besides, she's not actually called Dawn
Legarto anymore.  She got married, so she's safe.
And as far as we could tell, she's the only Dawn Legarto.  It's a very
unusual name - it means "lizard" in Portuguese.
Could you describe the process of shooting Series 7?  How did your
background producing tabloid newsmagazine shows for Fox contribute to
the "look" of the film?
Well, that had a lot to do with it.  My Director of Photography [Randy
Drummond] and I set out specific rules for ourselves: How we should
shoot everything, what kind of lighting setups we should use and when. 
Our whole approach was to run the scenes in their entirety, allowing
room to "discover" things with the camera during long takes.  We didn't
want to break it down into coverage as found in a normal movie.  Through
doing this, we would end up blocking the scenes in an organic way.
The trick was getting the actors not to play to the camera, since they
were supposed to be untrained.  I would say, "No, don't turn your face
toward the lens.  Just walk down the street.  We'll do the work.  Don't
worry about it."  We were loosening it up a little, gaining their
trust.  In most film acting, the performer colors it all in, pretending
the camera's not there.  In our approach, it's about letting it be
present and keeping it real.
You had a tight production schedule, but you also worked with a really
small crew.  Did that help?
We tried to keep it as intimate as possible.  I didn't want a huge
production apparatus because (a) I wanted to move quickly, and (b) I
wanted this to feel more like a documentary, which I was more familiar
with.  I think people felt like it was a quiet set, not a big, chaotic,
paramilitary machine.
You have these great teaser commercials peppered throughout -
They were indicated in the script, but we decided to add more.  After we
had a cut of the film where the story was in shape and it was working,
we brought in this TV promo producer named Jason Bowers.  He packaged
the whole thing for us (as he would for a real TV show) and re-arranged
it into a three-episode marathon.  It was really interesting to work
with him as he finessed what would ultimately become our "frame." 
Without the promos, it was just a weird, existential documentary - a
lugubrious meditation on Reality TV.  (laughs)  Yeah, before pushing it
more and more toward tabloid, it was a real downer.
Was your hometown of Danbury, Connecticut receptive to Series 7 being
shot there?
We had to notify the police because we were using firearms, but they
were very cooperative.  We were also very low-key.  I knew I didn't want
that sort of "Local Boy Done Good" news story.  If anyone got hold of
this script, it would have been very easy to misrepresent: "Oh my God -
what is this?  Shut 'em down!"
During production, we borrowed locations from the people of Danbury,
which you can do approximately once before people realize their house
will be completely trashed.
It's amazing that they actually let you stage domestic combat scenes in
their living rooms!
Yeah, I know!  It's nuts! (laughs) I would never let a film crew into my
apartment!
Connie's house was actually my mother's best friend's condo.  Her house
was so full of antique collections that I would tell everyone, "Take
your shoes off!  No drinking in the house - use coasters!  Don't get any
blood on the floor!"  And, of course, this is the house that gets
completely boarded up.  Brooke has to come and tear all the plywood
down, then she's stalking through the house and kicking open the doors. 
After the first take I told her, "Brooke - y'know, take it easy!  This
is my aunt's house!"
She said, "Omigod, I thought the art department brought all this!" and I
was like, "NO!"
What is your response to the idea that satirizing a TV show is
redundant?  Is it possible to be too retro (i.e., a satire of a satire)?
I think when people say that, they want to feel "smarter" than Series 7
- which, as a movie, really brings you down to its own level.  Anybody
who wants to feel that way will probably have that reaction.  It's like
watching professional wrestling: You've got to go with it, you've got to
play along.  That's part of the fun.
When I created Series 7, I was thinking of shows like Cops and The Real
World.  Now, I don't think there's anything satirical about these
shows.  Maybe people who get stoned before watching them might think
they're satiresbut that's a little bit too complicated for me!
(laughs)  I do think I would watch these shows and find something funny
about them, but I don't even see Survivor as a satire.  Nothing Swiftian
there - it's just corny!
You mentioned that Series 7 is also a commentary on the media's power to
invade privacy.  Obviously, the world you present is a satire, but what
are your concerns for the future of privacy rights?
To me, invasion of privacy is a form of violence.  I'm very ambivalent
about it.  Having produced this stuff, I know the power of bringing a
camera into somebody's house.  People will do almost anything you ask
when you're there with a camera crew.  Now, it would be puritanical of
me to point a finger and say, "This is a bad thing," because people are
complicit with it.  But I do hope Series 7 points out that antisocial
aspect - the brutality of these shows.
My friend was troubled by Series 7.  He thought the audiences were
laughing at the characters.
I don't know - I found the characters to be very sympathetic and
endearing.  I mean, they're brutalized by this TV show, but there are
several moments where the truth slips out.  The humor points out the
hypocrisy of what is being presented as "reality."  I don't think people
with cancer are funny, but if I can pinpoint how these people are
exploited, the presentation can be ironic.
What do you think causes people to become desensitized to violence?
I don't think people are really desensitized to violence.  If they are
(to real violence, as opposed to cinematic or make-believe violence), it
has to do with the fact that the most popular form of entertainment
right now is following O.J. Simpson or Woody Allen - taking real
people's lives and presenting them as a form of entertainment.  This
blurs the boundaries of public and private life.
Yeah.  The next thing on my plate is a psychological thriller, but one
of the things I'm pitching in the upcoming weeks is Series 8 as a
limited TV series (3 episodes).  I think it would be a blast to see on
TV.
Cable, definitely.  You know, "too hot for TV!"
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Ballad of Ramblin' Jack, The (2000)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://a.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/bd7281de2f9dea768825693d0014ea8b?OpenDocument
One of the biggest surprises at the Sundance Film Festival was debut
filmmaker Aiyana Elliott's documentary portrait of her cantankerous folk
singer dad, The Ballad of Ramblin' Jack. It was curious to see how well
the audience responded to this deeply personal, lyrical film of lonesome
highways and tough talking cowboys.
Aiyana Elliott previously made an impression on the festival circuit
with her ferocious short, Tough, which offered a strong visual
sensibility influenced by the washed out look of the golden era of '70s
filmmaking. She knew how to truthfully portray a modern dysfunctional
family, with naturalistic performances and startlingly honest dialogue,
a unit whose means of communication is handled through shouting. It's
not surprising to see that these themes continue in her current feature.
If Ms. Elliott's documentary fares less well, it's perhaps because her
instincts are stronger as a narrative filmmaker with control over the
subject matter and, perhaps, autobiographical implications. The fact is,
her dad doesn't really like to talk about herself. He flagrantly shows
his lack of connection and wary affection. At nearly two hours, the film
is too long, and Jack Elliott rambles and evades to the point where we
genuinely "get it" after an hour or so. From then on, The Ballad of
Ramblin' Jack seems redundant.
Aiyana Elliott makes herself a character in the film, along for the ride
during a Midwest tour and chronicling her daddy's life on the way.
Ramblin' Jack was a big folk singer I'd never heard of. Bob Dylan was
his pupil, and he was apparently a huge influence on the Rolling Stones,
Dylan and other rock/folk performers.  Kris Kristofferson and Arlo
Guthrie are among the celebrities waxing philosophical about Ramblin'
jack, usually saying that they never saw someone speak so well about
absolutely worthless horseshit.
There's a personal history unfolding, breaking through the '50s into the
beatnik era and the swinging '60s, to the trippy '70s style which
influences the entire movie.  Aiyana Elliott tries to get sun flare in
almost every shot which tracks down the desolate patches of road and
field in the heartland of America.
The interviews have a range from the honest to the superficial, which
you'll find in many documentaries. When people try to get into the depth
of Jack's persona or personality, it feels pretty thin and rote. Still,
Aiyana Elliott is able to capture the gravity of silences, when people
aren't sure what to say. There's a brilliant sequence where she asks her
mom how good of a husband and father he was, and she can't answer for a
good minute, trying to control her fits of laughter.
There's a wonderful, definitive moment where Aiyana and her dad are
driving around trying to find the first house she lived in. It's
important for her, a touch of personal nostalgia, and he can't find it.
He finally gives up after having promised her to track it down. He's a
pill, even a bit of a prick. Boy, does he annoy Aiyana onscreen, but the
moment plays out sad and funny.
That's the tone of The Ballad of Ramblin' Jack, which earns the moment
where Jack sings a lonely tune for his daughter at the last concert.
He's too mean to be sentimental, but the heartstrings get tugged
nonetheless.
Director: Aiyana Elliott
Producer: Aiyana Elliott, Paul S. Mezey, Dan Partland
Writer: Aiyana Elliott, Rick Dahl
Starring: Jack Elliott, Aiyana Elliott, Kris Kristofferson, Arlo Guthrie
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Session 9 (2001)
The Brad Anderson Sessions: On Session 9 and Happy Accidents 
A feature story by Jeremiah Kipp - Copyright Š 2001 filmcritic.com
Brad Anderson's character-driven horror film Session 9 charts the
deteriorating mental states of a waste management team as they clear out
an abandoned, dilapidated asylum.  Shot in and around an actual
Victorian-era mental hospital in Danvers, Massachusetts, it remains
ambivalent whether some supernatural manifestation of evil is taking
over these men and forcing them to inflict physical and psychological
damage upon each other.  It could be all in their minds, the stress of
dead-end lives catching up with them.  Over the course of a single week,
their lines of defense gradually break down.
It's a paranoid creepshow that takes itself seriously, going for genuine
dread rather than the postmodern riffs on the slasher genre we've become
accustomed to.  Anderson's style may seem revolutionary if you're only
familiar with Scream or I Know What You Did Last Summer (not to mention
their seemingly endless knock-offs), but it actually recalls spooky
classics from the 70's and early 80's.  Don't Look Now and Stanley
Kubrick's The Shining are cited as obvious references, but there are
echoes of Invasion of the Body Snatchers, Dawn of the Dead, The
Exorcist, and John Carpenter's The Thing.  I run through this makeshift
laundry list only because if you're a fan of those particular movies,
you really ought to check out Session 9.  More frightening and mature
than The Blair Witch Project, it's enough to bolster new hope for the
horror genre.
Anderson was open to discussing Session 9's upcoming release (August 10)
with filmcritic.com during the press junket held at the Regency Hotel in
NYC.  Session 9 cast members Josh Lucas and Stephen Gevedon (who
co-wrote the screenplay with Anderson) also shared their thoughts on the
film.  Anderson also brooked philosophical about Happy Accidents, his
long delayed (and quite enjoyable) romantic comedy about a girl who
falls for a guy who claims to be from the future.  Picked up by IFC
Films, Happy Accidents will be in limited release starting August 24.
filmcritic.com: Let's talk about Session 9.
Brad Anderson: With Session 9, we weren't going for jolts (things
jumping out of closets and stuff) as much as we were creating an
atmosphere of dread or menace that lives with you.  These faux-horror
movies made nowadays are much more "teen thrillers" in my mind.  We
didn't want to use kid actors in our movie.  Besides Brendan (Sexton
III), we used older guys! (claps Gevedon on the shoulder, laughs)
Is it significant that the main characters are all men, or a certain
working-class type of man?  There are no central women characters.
BA: That was a conscious effort on my part.  At least two of my three
movies prior to this could be described as women's pictures.  Part of my
reason for Session 9 was to break out, to destroy the illusion of me as
"Mr. Romantic Comedy Guy."  The idea of making a movie focused on this
crew of guys was really appealing.
Josh Lucas: The script had a very classy element of something you very
rarely see in this culture, which was a group of working class men.  For
these struggling guys, the idea about the American Dream (prosperity and
wealth) doesn't necessarily exist.  It's fascinating to see them put
into circumstances where some horror elements emerge.  I became
interested because it was a very different take on the genre, and also
because I knew they had Peter Mullan (playing Gordon).
BA: I think the thing that drew Peter to the project was that he saw
Gordon's story as a tragedy.  A man from overseas comes to this country
to pursue the American dream, is trying to keep his own business afloat,
and is struggling with the stress of having a new baby and being a
father.  All of these things are impinging on him at once and he's about
to snap.  Unlike most horror movies in this day and age, the horror is
around the edges.  It's largely interior for Gordon.
Session 9 can be interpreted in different ways.  You can get the sense
that Gordon breathes in an evil spirit, but can also be read as a much
more clinical movie that shows a man who becomes unhinged, or may be
going mad.  An inspiration was Nicolas Roeg's Don't Look Now.  That's a
really good horror movie.  What we drew from that movie was the place
(the back alleys of Venice) being so instrumental in creating the tone. 
Donald Sutherland's character is realizing that he has the gift of
clairvoyance, trying to figure out a mystery, and at the end of the day
figures out that he himself is the center of that mystery.  Peter Weir's
The Last Wave ends the same way!  It's the most awful epiphany that you
can have!
Josh, your character (Hank) has a monologue midway through the movie
about the way these men deal with stress.  Did that strike a chord with
you as an actor?
JL: Yeah, absolutely.  While making the movie, it was a little more
intimate than usual.  The core group of actors sat around every night to
talk about those things.  It's a low-budget movie, not easy to make by
any means, made wicked fast with huge chunks of filmmaking (not
necessarily dialogue, either) to achieve on a given day.  There is the
question of how to handle it.  I wondered how these characters handled
themselves, too, because they come from such a different space.  There's
no passion in what they do.  It's pure survival.
Go with me here for a second and let me know what you think.  Of the
five guys, I thought Hank was most alone in some ways.  Pete (David
Caruso) is the manager and has his crew, Mike (Gevedon) is the college
guy who everyone seems to like and respect, and Jeff (Sexton) and Gordon
(Mullan) are family.  Hank doesn't have anything besides his dream of
winning the lottery.  Even when he's home, he's seen watching television
not interacting with his girlfriend.  Do you think that contributes to
his character, or am I entirely off the mark here?
JL: No, you're right.  It's a fascinating comment and I agree.  Hank
isn't even attached to someone like his boss, Pete, who seems to be a
really good man.  He's truly at a point where he just doesn't care and
will do anything to get out of his situation.  That's just an amazing
place to be in your life.  He's the person who has nothing.  When you
start to do that, you want to take from other people.  "I want to make
you feel the same way."  That's what really happened when he stole
Pete's girlfriend.  It has nothing to do with her at all.  His
loneliness is so acute that he will screw over his friends.
Session 9 was obviously built around this very creepy location (and it
seemed like you could point the camera in any direction and get a good
shot).
BA: I had been to the Danvers State Hospital before, since I used to
live in Boston and always thought it would make a remarkable setting for
a horror movie.  There's asbestos everywhere, floors are caving in,
ceilings are collapsing, everything's cold and damp -- exactly the way
we present it in Session 9.
Stephen Gevedon: Once it starts getting overcast, the place gets dark
very quick, even in the upstairs buildings where the windows aren't
boarded up.  It's a pretty dangerous place.
BA: Steve and I went up there last spring and had a chance to explore.
SG: Let's just call a spade a spade.  We broke in.  It's lucky we didn't
get caught.  We wandered around and discovered many of the movie's
setpieces (like Jeff wandering around in the underground tunnel) from
that first visit.
BA: We found all sorts of creepy medical instruments and a
straightjacket and stuff.  
We also got a sense of the asylum's history.  Even if you're a very
skeptical person about the supernatural, that place is so emotionally
heavy.  Hundreds of thousands of people were wrongfully committed and
lived out their lives locked in these tiny little rooms that they call
"seclusions".  It's tragic.  Even in the pauper's cemetery [seen in the
movie when Gordon wanders off alone to make a desperate phone call to
his wife], the patients didn't even have the courtesy of having their
names placed on the numbered headstones.  It was like throwing them into
a mass grave. 
How did you research the taped sessions that Mike discovers (between a
doctor and a woman with multiple personality disorder)?
BA: I did some research into multiple personality disorder and found
some transcripts online.  (I'm telling ya, you can find everything
online!)  These transcripts were not that different from what you see in
the movie.  In an instant, the patient would make a switch from one
multiple personality to the next.  Her voice and entire personality
would change while the doctor was listening and asking questions.  Even
reading about it is creepy.
How did you determine the "look" of Happy Accidents, your other movie
coming out this August? Were you going for something otherworldly
because of the science fiction angle or did you have something else in
mind?
BA: Since the story felt conceptual and had a high-concept sci-fi twist,
I wanted the look to be very raw and real.  With that in mind, I
purposefully shot hand-held with 35mm cameras.  I've done that with all
my other films (except for Session 9, which has a more formal
approach.)  It's a little bit documentary-style, which probably evolved
out of my early interest in non-fiction film.
What did you see in Vincent D'Onofrio's audition? It's a role that seems
open to different interpretations.  
BA: Part of it was Vince's ability to transform himself into whatever
the role may require.  He had to be a guy who might be mentally ill,
walking the thin line where he could be insane or potentially
dangerous.  Vince had those qualities but was also can be incredibly
endearing and sweet, with a sort of boyish charm.  He's a chameleon.
It was also fun to cast him against type.  Aside from maybe Mystic Pizza
or a couple others I don't think he's has done much in the way of
comedy.  He's not some movie matinee idol.  Vince (as Sam) and Marisa
Tomei (who plays Ruby) are a goofy couple!  He's this big, lumbering guy
and she's this sweet, petite woman.  You don't see that in movies! 
Everyone's always so perfectly paired, so I thought this was a chance to
break down some of the more obvious romantic comedy conventions.  If
this were a studio picture, they would never cast Vince.  They would
probably cast Josh Hartnett!  That doesn't interest me.  If you're
making a smaller movie, you're almost obligated to do something
unexpected and surprising.
Could we talk about your use of specific cities?  Next Stop Wonderland
was Bahhhston -
Yeah, and Happy Accidents is New York.  Do you think shooting in
different cities lends a unique character to the movies you work on?
BA: Yeah, up until this point I've pretty much written about the things
I know or places I know.  With Boston, certainly, you could say, as the
producer of Next Stop Wonderland likes to describe it, "a valentine to
Boston." (laughs) Whatever that means!
Happy Accidents is somehow imbued more with the chaos of New York --
these crazy people you meet on the street who might be time travelers. 
Or, as in the last scene, it's about the traffic and noise and madness
of this city (which is a wonderful thing but could also drive you
nuts.)  I had moved here from Boston around the time that I worked on
that script and was still a newbie fascinated by New York and all the
big buildings.
You do this thing in the movie which is kinda cool -- I guess you would
call it "memory photos" or something, done with stills --
Am I being pretentious to ask if that was inspired by Chris Marker's La
Jetee, or what?
(laughs) I've heard that referenced so many times, but I haven't seen
the movie! I know what you're saying, though.  No, those little
sequences were described in the script as visions of the future by way
of Ruby's imagination.  It's Sam telling her what the future is like,
why he came back, and all that.  He's sharing with her this stuff and
she's looking at him like, "You're insane."
As Ruby is describing this stuff to her friend, we're seeing all these
strange images.  It was kept expressionistic. I didn't want these
"glimpses of the future" to be grounded in realism because we want to
keep guessing: is Sam a nut or is he from another time?
Originally, we were gonna play into the stupid sci-fi clichés of time
travel, all these green-screen images of Sam sitting on a weird
mountaintop against a purple sky.  Since I didn't have the budget, I
decided instead to take actual still images from the movie itself to
vaguely illustrate what Sam was describing.  The other very subtle thing
was that all the images in these sequences are actually from later
sequences so in some ways they actually are images from the future (of
the movie).
I promise not to bring up La Jetee again.
BA: Hey, man, compare the movie to as many classics as you want! 
Do you consider Happy Accidents science fiction?
No.  I consider it a kitchen sink dramatic romance.  The sci-fi angle is
really a twist.  The initial premise was to do a very simple
relationship movie.  Then it was trying to think what could be the most
absurd monkey-wrench that could screw it all up.  What could be
something that one of the people reveals about themselves that could
throw everything off?  I'm from the future, or I'm an alien, or I'm gay,
or whatever the revelation might be between the two partners.
The problem actually becomes the very thing that keeps the relationship
interesting.  You don't fall in love with someone because they're
perfect and meet your requirements -- you fall for the things that are
different about them or even problematic.  If you're in love with the
perfect person, that's gonna be over the moment the sex starts becoming
routine.
Ruby's character is against the wall.  How's she gonna react to this? 
The logical, most obvious response would be to immediately kick this guy
out onto the street, but the fact that she holds on to him is an
indication of her way to deal with these kinds of relationships.  She
tries to "fix" men, so she sees it as a challenge.  I've known some
women like that in my life, not that I'm a problem that needs to be
fixed! (laughs)
Sam is very articulate about time travel.  Did you do any homework or
was it all just fancy?
BA: It was a combination of both.  Once again, I did a lot of research
online!  You can find all these wacky internet people who genuinely
believe they're from the future.  I read books about time travel theory,
just to get into the meat of it.  In Happy Accidents, if you go back
into time, you don't simply replicate the exact series of events that
lead to your future.  It's not pre-determined.  You go back into time
and the moment you arrive wherever you arrive, your actions then begin
to bud off and create a new line, which is a parallel universe.  There
could be an infinite number of parallel universes!
As for all of Sam's kooky descriptions of the future, those were somehow
found deep in the recesses of my imagination.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Pola X (1999)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/a07fa6bc7e25816d882569580004893c?OpenDocument
When I left the theater, an angry woman was berating her boyfriend for
dragging her to another one of those films, to which I assume she meant
a pompous French soap opera. Furthermore, she didn't understand what the
title had to do with anything. Seems she didn't read the press release,
which the theater was kind enough to dole out. Pola X is a French
acronym of the Hermann Melville novel on which this film is based (and
shakily updated to modern times): Pierre, Or, the Ambiguities. The X
stands for the tenth draft of the screenplay which writer/director Leos
Carax completed.
While the title, Pola X, certainly has a nice ring to it, it stands
representative of everything Carax's movie is: all flash, pointless
trickery, grating snobbery and, ultimately, no more substance than a
private joke only one person finds amusing.
As with most soap operas, the lead character, Pierre (lanky Guillaume
Depardieu, son of Gerard) is an affluent, slightly tormented and wholly
beautiful young writer who stays with his Oedipal mother, Marie
(Catherine Deneuve, adding a touch of elegance) on her lavish estate
near the banks of the Seine. He is happy enough riding around on his
motorcycle through the countryside, sitting on the hills, and enjoying
sunsets with his fiancée (Delphine Chuillot) and living the life of a
spoiled dilettante.
The cinematography by Eric Gautier is luscious, painted in golden
sunsets and the rich creamy whites of sheets and elegant tablecloths. As
Pierre and his mother coast through their lazy days, there's comfort to
be found in the crisp images of a fine chateau, or freshly trimmed grass
being watered by ominous sprinklers. This beauty gives way to a bleak,
bleached, Dickensian look when Pierre encounters a homeless stranger
(Yekaterina Golubyova) with a haunted expression in her eyes and a thick
Russian accent. This simple woman claims to be his sister, Isabelle.
In the longest scene in the film, the one which director Leos Carax
claims inspired him to shoot Pola X, this mysterious woman leads Pierre
deep into a fairy tale inspired by some tangled wood and spins a long,
slow dramatic monologue about her life of misery and squalor.
Golubyova's slow, mannered delivery was difficult to follow and my
attention continually wavered, but the plot thankfully marched on
thereafter.
To right the wrongs of his father, Pierre abandons his old life and runs
away with Isabelle to a life of filthy hovels, dirty apartments and art
communes with a strange John Zorn-experimental rock group in a cavernous
warehouse. They are accompanied by a vagrant mother, her precocious
"cute" little daughter (who tells passers-by that they stink -- ain't it
cute?) and Scott Walker's rousing score of lush violins.
"All my life," he whispers with vigor, "I've waited for something that
would push me beyond all this." Feeling as though he has never had any
true experiences in life, he throws himself into writing his Great Book
of Truths while sleeping with Isabelle in extended, fleshy sex scenes.
The body doubles are working overtime, as Leos Carax leaves no orifice
unturned. He'll go to any lengths to push the buttons of his audience,
though it seems to play merely for shock value alone.
Pola X has a terrific look to it. The homeless scenes seem inspired by
Mike Leigh's Naked, and Guillaume Depardieu, in his all-black attire,
long coat, and scraggly beard bears more than a passing resemblance to
an angry David Thewlis. Unfortunately, the story is an annoying mass of
manipulative contrivances involving Grand Drama, such as the main
character's descent into madness, the severe illness of another major
character a la Camille, accidents, suicide, children in peril, incest,
family secrets hidden behind a stone wall, and revelatory speeches.
These elements are more fitting of an opera than a motion picture.
Director Leos Carax sprinkles on some images that scream art-house
indulgence, such as a dream sequence where characters spiral naked down
a waterfall of blood. Despite his title, there's nothing ambiguous in
that at all. Excessive in every way, Pola X flounders and drowns in its
own melodrama.
Director: Leos Carax
Producer: Bruno Pesery
Writer: Leos Carax, Lauren Sedofsky, Jean-Pol Fargeau
Starring: Guillaume Depardieu, Katerina Golubeva, Catherine Deneuve,
Delphine Chuillot, Laurent Lucas
http://www.pola-x.com/index2.html
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Dungeons & Dragons (2000)
        You know you're in big trouble when halfway through a movie you ask
yourself, "What would be better?  Sitting through the rest of this
garbage or receiving a scratch to the retina?"  Ultimately, the question
is moot, since both are examples of ocular mayhem.
        The impulse as you sit through Dungeons & Dragons is to close your
eyes, thereby shielding yourself from those atrocious computer-generated
zooming up and down gaudily-colored castles and cloud-capped palaces. 
Unfortunately, the sound design is so brutal with those sharp rings as
swords clash, glitter dust swirls, and magic spells go WHOOSH that sleep
is not a viable option.
        Consider just this small aspect of the film: Why is it that the main
characters are dressed like Tolkein's rangers but sound like The Real
World, some gaudy hybrid of Conan the Barbarian and Star Wars: Episode
I?
        Indeed, it's nearly impossible to look at the young Empress Savina
(Thora Birch, American Beauty) without thinking about Natalie Portman's
headdress.  Say what you will about the George Lucas film, Portman did
manage to appear regal.  Birch, on the other hand, comes off as a
bubble-headed Valley Girl whose glib talk of equality for everyone would
fit comfortably on the stage of a high school beauty contest.
        In our opening tracking shot across the sea, while dragons fly
underfoot, we hear a ponderous voice-over throwing out strange names and
places.  We haven't been introduced to anyone yet, and I defy the viewer
to make sense of it.  What we do get is this: The Mages are attempting
to overthrow the Empire of Izmer, while the commoners struggle for equal
rights.  Profion (former Academy Award winner Jeremy Irons) seeks the
scepter to control the power of the Golden Dragons, but we also learn of
an equally powerful rod which unites the Red Dragons.  Are you with me
so far?  There's a quiz afterwards.
        It's around this time that we meet the two young thieves, Ridley
(Justin Whalin) and his silly black sidekick, Step 'n' Fetchit (Marlon
Wayans, Requiem for a Dream).  Actually, the Wayans character is called
Snails, who will sacrifice anything, even his life if need be, to save
Massah.  Spike Lee would have a field day with Wayans' bug-eyed
performance.  Of course, Wayans is bringing it on himself -- he's
clearly set up as the white man's burden and is handled as such.  His
final scene nails the coffin shut on my case.
        Ridley and Snails sneak into the inner sanctum of a wizard who has some
sort of secret scroll (another prop) that the bad guys are after.  As
the good guys set off on their adventure, they team up with a young
magician (Zoe McLellan) who never actually uses her magic -- she's too
busy waiting for the boys to rescue her.  Since Jeremy Irons only wants
to pick up his paycheck for this film, he sends the sinister Damodar
(Bruce Payne) in hot pursuit.
        Together, the thieves, the young magician, and a few other trusty
sidekicks run through a series of hoops, with the crazy kids wandering
through forests and towns, thieves' mazes, and enemy castles.  To keep
things entertaining, they never let up on their sarcastic repartee,
slapping each other high-fives.  Meanwhile, Snails ponders the immortal
question, "Massah, why do you always get to save the girl while I go
after the dwarf?"  Riddle me that, Batman!
        The sorry excuse for a plot builds up to an elaborate, if
incomprehensible, dragon war.  Buildings are smashed, swords are drawn,
and the sky runs red with blood (actually, computer generated clouds
that might have been swell in Tomb Raider but won't be fooling anyone
here).  Jeremy Irons gets to stand at the top of a tower cackling,
contorting his face, and, ultimately, destroying his career with such
aplomb that I wonder when he'll work in this town again.
        Is there anything good which can be said about Dungeons & Dragons? 
Fans of the role-playing game will be distressed as they see their
beloved world contorted into a travesty.  Those who loved the Saturday
morning cartoon will wonder why the filmmakers didn't simply use that
cute, kid-friendly story as source material.
        Everyone else out there is on their own.  Just pretend this review is a
large iron gate where, written large, are the words Abandon Hope, All Ye
Who Enter Here.
        POSTSCRIPT: There is one good thing I can say about the film, which
perhaps will be of little interest to anyone who never saw the wonderful
British sci-fi show, Doctor Who.  My boyhood hero, Tom Baker, who played
the good doctor throughout the '70s, makes a cameo appearance in D&D as
the Lord of the Elves.  It made me feel good to know that he is still
getting work.
Director: Courtney Solomon
Producer: Thomas M. Hammel, Kia Jam, Courtney Solomon
Writer: Topper Lilien, Carroll Cartwright
Starring: Justin Whalin, Marlon Wayans, Thora Birch, Zoe McLellan, Bruce
Payne, Jeremy Irons, Richard O'Brien
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!

Title
Review for Die Hard 2 (1990)
Die Hard had it all: a sympathetic hero, a wonderfully serpentine
villain, kick-ass fight scenes and shootouts (which are really hard to
make entertaining, in the glut of routine action flicks that overflow
our video racks), an enjoyably quirky supporting cast of character
actors, and dialogue you could really sink your teeth into.  ("I wanted
this to be professional.  Efficient, adroit, cooperative, not a lot to
ask.  Alas, your Mr. Takagi did not see it that way, so he won't be
joining us for the rest of his life.")  This flick was so pervasive, we
had to endure a slew of rip-offs: Die Hard at sea, Die Hard on an ocean
liner, Die Hard in a friggin' library!  OK, so they never did one in a
library, but that would be pretty funny, wouldn't it?  [Indeed they did
do it in a library: Masterminds.  -Ed.]
What a pity that Die Hard 2: Die Harder (based on the novel 58 Minutes)
falls into the trap of being just another Die Hard in Washington's
Dulles Airport.  I mean, it's kinda funny that John McClane (Bruce
Willis, having a good ol' time) acknowledges his pathetic luck.  Not
this shit again!  He's waiting for his wife's plane to land when
terrorists seize control of the airport, crashing a plane just to prove
that they'll stop at nothing.  Yes, they will stop at nothing!  Insert
an evil laugh here, and throw in a moustache twirl, why dontcha?
Bruce Willis is not to blame.  There are plenty of other movies he
destroyed with his monstrous ego, but I've always been fond of his blue
collar cop that takes a licking but keeps on ticking.  The biggest
problem is the lack of any memorable bad guys.  William Sadler plays a
sneaky Oliver North buckaroo presiding over a team of faceless
assassins, and Franco Nero is the South American dictator they're gonna
extradite (or something.)  They lack the personality of Alan Rickman's
sinister and silky Hans Gruber, who did not so much speak his lines as
purrrrr them.  They also lack the balletic grace of Alexander Godunov as
Rickman's trusty, ferocious kickboxing psycho-killer right-hand-man.  
Come to think of it, they're lacking in almost every way.  Were they
even in the movie?
No matter.  A good action scene could make it all palatable.  Ha!  Too
much to ask.  A lot of people get shot and many punches are thrown, but
there are zero memorable setpieces.  OK, so we all remember the scene
where Willis takes flight in the exploding chair, but it wasn't a
particularly effective special effect.  It calls attention to itself too
much.  LOOK AT ME!  I much preferred Willis hanging from the skyscraper
hanging on to a fire hose for dear life -- now that was a scene.  (Not
in this movie, though!  Director Renny Harlin is nothing but a well paid
hack.)  I was so bored throughout Die Hard 2, I started evaluating the
squib shots: Yes, that one looked realistic.  Hmm, that one was
extra-bloody.  Wow -- the blood looks just like ketchup in this scene.
Many of the original Die Hard cast members are back for round two,
though none of them are particularly well used.  Bonnie Bedelia frets
and pouts as Mrs. McClane, William Atherton has entirely too much screen
time as obnoxious reporter Dick Thornburg, and Reginald VelJohnson is
given a pointless cameo as donut muchin' Detective Al Powell.  New faces
fare better, including NYPD Blue regular Dennis Franz as, what else, an
obnoxious cop, and John Amos as a soft-spoken major (sent in to help
John McClane) who may have an ace up his sleeve.
There is exactly one good scene in Die Hard 2. (OK, there's some
adequate stuff, but really only one bona fide good moment.)  Poor John
McClane is forced to climb through another ventilation system.  Poor
bastard.  At least he's in on the joke.  "Just once, I'd like a regular,
normal Christmas.  A little eggnog, a fuckin' Christmas tree, a little
turkey.  But, no!  I gotta crawl around in this motherfuckin' tin can!"
Director: Renny Harlin
Producer: Charles Gordon, Lawrence Gordon, Joel Silver
Writer: Steven E. DeSouza, Doug Richardson
Starring: Bruce Willis, Bonnie Bedelia, William Atherton, Reginald
VelJohnson, Franco Nero, William Sadler, John Amos, Dennis Franz, Art
Evans, Fred Dalton Thompson
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Tremors 3: Back to Perfection (2001) (V)
Gross, to the Max: Tremors 3's Affable Michael Gross
A feature story by Jeremiah Kipp - Copyright Š 2001 filmcritic.com 
There's something empowering in watching men triumph over monsters,
which explains the popularity of Universal Studios' endless sequels to
Frankenstein, Dracula, and The Wolf Man throughout World War II.  The
cult classic Tremors, featuring a small desert community under attack by
giant killer earthworms that pop up from under the ground, could provide
the same escapist entertainment today.  Practical handymen Val and Earl
(Kevin Bacon and Fred Ward) outsmart the Graboids through refreshing use
of common sense, banding the small Nevada town of Perfection together
("This valley is just one long smorgasbord, and we have got to get
out!")
Tremors has fun with S.S. Wilson and Brent Maddock's oft-quotable
dialogue, but the most memorable scene involves two survivalists
(country singer Reba McIntire and Family Ties' namby-pamby ex-hippie dad
Michael Gross, both cast surprisingly against type) defending their
basement against a giant worm, exhausting their entire wall of
state-of-the-art rifles and ammunition in a hilarious shootout that must
last a good three-to-five minutes.  That'll teach the bastards!
Michael Gross again played the resilient Burt Gummer for Tremors II:
Aftershocks (sadly, sans Reba) and is one of the key ensemble players
during Tremors 3: Back to Perfection.  As the title implies, it's a
homecoming where many actors from the original film reprise their roles
as the eclectic, funny band of neighbors.  Once more unto the (desert)
breach they go, facing off against the mutated creatures.
filmcritic.com recently had the opportunity to chat with Gross about his
latest assault on "those little wormies."  Tremors 3 arrives
straight-to-video on October 4, 2001.
filmcritic.com: I just saw Tremors 3: Back to Perfection last night.
Michael Gross: I haven't seen it yet!  How would you compare it to parts
one [Tremors] and two [Tremors 2: Aftershocks]?
I haven't seen Tremors 2.  I really dug the first one.
My own personal opinion is that this is better than Tremors 2.  [That
movie has] some interesting stuff, but is more of a straight
action-adventure.  Tremors 3, like the original, has a little more heart
to it.
Seems like you have a real affection for these characters.
Yes.  I loved having my character's relationship with [nice guy
Perfection resident] Miguel (Tony Genaro) again, and little Mindy
(Ariana Richards), the girl with the pogo stick [from Tremors, age 10]
who's now 21, 22!
Was it odd seeing some of those actors [including Robert Jayne, 17 in
Tremors] all grown up?  I assume you haven't seen them in years.
I haven't, and it was a thrill.  Tremors was 11 years ago, and in some
ways it felt as if no time at all had passed.  Actors are, by nature,
gypsies.  One of the toughest things about our business is the
departures, but one of the nicest is the reunions.  You get together
with somebody you haven't seen for a long, long time and talk about the
old days or the fun you had on this or that project.  That's very much
how it felt here.  It was fun to catch up.  When we have a DVD version
of this, I plan to have the cast and some of the crew over at the house
to have a screening and a potluck because I like them all.
Both of the original Tremors screenwriters have had a hand in directing
the sequels, right?  S.S. Wilson directed Part 2 and then Brent Maddock
directed Part 3?
Exactly, and they are both marvelously capable for first-time directors,
among other things.  They know the material so well.  It's nice to have
a director there who you can turn to and say, "Can we tweak this line a
little bit?"  Being the director and writer, they have final authority,
but it's great to have the power right there behind the camera and there
are so few egos involved here.  It's like one great big family.  These
guys come to me every couple of years when they wanna crank out another
one.  They say, "Whaddaya think we should do?  What do you have to tell
us about Burt?"  They just trust me with the character.
One thing I must say is that although Burt's name (or my name, I should
say) is above the title this time out, I said, "You mustn't make me the
centerpiece of this thing."  Burt only works insofar as he is surrounded
by nice, normal human beings.  Like Fonzie in Happy Days, surrounded by
the Cunningham family.  He's the comic contrast.
Burt is something of a survivalist.  Do you think he's overcompensating
for something?
To be honest, I think it's abject fear.  He's a fearful paranoid.  The
beauty of their writing is if you take anything like that so far, it
becomes comical.  Anybody who takes life that seriously is, by nature,
funny.  One of the things I love about Burt is the irony that he has no
sense of humor.  That is pure comic potential right there.  In all three
movies, I have difficulty remembering a time when Burt laughed.
Yeah, when he's right about something!  It's a sarcastic smile.
What were your feelings about on-set safety, handling all those big
guns?
I have a great respect for weapons.  I'm not afraid of them.  In fact,
like anyone, I get a pure testosterone rush from them, which is why I
think they're so dangerous.  That opening sequence kills me.  Burt sits
between those antiaircraft guns blasting away [at the Graboids].  It was
deafening, my teeth were grinding, flames shot out five or six feet from
the barrel.  I collected some of the shell casings and they're about six
to eight inches long.
I'm actually a gun control person.  Someone said to me once, "Would you
want that right taken away?"  I said, "Oh, my God, yes!  Take it away
from me in a minute!  The only reason I own a gun is because I assume
everyone else in the United States does as well."
I took firearm safety courses years ago, and we had a very good safety
person with us this time.  I also find myself teaching other actors how
to handle guns, how to hand a weapon to someone else, how to accept a
weapon from someone else.  Also, I would check things three times and if
I have any doubt about anything, it doesn't happen, and everybody
respects that.
As far as guns are concerned, I've said this before regarding the
Tremors series, but one of the things I love is amidst all the armaments
Burt has, he never turn the guns on another human being.  I'm very proud
of that.  That's part of our philosophy.  In a sense, one of the series'
great appeals is it's a return to the innocence of the horror film of
the 1950s, when it was men against the monsters.  It was not men against
other men.  We're not killing each other here.  We're killing the
creatures.
A friend told me, "You can't help but love those little wormies." 
Whaddaya think?
(laughs) There's something that binds us together when we're fighting a
species other than our own.  In that respect, we see men pulling
together and not pulling apart.
Then there are the tongue-in-cheek aspects of the series, the sense of
humor.  There's a delicate balancing act between the hilarity of
characters (like Burt) and the horror of their situation.  There is an
actual threat.
What makes this sequel unique?  Do you think it answers any questions
lingering from Tremors and Tremors 2?
One of the things this has in common with the first one that I like a
lot is that you actually have a community under threat again.  In part
2, there was less of that when [returning lead actor] Fred Ward and I
are brought in to eradicate this area of Mexico where the Graboids had
invaded an oil field.  Going back to the village of Perfection was
important and this was something we'd talk about with the writers. When
the community is threatened, it's an entirely different thing.  There
are women and children involved.  There's a cross-section of people. 
That's an important theme.  So I think, to its credit, part 3 has far
more in keeping with the original Tremors.
One of the appeals is the way the monsters keep mutating.  It's not just
Godzilla coming back again.  Every time you think you have the creatures
figured out, they mutate.  In part 3, they actually have this weird body
chemistry where they're able to propel themselves by their own fire.  So
we had Graboids, Shriekers, and now we have these things referred to as
Ass Blasters! (laughs)
Do you get more people coming up to you who say they loved you in
Tremors or Family Ties?
There are a few other television movies people remember me for.  I play
this real bastard in a television movie called In the Line of Duty: The
F.B.I. Murders with David Soul.  We're a couple of killers down in
Florida.  People come up to me almost every week because that movie had
such impact.  But I'd say it's pretty much divided equally between
Family Ties and the fans of other things, including Tremors.
There are some really obsessive Tremors nutcases out there, and I mean
that in the fondest possible way.  They're so funny!  They'll come up to
me and repeat lines and situations for me.  They love it.  It's
fascinating, and it's great to know that something you did for six weeks
last year brings people pleasure time and time again.
Do you think any of your crazy roles had anything to do with doing
something different from the dad in Family Ties?
Oh yes!  It's fun to keep people off balance.  If I had played Burt for
seven years, I would have said, "Oh please, give me a leading man. 
Please let me get the girl.  Can't I just be normal?"  It's partially to
manipulate my image, but partly to have some fun.  I love seafood, but I
don't want it at every meal.  From time to time, I want a pork chop. 
That's the same way I feel as an actor.  From my own sense of play, I
want to experiment.  
It was ironic that literally the day after we wrapped Family Ties in
1989, I was on the set of Tremors.  It was a wonderful gift because it
immediately answered the question, "Would there be life after Family
Ties?"  Not only would there be life, but it would be a radically
different life.  I have always loved interesting and bizarre characters
both on the stage and screen.  I wound up playing strange characters
onstage for years.  Thank God there were enough people in the industry
who knew that.  I mean, my Broadway debut was as a female impersonator
in a play about homosexuals in Nazi Germany.
Exactly.  That started in the fall of 1979.  On a swing, in a dress and
wig, as a female impersonator -- and that was my Broadway debut!  To me,
outlandish stuff is a hoot.  Burt was partly my response to seven years
of Steven Keaton on Family Ties and partly me doing what I had done for
years before.  To this day, I'm sorry I wasn't in the original movie,
The Producers.  That midnight movie, The Rocky Horror Picture Show,
would be right up my alley, too!
I've never seen a single episode of Family Ties.  If you had to describe
it to me, a culturally deprived child from the '80s, what words would
you use?
It was very much a product of the '80s.  The Michael J. Fox character is
a paradigm for the Reagan years and the conservatism of that decade. 
One of the things I thought in terms of the family was it showed how
diverse it can be and still hold together.  The parents are a
counterculture product of the '60s, and the father doesn't have what
Alex would call a real job (because he worked for public television). 
The son has a poster of William Buckley on the wall.  I think there's a
lesson for America in a place where we're so frocked by partisanship in
so many ways.  For or against guns, for or against abortion, this, that,
and the other thing, that we can't love each other in the midst of our
diversity, I think that's important for us and one of the great things
about Family Ties.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Sobibor, 14 octobre 1943, 16 heures (2001)
Sobibor, October 14, 1943, 4 P.M. contains no archival footage of the
Holocaust.  Nor does it attempt to recreate the uprising at that
specific Polish extermination camp on that specific date and time by any
means other than that of broad-shouldered, steadfast Yehuda Lerner's
eyewitness account.  The second half of this 95-minute film is almost
entirely comprised of Lerner in close-up or medium shot relaying his
memories of Jewish prisoners staging a hastily planned revolt against
their Nazi captors.  To those who criticize "talking head"
documentaries, Sobibor understands that a documentary is only as
important as the subject being considered.  It feels appropriate and
necessary to linger on Lerner's contemplation, his uncomfortable shifts,
his bursts of defensive sarcasm, a bitter grin in harsh contrast to his
haunted eyes.  To cut away from his face, which reveals so much, would
be to gaze away from a piece of history that must be preserved,
contemplated, remembered.
Planned for inclusion as footage within French director and journalist
Claude Lanzmann's landmark 9-hour documentary Shoah (the interview
footage with Lerner is from 1979), Lanzmann considered the material
important enough to merit its own treatment as a separate feature film. 
Those familiar with Lanzmann will be aware of his astute,
philosophically charged methods: lingering images of streets and squares
of contemporary Poland; long, meditative shots of Sobibor itself, now
decaying and worn over by time; unflinching interviews that run for
prolonged takes, lingering on the heavy silences.
Time is permitted for audience reflection during the exhaustive
translations from Hebrew to French, and one of Lanzmann's masterstrokes
is allowing Lerner to digress without subtitles, only providing
subtitles during the translation.  This may sound lugubrious, even
pretentious, but the interactive effect Lanzmann intends and achieves is
uncanny.  Lanzmann claims to have been offended by the images of
Schindler's List and Life is Beautiful because they simplify the
Holocaust through pictures, perhaps in an attempt to quantify or
understand the unthinkable.  Lanzmann has a different, more challenging,
agenda.  For him, the Holocaust cannot neatly be put into a box of evil
things to be neatly thrown away.  There's no pat moral, no cheap
sentimentality, no answers.  What you choose to do with Lanzmann's time
capsule is a decision for the individual viewer.
In the process of his examination, Lanzmann asks deceptively simple
questions, often in the form of a blunt statement:
Describe [the German you were about to kill].
In his answers, Lerner jokes that the entire plan worked based on the
notion of German punctuality ("We knew that he would be here by 4:00
P.M. exactly!  And that the next German would promptly show up at 4:05
P.M. exactly!")  Grim descriptions of an axe as sharp as a razor blade
or a German soldier's arm hanging under a pile of coats are punctuated
by Lerner's ceaseless smile, his robust exclamations that make his body
shake with vigor, his trembling hand as he smokes a cigarette.  "The
Jews sounded like geese when they were gassed," he says, right before
acknowledging that the Germans kept real geese near the camps to cover
the sound of inhuman screams.
Lanzmann's climax is sure to send some audience members running for the
exit.  There's no visceral shock of footage or photographs of thousands
of corpses piled in a ditch.  Lanzmann fills the screen with dates,
locations, and numbers, then proceeds to read in his thick French accent
how many victims were brought to Sobibor (to die).  "Seex ssousand; two
hondred and forty free; figures unknown; figures unknown; ten
ssousand..."  This goes on for several minutes on end, to the point
where a few people at the New York Film Festival press screening got up
and left.  After running a complete tally, Lanzmann considers aloud that
this makes up over 250,000 victims.  He lets the closing credits roll
over a shot of wind rustling through the trees.  The rest is silence.
Aka Sobibor, 14 octobre 1943, 16 heures.
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Unagi (1997)
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Jeremiah Kipp.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/60e74e041ca9cd6b8625626f0062219f/be6d628f22d15fda882568f8000966f0?OpenDocument
 Takuro Yamashita is a bland, efficient little man who worked nine to
five in your standard office job, going off on fishing excursions during
the weekend. He hardly emotes at all, and when he discovered his wife
sleeping with another man one night he dispatched her in a chilly,
businesslike manner then immediately turned himself in. He spent eight
years in prison.
 Shohei (Black Rain - not the Michael Douglas version) Imamura's new
film, The Eel, documents this quiet, eccentric character during his
first several months of parole. What starts out as the story of a
murderer shifts gears to become a quirky character study with more than
a little touch of farce as he attempts to start his life over as a
village barber in a small seaside town. He doesn't seem to like people
very much, spending most of his time confessing to his eel, which
`listened to him' as his pet during those hard years in prison.
 His broadly played, if colorful, neighbors include a cheerful priest
who happens to be his parole officer, a grouchy and cantankerous
fisherman, a simple soul who thinks that by hanging up bright lights
around the barber pole he'll be able to summon UFOs, and a garbageman
who seems to recognize Yamashita from prison.
 Most troubling of all is Keiko, a young woman who attempted suicide by
the river. Yamashita saved her life, and she's decided to repay her debt
by helping him around the shop. Of course, she bears an uncanny
resemblance to his murdered wife.
 Imamura plays his cards close to the vest, allowing his story to play
out through the minimal bits of information Yamashita and Keiko will
divulge about their lives. He does manage to pack in enormous quantities
of backstory with economy and grace, and slowly hints at how these two
broken souls deal with their histories of guilt and make their wayward
attempt to leave that past behind them.
 The Eel  is packed with charged silences as they clean the barber shop
together, or deal with customers, and every now and then we will receive
a glimmer of new information. It's almost entirely photographed in long
shots which provide a meditative distance from the characters and their
dramatic situations, and keeps their story subtle.
 If the film stumbles before the climax, perhaps it's because Imamura
has inserted too many distracting subplots which somehow feel gauche and
overcooked, like Keiko's half insane mother fancying herself a dancing
queen or the kid looking to the skies for UFOs. They don't really fit
with the central dramatic action, and the humor is too broad and forced
to work alongside the seriousness of Yamashita's scenes.
 The final confrontation feels like it belongs in a French farce, with
slamming doors and a packed room of shouting people. It also serves to
wrap up the story a little too neatly, giving easy ways out for the
central problems of Yamashita and Keiko.
 The Eel works best in those quiet moments where two people seem to
slowly, fearfully drift toward each other. Unfortunately, when you
surround them with a raucous circus of offbeat neighbors clamoring for
attention, the central arc only gets lost in the shuffle.
Director: Shohei Imamura
Producer: Hisa Iino
Writer: Shohei Imamura, Daisuke Tengan, Motofumi Tomikawa
Starring: Koji Yakusho, Misa Shimizu, Fujio Tokita, Mitsuko Baisho,
Akira Emoto
">http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html">
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
To unsubscribe from filmcritic.com's Breaking Reviews mailing list,
reply to this e-mail with UNSUBSCRIBE as the subject.  E-mail address
changes via reply with both old and new addresses.

Title
Review for Happy Accidents (2000)
My filmcritic.com colleague Norm Schrager nailed Session 9, Brad
Anderson's throwback to spooky horror films from the 70's.  It worked as
an eerie homage without being self-referential or smugly postmodern. 
Genre aficionados will acknowledge the similarities in tone to Stanley
Kubrick's The Shining and George Romero's Dawn of the Dead without being
taken out of the engrossing narrative (i.e., a psychologically addled
waste management team clears out an abandoned lunatic asylum;
unspeakable dread ensues).  In a double-whammy for 2001, Anderson shoots
and (mostly) scores again with his eclectic riff on time-travel episodes
from The Twilight Zone, appropriately titled Happy Accidents.
Much like Session 9, the cards are played very close to the vest here. 
Is boyish, eccentric "Sam Deed from Dubuque, Iowa" a futuristic voyager
from the year 2470 or just your run-of-the-mill psychologically
disturbed nutcase let loose on the present-day streets of NYC?  As
played by wonderful character actor Vincent D'Onofrio (Full Metal
Jacket), it's up in the air whether or not we should accept his detailed
monologues about life after the polar ice caps have melted.  The
question proves to be moot, at least for a time.  Even if the whole
thing proves to be a creative delusion, one agrees with the character
judgment passed down on him by his new girlfriend, Ruby (Marisa Tomei):
"He's a freak, but he sure tells a good story!"
Neurotic Ruby thinks she may have found True Love after a series of
nightmarish dating disasters (the Junkie, the Fetishist, the Artist, the
Frenchman, etc.), but isn't quite sure how to handle "Sam Deed" when he
starts explaining the barcode on his arm, his elaborately constructed
fake identity, his pathological fear of dogs, his ability to speak five
different languages, and his mission to change a crucial moment in time
that may have ramifications on time's alternate realities.  (Don't
ask.)  It's all a bit much to take in.  Ruby's close friend Gretchen
(cuz ya can't have a love story without the token friend, though Nadia
Dajani invests the thankless role with warmth) chalks it up as a sexy
role-playing game, but her cautious therapist (Holland Taylor) warns her
that co-dependency is rearing its ugly head again and she's in over her
head with yet another doomed relationship.  Who ya gonna believe?
Despite her winning an Academy Award, Marisa Tomei has always struck me
as an annoying and unwelcome screen presence, one that undermines the
pleasure of watching Happy Accidents.  Her brassy New Yawk attitude
never really meshes with her desperate desire to appear "cute" to her
adoring fans.  Being loud and flashing a (disingenuous) smile does not
necessarily equal "substantial and sexy."  It takes more than a crack
team of hair and wardrobe people to imbue her with personality.  Then
there's that damned voice, which strains to be oh-so-adorable.  Look,
this stuff is purely subjective.  Some people feel this way about
Richard Gere, others cannot bear to watch Robin Williams' hyperactive
schtick.  For my money, it's M. Tomei with a bullet.
Happy Accidents is a romantic comedy filtered through Twelve Monkeys
(or, more appropriately, Chris Marker's La Jetee, especially with those
still framed "memory" photographs Anderson employs as a stylistic device
throughout).  Modern Manhattan is filmed with an otherworldly, vaguely
alien eye with a color scheme oddly reminiscent of Logan's Run.  As the
stranger in a strange land, D'Onofrio walks slightly out-of-step,
wonderfully affable but often inscrutable with his wayward expressions
and bemused detachment.  This is science fiction told mainly via the
power of suggestion (though it often falls into the sci-fi trap of
having entirely too much forced exposition -- we want deeds, not words!)
At least twenty minutes too long, Happy Accidents eventually gets around
to a race-against-time scenario that puts "Sam Deed" to the Ultimate
Test.  No movie can live in ambiguity forever, but Anderson seems
terminally unable to provide satisfactory conclusions to his otherwise
well structured recent narratives.  (Let's pretend the loathsome and
predictable Next Stop Wonderland never happened, shall we?)  There are
also some slow, repetitive stretches as Ruby and Sam go over the same
arguments again and again over whether or not he's crazy.  The premise
is strong enough to sustain interest, but it's enough to throw a nod in
the general direction of Rod Serling for wrapping up his ideas in
half-hour time slots, commercials included.
Director: Brad Anderson
Producer: Susan A. Stover
Writer: Brad Anderson
Starring: Marisa Tomei, Vincent D'Onofrio, Nadia Dajani, Holland Taylor,
Sean Gullette, Jose Zuniga
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Amores perros (2000)
Painted in the colors of rust, Alejandro González Ińarritu's Amores
Perros is a hard-edged epic of interconnected lives in the mean streets
of Mexico City.  This has become a popular trend in independent films
such as Wonderland and The Five Senses, not to mention big-budget
blockbusters like Traffic.  By blending different scenarios, there's the
hope of creating a mass collage.  It's not as easy to pull off as you
might think -- consider the rhythm of your standard daytime soap opera.
The concept of three juxtaposed narratives, at least in the "flavor of
the month" sense, can be traced to Quentin Tarantino, as can the
gunslinging desperados and pop music that have become the humdrum
trademark of Pulp Fiction imitators.  Ińarritu is content to simply
rehash those familiar elements.  Perhaps that's why so much of this
Academy Award nominated foreign film comes off like a movie you've seen
more than once, translated a Espanol.
Despite the cinematic and structural predictability and an exhausting
three hour running time, Amores Perros finds surprising flickers of
humanity within the dead-end lives of ex-convicts, losers, young lovers
on the lam, and hired gunmen.  These almost-heroes are driven by an
unfinished business of the heart, most notably the mysterious phantom
hobo, El Chivo (Emilio Echevarría).  He's a contract killer (yes, a
homeless contract killer -- it's not played for laughs) for some elusive
businessmen, but his attention is drawn away by an unexpected obituary
notice that triggers memories of his long shrouded past.  This sort of
thing only happens in the movies, but let's cut Ińarritu some slack
here.
El Chivo lurks throughout the other two stories, but only in his
exclusive section (the final third of the film) does the heart and soul
of Amores Perros emerge.  Retribution is not seen as an easy mark, and
Ińarritu puts to one side the cheap violence and sadistic humor of his
previous tales, replacing it with the empathetic sorrow of a distant
love ballad.  Poetic and slighty cheeseball, but oh so sweet.
It's almost too little too late.  Example: one of the parallel stories
follows a young buck (Gael García Bernal) attempting to raise money to
run away from home with his beloved sister-in-law (Vanessa Bauche).  He
finds a financially lucrative solution in pitting the family pet in a
series of blood soaked dogfights.  For all its combustive energy, it's a
one-note tragedy as he makes enemies of his brother and the local goon
squad.  Things fall apart in a predictable hail of tears and bloodshed.
The other subplot steals images wholesale from Krzysztof Kieslowski,
presenting the arid relationship of a frivolous supermodel, Valeria
(Goya Toledo) and her boyfriend, a successful businessman (Alvaro
Guerrero).  The building block poster of Valeria across the street from
her dream home is a direct lift from Red (in which Irene Jacob played a
petulant model, natch).  When she is hospitalized in a terrible car
accident, the event that brings all of Amores Perros' characters
together, it forces her to reevaluate her empty life.  It'd be sad if
she weren't such an annoying phony.
The title, Amores Perros, directly translates as "Love's a Bitch." 
Meaning, life stinks.  It also means, literally, that love is a female
dog.  That explains the constant presence of mutts throughout.  El Chivo
is surrounded by runaway scamps, the supermodel has a pampered pooch,
and the young buck has his attack dog.  It sounds a little too neat -
and it is, really -- but the canines provide our nasty heroes someone
who they can relate to with unconditional affection.
That unabashed sentiment bridges Amores Perros through the hyperkinetic
overdrive of whiplash images, smash cuts, and the pulsating cacophony of
street noises on the audio track.  It's too much.  In his eager passion
to fill Amores Perros with explosive imagery, Ińarritu nearly drowns his
audience in visual excess.  If he doesn't watch out, he'll turn into
Ridley Scott.
Let's hope not.  This fresh new filmmaker does make the most of his
locations, finding the epitome of downbeat urban squalor (you can almost
taste the mined-in dirt), but he should have listened to Dennis Hopper's
advice in Tarantino's True Romance: "Slooooooow it down, man!"  He's got
an eye for the strong visuals representative of the overcrowded, noisy,
polluted excess of Mexico City.  Now all he needs is a steady gaze.
Director: Alejandro González Ińarritu
Producer: Alejandro González Ińarritu
Writer: Guillermo Arriaga
Starring: Emilio Echevarría, Gael García Bernal, Goya Toledo, Álvaro
Guerrero, Vanessa Bauche, Jorge Salinas
http://multimedia.elfoco.com/elfoco/amoresperros/index.html
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Akira (1988)
Neo-Tokyo is about to explode.  Adapted from the mega-popular biweekly
Japanese comic strip, Katsuhiro Otomoto's Akira pares down the epic
graphic novel into two hours of purely visceral animated carnage.  What
lacks in coherence is made up for by brutal energy, starting off with a
blood soaked shooting, mutant kids on the run, a kick-ass motorcycle
chase straight from Mad Max, and a riveting electronica score.  Hop on
your bike!  Let's go!
Set in an apocalyptic Blade Runner city in 2019, young cyberpunk Kaneda
and his pint-sized bullethead amigo Tetsuo encounter a dangerous
telekinetic child (after kicking the shit of a rival bike gang).  Before
you can say "makeshift plot," a band of government scientists and army
helicopters are chasing our young heroes through the city before "Akira"
is unleashed.  The chase doesn't disappoint, leading to a monster-movie
climax where one of the central characters transforms into a gigantic
jelly-beast, smashing the city to pieces.  Many, many people die. 
Hundreds.  Maybe thousands.  It's beautiful, man!
The old ultraviolence achieves poetic splendor with top-notch
animation.  Painted in a wide array of futurama colors, it's a neon
glitter-dream come to life.  When heads start exploding like melons,
bright red splotches are highlighted against screaming white backdrops. 
The details are impeccable, with crowd scenes playing out as
mini-masterpieces of character design.
Die-hard Akira fans will be pleased by the digital remastering of the
print, now being projected digitally in some theaters.  For a
15-year-old slice of anime, Akira is still looking mighty sleek.  Yeah,
the dubbing is still fairly inept, but who's watching this movie for the
great dialogue?  (Okay, fine -- I liked it too when Kei says, "Amoebas
don't make motorcycles and atomic bombs!"  Just don't give me a bad
attitude, pops.  They've cut the juiciest camp translations in the
re-release.)
Akira is the rare animated film where the nonsensical plot actually
doesn't make much of a difference.  The action is staged fluidly and the
tone is pure pop opera.  It's Godzilla meets Rebel Without a Cause. 
While the manga fan base tends to overrate the film to a fault, Akira
will appropriately smash you in all the right places.
Director: Katsuhiro Otomoto
Producers: Shunzo Kato, Ryohei Suzuki
Writer: Izou Hashimoto 
Starring: Mitsuo Iwata, Nozomu Sasaki, Mami Koyama
http://www.akira2001.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Akai hashi no shita no nurui mizu (2001)
Girl: To you, I must appear like a slut.
Warm Water Under a Red Bridge is a continuation of the themes that have
preoccupied esteemed Japanese director Shohei Imamura for much of his
career.  This 74-year old filmmaker trains his detailed eye on a
cross-section of small town life (near the Noto Peninsula, to be
precise), accurately representing the lewd fishermen and shopkeepers who
reside there.  His characters are often middle-to-lower class,
gregariously smoke and loiter, make endless small talk, are often
preoccupied with sex, and are constricted by their societal roles,
particularly that of women -- widely considered to be the weaker sex. 
Imamura's female characters are surprisingly resilient, much more than
the cloddish men.  Even the more likable male roles (pretty much all of
them in Warm Water) are possessed by aggressive machismo and blundering
jealousy.
One of Imamura's more accessible features, Warm Water is a comedy that
breaks sexual taboos through freewheeling use of magic realism.  That's
not immediately apparent, though, which is a nice touch.  We've grown
accustomed to movies that don't offer such pleasing surprises.  The
story begins as a man at wit's end embarks on an impromptu treasure
hunt.  Former office drone Yosuke (Koji Yakusho, The Eel) roams the
streets of Tokyo unsuccessfully looking for work.  Much of his time is
spent with the affable homeless philosophers that populate the
waterfronts.  One of the more wily tricksters in the bunch, Taro (Kazuo
Kitamura), spins an elaborate yarn about a gold Buddhist statue he once
stole from a Kyoto temple.  He's too old and too damn tired to track it
down, but encourages Yosuke to follow the clues to its whereabouts: a
house near a red bridge, the entrance lined with trumpet flowers.  It's
about time Yosuke left Tokyo behind anyway -- all he's found is bad
fortune.  His nagging wife is about to leave him unless he comes up with
some cash pronto, so what's he got to lose?
When Yosuke arrives at the red bridge, his adventure is diverted by
encounters with the astonishing young girl that lives in the treasure
house with her long-suffering clairvoyant grandmother (Mitsuko Baisho). 
One could safely say that Yosuke has never met anyone quite like the
lovely, cheerful, elusive Saeko (Misa Shimizu), a compulsive
shoplifter.  While at the supermarket, he catches her in the act and
draws himself into her life by returning the golden earring he found in
a small, inexplicable puddle of water where she stood during the theft.
It soon becomes clear that Saeko's kleptomania isn't what drives Yosuke
to distraction, it's her seemingly magical and sensual ability to "make
water" ...which is where the mysticism gets pretty thick.  Audiences
will either go with it or they won't.  Prudes beware.  In much the same
way lovers spontaneously combusted in the odious Like Water For
Chocolate (my comparison ends there), Saeko produces enormous quantities
of water when she's excited.  Sex is like a gigantic tidal wave.  It's
Imamura's way of transforming love scenes into virtuoso comic setpieces,
but once he's mined the joke to the fullest he digs deeper into the
novelty of male fantasy and that magnificent, indescribable female aura
that sometimes transforms men into obsessive fools.  It's Imamura's
allegory for the "repulsive power" of women -- what attracts boys also
mortifies them.
Leaving his former drab life behind, Yosuke stays with Saeko, becomes a
fisherman, makes himself at home, and might even live happily ever
after.  Everything seems to be going well until one of his hobo pals
from Tokyo (grinning Manasaku Fuwa, funny and sad) starts sticking his
smelly little nose in all of Yosuke's affairs (he's in search of the
treasure too, the old sot!)  Then there's the problem that Yosuke bears
more than a passing resemblance to Saeko's old boyfriend.  Is he just an
object for her desires?  Hey, wasn't it supposed to be the men who
objectify women?  What the hell's going on around here, anyway?
Imamura's camera is restrained, sticking to rigorously composed images
that sometimes remain static for entire scenes (a couple of times the
unhurried pace becomes positively languid, but that comes with the
territory with this particular director).  Nothing stodgy about it, Warm
Water allows viewers room to take in their fill of the locations and be
attentive to the physicality of his characters.  There's also tremendous
energy from the cast, a sense of playfulness and excitement that seems
appropriate.  When Yosuke and Saeko aren't having sex, they're eating or
telling jokes.  There's a chorus of fishermen right down the block who
delightfully grumble about their catch, their neighbors, and beautiful
girls.  Warm Water doesn't feel like the work of an elderly filmmaker
gone out to pasture; it's young without being innocent or impetuous. 
Imamura's approach to storytelling is that of the curious spectator,
inviting laughter and raised eyebrows at erotic hijinks, fistfights,
sports, even philosophy.  What makes his humor so unerringly perceptive
is the lingering pain that burns underneath all that playfulness. 
That's human nature.
Aka Akai hashi no shita no nurui mizu.)
Director: Shohei Imamura
Producer: Hisa Iino
Writer: Motofumi Tomikawa, Daisuke Tengan, Shohei Imamura
Starring: Koji Yakusho, Misa Shimizu, Mitsuko Baisho, Manasaku Fuwa,
Kazuo Kitamura
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com

Title
Review for Series 7: The Contenders (2001)
The title Series 7 stands for the seventh season of the highest-rated
reality based show on television, The Contenders.  Set a few years from
now, the program rules are laid out with unsparing precision: Six
average, everyday citizens are chosen via random lottery to mercilessly
kill one another.  This will continue until one survivor remains.  Sound
familiar?  When historians chart the downfall of human empathy, they
will see that we were only one step away from moral paralysis in our
increasing apathy to Survivor, Temptation Island, and The Real World. 
Here we are, now entertain us.
This satire couldn't be more cutting edge.  Former tabloid TV producer
Daniel Minahan (and co-screenwriter of I Shot Andy Warhol) takes dead
aim on glib, pre-packaged network formulas for success.  A terse
narrator (Will Arnett) offers mock-sympathetic encouragement for the
contestants as well as in-depth play-by-play ring coverage.  Opponents
are given screen time for weepy confessions to their assigned guerrilla
cameramen, dispassionately filming their fight or flight confrontations
on hand-held digital video.
Our odds-on favorite is the lethal, eight-months-pregnant Dawn (Brooke
Smith), a returning champion with 10 confirmed kills under her belt.  If
she makes it through one final season, she'll be granted her well-earned
freedom.  Marching through the eroded suburbia of her hometown (Newbury,
Connecticut), there's no confusing her for a helpless female.  This
pistol-packing mama will do anything to save her unborn child, eyes
glazed over with steel acceptance.
In the grim opening footage lifted from a previous season, the camera
follows Dawn as she barges into a 7-Eleven to pop a few caps into an
unsuspecting victim.  The expressive, open-faced Smith has always been
one of cinema's best-kept secrets, most memorable as the senator's
daughter at the bottom of Buffalo Bill's well in The Silence of the
Lambs.  Here, she displays a vigilance that kicks Series 7 into
overdrive.
The programmers throw a sensational tabloid curveball by placing Dawn's
perpetually glum high school sweetheart among her opponents.  But almost
all of the dramatic contrivances (this one being the most obvious) can
be written off as part of the television structure-induced malaise. 
It's doubtful they'll be apparent in the visual onslaught of
information.
Revealing a taste for showmanship, the now-married Jeff (Glenn
Fitzgerald) has unorthodox plans for their televised reunion.  Rotting
away from testicular cancer, Jeff literally doesn't have the balls for
this contest.  Minahan shows admirable restraint in not exploiting this
obvious gag.  Jeff asks that Dawn painlessly remove him from the game
with an overdose of sleeping pills.  Easier said than done, especially
when it's the only man she ever loved -- and what if he suddenly
rediscovers his lust for life?  This morbid coupling is even granted an
appropriate theme song, Joy Division's "Love Will Tear Us Apart
(Again)."
Though Dawn and Jeff are given the center spotlight, there's no telling
when their number is gonna be up.  The same can be said for their
colorful opponents, a perfectly cast ensemble of "Joe Average" deviants:
Franklin (Richard Venture), a half-crazed conspiracy theorist; Tony
(Michael Kaycheck), a hulking brute who practices intimidating
shadowboxing techniques; Connie (Marylouise Burke), a brittle emergency
room nurse; and Lindsay (Merritt Weaver), a bright eyed, attractive
17-year old virgin.
Place your bets, but be forewarned: They may not die in the order you'd
expect.  Whether prowling through dimly lit houses or playing
hide-and-seek in an airy shopping mall, mundane locations become bloody
battlegrounds at the drop of a hat.  There's a queasy adrenaline rush in
this hastily staged domestic combat, with tension increased by the
digital photographers covering the scene.  What happens when they step
into the line of fire?
Minahan doesn't play this potentially lurid material as camp, opting
instead for the howlingly funny pseudo-documentary approach of Rob
Reiner's This Is Spinal Tap.  By playing it straight, he's able to take
blistering potshots at media carnage (including an obligatory freeway
chase with echoes of O.J. Simpson) without losing his edge.  When a
contender is taken out, it's not done for giggles like Oliver Stone's
naďve Natural Born Killers, but viewed with the ironic detachment of
video surveillance.  There are no formalities -- once the kill is
confirmed, it's on to the next kill with maddening proclivity.
Series 7 is too self-conscious to be defined as naturalism, but there's
something freakishly accurate in the mannered affectations of these
media-savvy contestants.  Even Dawn's gaze keeps flickering to the lens
of the camera, seeking artificial validation.  Constantly reciting
dialogue lifted from a bad episode of Geraldo Rivera, their emotional
codes of conduct have been gleaned from daytime talk shows.  To even
say, "I love you," during a tearful embrace feels like art imitating
life imitating 90210.  Daniel Minahan welcomes us to the bleak dead-end
of our cultural void -- if it's seen through the camera, it's no longer
real life.
Director: Daniel Minahan
Producers: Jason Kliot, Joana Vicente, Christine Vachon, Katie Roumel
Writer: Daniel Minahan
Starring: Brooke Smith, Glenn Fitzgerald, Marylouise Burke, Richard
Venture, Michael Kaycheck, Merritt Weaver, Donna Hanover
http://www.series7movie.com/
---
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/redirect?tag=filmcriticcom&path=subst/video/sellers/amazon-top-100-dvd.html
Movie Fiends: Check out Amazon.com's Top 100 Hot DVDs!
Visit filmcritic.com on the Web at http://www.filmcritic.com
